UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
 Form10-K  
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019
Or
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT
OF 1934
For the transition period from              to             
Commission file number: 001-32877
 
  
 Mastercard Incorporated  
 (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)  
 Delaware 13-4172551  
 (State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization)(IRS Employer
Identification Number)  
 2000 Purchase Street   
 Purchase, NY 10577  
 (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)  
(914) 249-2000
(Registrant’ s telephone number , including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class  Trading Symbol  Name of each exchange of which registered
Class A Common Stock, par value $0.0001 per
share  MA  New York Stock Exchange
1.100% Notes due 2022  MA22  New York Stock Exchange
2.100% Notes due 2027  MA27  New York Stock Exchange
2.500% Notes due 2030  MA30  New York Stock Exchange
 Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:  
 Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per share  
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required
to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be
submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files) Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or
an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth
company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check One):
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐(do not check if a smaller reporting company) Smaller reporting company ☐
 Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with
any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13 (a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act). Yes ☐ No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’s Class A common stock, par value $0.0001 per share, held by non-affiliates (using the New York Stock
Exchange closing price as of June 28, 2019, the last business day of the registrant’s most recently completed second fiscal quarter) was
approximately $235.9 billion. There is currently no established public trading market for the registrant’s Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per
share. As of February 11, 2020, there were 994,281,310 shares outstanding of the registrant’s Class A common stock, par value $0.0001 per share
and 10,827,654 shares outstanding of the registrant’s Class B common stock, par value $0.0001 per share.
Portions of the registrant’s definitive proxy statement for the 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference into Part III hereof.
MASTERCARD INCORPORA TED FISCAL  YEAR 2019  FORM 10-K ANNUAL  REPOR T
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I6 Item 1. Business
18 Item 1A. Risk factors
31 Item 1B. Unresolved staf f comments
31 Item 2. Properties
31 Item 3. Legal proceedings
31 Item 4. Mine safety disclosures
 32 - Information about our executive of ficers
  
PART II36 Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related stockholder matters and issuer
purchases of equity securities
38 Item 6. Selected financial data
39 Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial condition and results of operations
53 Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market risk
55 Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
107 Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on accounting and financial disclosure
107 Item 9A. Controls and procedures
107 Item 9B. Other Information
  
PART III109 Item 10. Directors, executive of ficers and corporate governance
109 Item 11. Executive compensation
109 Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related
stockholder matters
109 Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and director independence
109 Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services
  
PART IV111 Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules
111 Item 16. Form 10-K summary
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 3
In this Repo rt on Form 10-K (“Report”), refere nces to the “Company ,” “Mastercard,” “we,” “us” or “our” refer to the business
conducted by Mastercard Incorporated and its consolidated subsidiaries, including our operating subsidiary , Mastercard International
Incorporated, and to the Mastercard brand.
Forward-Looking Statements
This Report contains forward-looking statements pursuant to the safe harbor provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform
Act of 1995. All statements other than statemen ts of historical facts may be forward-looking statements. When used in this Report,
the words “believe”, “expect”, “could”, “may”, “would”, “will”, “trend” and similar words are intended to identify forward-looking
statements. Examples of forward-looking statements include, but are not limited to, statements that relate to the Company’ s future
prospects, developments and business strategies.
Many factors and uncert ainties relating to our operations and business environment, all of which are difficult to predict and many of
which are outside of our control, influence whether any forward-looking statements can or will be achieved. Any one of those factors
could cause  our actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in writing in any forward-looking statements made
by Mastercard or on its behalf, including, but not limited to, the following factors:
•regulation directly related to the payments industry (including regulatory , legislative and litigation activity with respect to
interchange rates and surcharging)
•the impact of preferential or protective government actions
•regulation of privacy , data, security and the digital economy
•regulation that directly or indirectly applies to us based on our participation in the global payments industry (including anti-money
laundering, counter terrorist financing, economic sanctions and anti-corruption; account-based payment systems; and issuer
practice regulation)
•the impact of changes in tax laws, as well as regulations and interpretations of such laws or challenges to our tax positions
•potential or incurred liability and limitations on business related to any litigation or litigation settlements
•the impact of competition in the global payments industry (including disintermediation and pricing pressure)
•the challenges relating to rapid technological developments and changes
•the challenges relating to operating a real-time account-based payment system and to working with new customers and end
users
•the impact of information security incidents, account data breaches or service disruptions
•issues related to our relationships with our financial institution customers (including loss of substantial business from significant
customers, competitor relationships with our customers and banking industry consolidation), merchants and governments
•exposure to loss or illiquidity due to our role as guarantor and other contractual obligations
•the impact of global economic, political, financial and societal events and conditions
•reputational impact, including impact related to brand perception and lack of visibility of our brands in products and services
•the inability to attract, hire and retain a highly qualified and diverse workforce, or maintain our corporate culture
•issues related to acquisition integration, strategic investments and entry into new businesses
•issues related to our Class A common stock and corporate governance structure
Please see “Risk Factors ” in Part I, Item 1A for a complete discussion of these risk factors. We caution you that the important factors
referenced above may not contain all of the factors that are important to you. Our forward-looki ng statements speak only as of the
date of this Report or as of the date they are made, and we undertake no obligation to update our forward-looking statements.
4 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART I   
Item 1. Business    
Item 1A. Risk factors    
Item 1B. Unresolved staff comments    
Item 2. Properties    
Item 3. Legal proceedings    
Item 4. Mine safety disclosures    
Information about our executive officers    
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Item 1. Business
Overview
Mastercard is a technol ogy company in the global payments industry that connects consumer s, financial institutions, merchants,
governments, digital partners, businesses and other organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment
instead of cash and checks. We make payments easier and more efficient by providing a wide range of payment solutions and
services using our family of well-known brands , including Mastercard®, Maestro® and Cirrus® . We are a multi-rail network that
offers customers one partner to turn to for their domestic and cross-border payment needs. Through our unique and proprietary
global payments network, which we refer to as our core network, we switch (authorize, clear and settle) payment transactions and
deliver related products  and services. We have additional payment capabilities that include automated clearing house (“ACH”)
transactions (both batch and real-time account-based payments). We also provide integrated value-added offerings such as cyber
and intellige nce products, information and analyt ics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs and processing. Our payment
solutions of fer customers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and security for the global payments system.
A typical transaction on our core network involves four participants in addition to us: account holder (a person or entity who holds a
card or uses another device enabled for paym ent), issuer (the account holder ’s financial institution), merchant and acquirer (the
merchant’ s financial institution). We do not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue from interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection  with merchants’  acceptance of our
products. In most cases, account holder relationships belong to, and are managed by , our financial institution customers.
We generate  revenues from assessing our customers based on the gross dollar volume (“GDV”) of activity on the products that carry
our brands, from the fees we charge to our customers for providing transaction switching and from other payment-related products
and services.
For a full discussion of our business, please see page 8.
Our Performance
The following are our key financial and operational highlights for 2019, including growth rates over the prior year:
GAAP
Net revenue   Net income  Diluted EPS
$16.9B   $8.1B  $7.94
up 13%   up 39%  up 42%
NON-GAAP  1 (currency-neutral)
Net revenue   Adjusted net income  Adjusted diluted EPS
$16.9B   $7.9B  $7.77
up 16%   up 20%  up 23%
$7.8B  $6.5B Repurchased shares
 $8.2B
in capital returned   
to stockholders  $1.3B Dividends paid
 cash flows  
from operations
Gross dollar volume
(growth on a local currency basis)  
Cross-border volume growth
on a local currency basis 2 
Switched transactions 2
 $6.5T   up 16%  87.3B
 up 13%    up 19%
1 Non-GAAP results exclude the impact of gains and losses on equity investments, Special Items and/or foreign currency. See “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Financial Results Overview” in Part II, Item 7 for the reconciliation to
the most direct comparable GAAP financial measures.
2 Growth rates normalized to eliminate the effects of differing switching and carryover days between periods. Carryover days are those where
transactions and volumes from days where the company does not clear and settle are processed.
6 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Our Strategy
We grow , diversify and build our business throug h a combination of organic and inorganic strategic initiatives. Our ability to grow our
business is influenced by:
•personal consumption expenditure (“PCE”) growth
•driving cash and check transactions toward electronic forms of payment
•increasing our share in the payments space
Growing our business also includes supplementing our core network by providing integrated value-added products and services and
enhanced payment capabilities to capture new payment flows, such as business to business (“B2B”), person to person (“P2P”),
business to consumer (“B2C”) and government payments.
 
GROW  DIVERSIFY BUILD
CORE  CUSTOMERS AND GEOGRAPHIES NEW AREAS
Credit
Debit
Commercial
Prepaid
Digital-Physical Convergence
Acceptance
 Financial Inclusion
New Markets
Businesses
Governments
Merchants
Digital Players
Local Schemes/SwitchesData Analytics
Consulting
Marketing Services
Loyalty
Cyber and Intelligence
Processing
New Payment Flows
ENABLED BY  BRAND, DA TA, TECHNOLOGY  AND PEOPLE
Grow . We focus on growing our core business globally , including growing our consumer and commercial products and solutions, as
well as increasing the number of payment transactions we switch. We also look to provide effective and efficient payments solutions
that cater to the evolvin g ways people interact  and transact in the growing digital economy . This includes expanding merchant
access to electronic payments through new technologies in an effort to deliver a better consumer experience, while creating greater
efficiencies and security .
Diversify . We diversify our business by:
•working with new customers, including governments, merchants, financial technology companies, digital players, mobile
providers and other corporate businesses
•scaling our capabilities and business into new geographies, including growing acceptance in markets with limited electronic
payments acceptance today
•broadening financial inclusion for the unbanked and underbanked
Build. We build our business by:
•creating and acquiring differentiated products to provide unique, innovative solutions that we bring to market to support new
payment flows and related applications, such as real-time account-based payments and the Mastercard Track™ suite of products
•providing services across data analytics, consulting, marketing services, loyalty , cyber and intelligence, and processing
Strategic Partners. We work with a variety of stakeholders. We provide financial institutions with solutions to help them increase
revenue by driving prefe rence for our products. We help merchants, financial institutions and other organizations by delivering data-
driven insights and other services that help them grow and create simple and secure custo mer experiences. We partner with
technology companies such as digital players and mobile providers to deliver digital payment solutions powered by our technology ,
expertise and security protocols. We help national and local governments drive increased financial inclusion and efficiency , reduce
costs, increase transparency to reduce crime and corruption and advance social programs. For consumers, we provide faster , safer
and more convenient ways to pay and transfer funds.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 7
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Talent and Culture.  Our success is driven by the skills, experience, integrity and mindset of the talent we hire. We attract and retain
top talent from diverse backgrounds and indus tries by building a world-class culture based on decency , respect and inclusion in
which people have opportunities to do purpose-driven work that impacts customers, communitie s and co-workers on a global scale.
The diversity and skill sets of our people underpin everything we do.
Our Business
Our Operations and Network
Our core network links issuers and acquirers around the globe to facilitate the switching of trans actions, permitting account holders
to use a Mastercard product at millions of acceptance locations worldwide. Our core network facilitates an efficient and secure
means for receiving payments, a convenient, quick and secure payment method for consumers to access their funds and a channel
for businesses to receive insight through information that is derived from our network. We enable transactions for our customers
through our core network in more than 150 currencies and in more than 210 countries and territories. Our range of payment
capabilities extend beyond our core network into real-time account-based payments.
Typical Transaction.  Our core network supports what is often referred  to as a “four-party” payments network. The following diagram
depicts a typical transaction on our core network, and our role in that transaction:
In a typical transaction, an account holder purch ases goods or services from a merchant using one of our payment products. After
the transacti on is authorized by the issuer , the issuer pays the acquirer an amount equal to the value of the transaction, minus the
interchange fee (described below), and then posts the transaction to the account holder ’s account. The acquirer pays the amount of
the purchase, net of a discount (referred to as the “merchant discount” rate), to the merchant.
•Interchange Fees.  Interchange fees reflec t the value merchants receive from accepting our products and play a key role in
balancing the costs and benefits that consume rs and merchants derive.  We do not earn revenues from interchange fees. 
Generally , interchange fees are collected from acquirers and paid to issuers to reimburse the issuers for a portion of the costs
incurred. These costs are incurred by issuers in providing services that benefit all participants in the system, including acquirers
and mercha nts, whose participation in the network enables increased sales to their existing and new customers, efficiencies in
the delivery of existing  and new products, guaranteed payments and improved experience for their customers.  We (or,
alternatively , financial institutions) establish “defa ult interchange fees” that apply when there are no other established settlement
terms in place between an issuer and an acquirer . We administer the collection and remittance  of interchange fees through the
settlement process.
•Additional Four-Party System Fees.  The merch ant discoun t rate is established by the acquirer to cover its costs of both
participating in the four-party system and provid ing services to merchants.  The rate takes into consideration the amount of the
interchange fee which the acquirer generally pays to the issuer . Additionally , acquirers may charge merchants processing and
related fees in addition to the merchant discount rate, and issuers may also charge account holders fees for the transaction,
including, for example, fees for extending revolving credit.
8 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Switched Transactions
•Authorization, Clearing and Settlement.  Through our core network, we enable the routing of a transaction to the issuer for its
approval, facilitate the exchange of financial transaction information between issuers and acquirers after a successfully
conducted transaction, and help to settle the transaction by facilitating the exchange of funds between parties via settlement
banks chosen by us and our customers.
•Cross-Border and Domestic. Our core network switches transactions throughout the world when the merchant country and
country of issuance are different (“cross-border transactions”), providing account holders with the ability to use, and merchants to
accept, our products and services across country  borders. We also provide switched transaction services to customers where the
merchant country and the country of issuanc e are the same (“domestic transactions”). We switch more than half of all
transactions for Mastercard and Maestro-branded cards, including nearly all cross-border transactions. We switch the majority of
Mastercard and Maestro-branded domestic transactions in the United States, United Kingdom, Canada, Brazil and a select
number of other countries. Outside of these countries, most domestic transactions on our products are switched without our
involvement.
Core Network Architecture. Our core network featur es a globally integrated structure that provides scale for our issuers, enabling
them to expand into regional and global market s. It is based largely on a distributed (peer-to-peer) architecture with an intelligent
edge that enables the network to adapt to the needs of each transaction. Our core network accomplishes this by performing
intelligent routing and applying multiple value-added services (such as fraud scoring, tokeniz ation services, etc.) to appropriate
transactions in real time. Our core network’ s architecture enables us to connect all parties regardless of where or how the
transaction is occurring. It has 24-hour a day availability and world-class response time.
Real-time Account-based Payment Infrastruc ture and Applications. Augmenting our core network, we offer real-time account-
based payment capabilities, enabling payments between bank accounts in near real-time in countries in which it has been deployed.
Payments System Security . Our payme nt solutions  and products are designed to ensure safety and security for the global
payments system. The core network and additional platforms incorporate multiple layers of protection, both for continuity purposes
and to provide best-in-class security protection. We engage in many efforts to mitigate information security challenges, including
maintaining an information security program, a business continuity program and insurance coverage, as well as regularly testing our
systems to address potential vulnerabilities.
As part of our multi-lay ered approach to protec t the global payments system, we also work with issuers, acquirers, merchants,
governments and payments industry associatio ns to help develop and put in place standards (e.g., EMV) for safe and secure
transactions.
Digital Payments.  Our network supports and enables our digital payment platforms, products and solutions, reflecting the growing
digital economy where consumers are increasingly seeking to use their payment accounts to pay when, where and how they want.
Customer Risk. We guarantee the settlement of many of the transactions from issuers to acquirers to ensure the integrity of our
core network. We refer to the amount of this guarantee as our settlement exposure. We do not, however , guarantee payments to
merchants by their acquirers, or the availability of unspent prepaid account holder account balances.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 9
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Our Products and Services
We provide a wide variety of integrated products and services that support payment product s that customers can offer to their
account holders. These offerings facilitate transa ctions on our core network among account holders, merchants, financial institutions,
businesses, governments and other organizations in markets globally .
Core Products
Consumer Credit.  We offer a number of programs that enable issuers to provide consumers with credit that allow them to defer
payment. These programs are designed to meet  the needs of our customers around the world and address standard, premium and
affluent consumer segments.
Consumer Debit. We support a range of payment products and solutions that allow our customers to provide consumers with
convenient access to funds in deposit and other accounts. Our debit and deposit access program s can be used to make purchases
and to obtain cash in bank branches, at ATMs and, in some cases, at the point of sale. Our branded debit programs consist of
Mastercard (including standard, premium and affluent offerings), Maestro (the only PIN-based solution that operates globally) and
Cirrus (our primary global cash access solution).
Prepaid. Prepaid accounts are a type of electronic payment that enables consumers to pay in advance whether or not they
previously have had a bank account or a credit history . These accounts can be tailored to meet specific program, customer or
consumer needs, such as paying bills, sending person-to-person payments or withdrawing cash from an ATM. Our focus ranges
from digital accounts (such as fintech and gig economy platforms) to business programs such as employee payroll, health savings
accounts and solutions for small business owne rs. Our prepaid programs also offer opportunities in the private and public sector to
drive financial inclusion of previously unbanked individuals through social security payments, unemployment benefits and salary
cards.
We also provide prepaid  program management services, primarily outside of the United States, that provide processing and end-to-
end services on behalf of issuers or distributor partners such as airlines, foreign exchange bureaus and travel agents.
Commercial. We offer commercial payment products and solutions that help large corporations, midsize companies, small
businesses and government entities. Our solutions streamline procurement and payment processes, manage information and
expenses (such as travel and entertainment) and reduce administrative costs. Our card offerings include travel, small business
(debit and credit), purchasing and fleet cards. Our SmartData platform provides expense management and reporting capabilities.
Our Masterc ard In Control™ platform generates virtual account numbers which provide businesses with enhanced controls, more
security and better data.
10 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
The following chart provides GDV and number of cards featuring our brands in 2019  for select programs and solutions:
 Year Ended December 31, 2019  As of December 31, 2019
 GDV  Cards
 (in billions) Growth (Local) % of Total GDV (in millions)Percentage
Increase from
December 31,
2018
Mastercard-branded Programs 1,2     
    Consumer Credit $ 2,670  10% 41% 882 8%
    Consumer Debit and Prepaid 3,059  16% 48% 1,207 9%
    Commercial Credit and Debit 732  14% 11% 85 15%
1 Excludes Maestro and Cirrus cards and volume generated by those cards.
2 Prepaid includes both consumer and commercial prepaid.
Additional Platforms.  In addition to the switc hing capabilities of our core network, we offer additional platforms with payment
capabilities that extend to new payment flows:
•We offer commercial payment products and solutions aimed at improving the way businesses pay and get paid by providing a
single connection enabling access to multiple payment types, greater control and richer data to optimize B2B transactions for
both buyers and suppliers.
•We offer real-time accou nt-based payments for ACH transactions. This platform enables payments between bank accounts in
real time and provides enhanced data and messaging capabilities.
•We offer a platform that makes it easier for consu mers to view, manage and pay their bills either with cards or real-time and batch
ACH payments from their bank accounts .
•We offer a platform that enables consumers, businesses, governments and merchants to send and receive money beyond
borders with greater speed and ease.
Value-Added Products and Services
Cyber and Intelligence. We offer integrated products and services to prevent, detect and respond to fraud and cyber-atta cks and to
ensure the safety of transactions made using Mastercard products. W e do this using a multi-layered safety and security strategy:
•The “Prevent” layer protects infrastructure, devices and data from attacks. We have continued to grow global usage of EMV chip
and contactless security technology , helping to reduce fraud. Greater usage of this technology has increased the number of EMV
cards issued and the transaction volume on EMV cards.
•The “Identify” layer allow s us to help banks and merchants verify the authenticity of consumers during the payment process using
various biom etric technologies, including fingerprint, face and iris scanning technology to verify online purchases on mobile
devices, as well as a card with biometric technology built in.
•The “Detect ” layer spots fraudulent behavior and cyber-attacks and takes action to stop these activities once detected. Our
offerings in this space include alerts when accounts are exposed to data breaches or security incidents, fraud scoring technology
that scans billions of dollars of money flows each day while increasing approvals and reducing false declines, and network-level
monitoring on a global scale to help identify the occurrence of widespread fraud attacks when the customer (or their processor)
may be unable to detect or defend against them.
•The “Experience” layer improves the security experience for our stakeholders in areas from the speed of transactions, enhancing
approvals for online and card-on-file payments, to the ability to differentiate legitimate consumers from fraudulent ones. Our
offerings in this space include solutions for consumer alerts and controls and a suite of digital token services. We also have
acquired an e-commerce fraud and dispute management network that enables merchants to stop delivery when a fraudulent or
disputed transaction is identified, and issuers to refund the cardholder to avoid the chargeback process.
We have also worked with our financial institutio n customers to provide products to consumers globally with increased confidence
through the benefit of “zero liability”, or no responsibility for counterfeit or lost card losses in the event of fraud.
Loyalty and Rewards. We have built a scalable rewards platform that enables financial institutions to provide consumers with a
variety of benefits and services, such as perso nalized offers and rewards, access to a global airline lounge network, concierge
services, insurance services, emergency card replacement, emergency cash advances and a 24-hour account holder service center .
For merchants, we provide campaigns with targeted offers and rewards, management services for publishing offers, and accelerated
points progr ams for co-brand and rewards program members. We also have acquired a loyalty platform that enables stronger
relationships with retailers,
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 11
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
restaurants, airlines and consumer packaged goods companies by creating experiences that drive loyalty and impactful consumer
engagement.
Processing.  We extend our processing capabilities in the payments value chain in various regions and across the globe with an
expanded suite of of ferings, including:
•Issuer solutions designed to provide customers with a complete processing solution to help them create differentiated products
and services and allow quick deployment of payments portfolios across banking channels.
•Payment gateways that offer a single interface to provide e-commerce merchants with the ability to process secure online and in-
app payments and offer value-added solutions, including outsourced electronic payments, fraud prevention and alternative
payment options.
•Mobile gateways that facilitate transaction routing and processing for mobile-initiated transactions.
Data Analytics and Consulting. We provide proprietary analysis, data-driven consulting and marketing services solutions to help
clients optimize, streamline and grow their businesses, as well as deliver value to consumers.
Our capabil ities incorporate payments expertise and analytical and executional skills to create end-to-end solutions which are
increasingly delivered via platforms embedded in our customers’  day-to-day operations. By observing patterns of payments behavior
based on billions of transactions switched globally , we leverage anonymized and aggregated information and a consultative
approach to help our customers make better business decisions. Our executional skills such as marketing, digital implementation
and staf f augmentation allow us to assist clients to implement actions based on these insights.
Increasingly , we have been helping financial institutions, retailers and governments innovate. Drawing on rapid prototyping
methodologies from our global innovation and development arm, Mastercard Labs, we offer “Launchpad,” a five day app prototyping
workshop. Through our Applied Predictive Technology business, a software as a service platform, we can help our customers
conduct disciplined business experiments for in-market tests.
Digital Enablement
Our innovation capabilities enable broader reach to scale digital payment services beyond cards to multiple channels, including
mobile devices:
•Delivering better digital experiences everywhere. We are using our technologies and security protocols to develop solutions to
make digital  shopping and selling experiences, such as on smartphones and other connected devices, simpler , faster and safer
for both consumers and merchants. We also offer products that make it easier for merchants to accept payments and expand
their customer base and are developing products and practices to facilitate acceptance via mobile devices. The successful
implementation of our loyalty and reward programs is an important part of enabling these digital purchasing experiences.
•Securing more transactions. We are leveraging tokenization, biometrics and machine learning technologies in our push to secure
every transaction. These ef forts include driving EMV -level security and benefits through all our payment channels.
•Digitizing personal and business payments. We provide solutions that enable our customers to offer consumers the ability to
send and receive mone y quickly and securely  domestically and around the world. These solutions allow our customers to
address new payment flows from any funding source, such as cash, card, bank account or mobile money account, to any
destination globally , securely and in real time.
•Simplifying access to, and integration of, our digital assets. Our Mastercard Developer platform makes it easy for customers and
partners to leverage our many digital assets and services. By providing a single access point with tools and capabilities to find
what we believe are some of the best-in-class Application Program Interfaces (“APIs”) across a broad range of Mastercard
services, we enable easy integration of our services into new and existing solutions.
•Identifying and experime nting with future technol ogies, start-ups and trends. Through Mastercard  Labs, our global innovation and
development arm, we continue to bring customers and partners access to thought leadership, innovation methodologies, new
technologies and relevant early-stage fintech players.
12 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Brand
Our family of well-known  brands includes Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus. We manage and prom ote our brands and brand identities
(including our sonic brand identity) through advertising, promotions and sponsorships, as well as digital, mobile and social media
initiatives, in order to increase people’ s preference for our brands and usage of our products.  We sponsor a variety of sporting,
entertainment and charity-related marketing properties to align with consumer segments important to us and our customers. Our
advertising plays an important role in building brand visibility , usage and overall preference among account holders globally .  Our
“Priceless®” advertising campaign, which has run in 52 languages in 123 countries worldwide, promotes Mastercard usage benefits
and accepta nce, marke ts Mastercard payment products and solutions and provides Mastercard with a consistent, recognizable
message that supports our brand around the globe. 
Recent Developments
Consumer
Our products  are designed to address needs of consumers with a focus on reducing complexity and delivering on experience. While
technology has increasingly changed the way people get information, interact, shop and make purchases, consumers continue to
expect a seamless experience where their payment is simple and secure. Our teams are creatin g innovative solutions that meet the
needs of consumers and merchants in a digital environment by applying emerging technologies. In 2019, we:
•delivered “click to pay”,  our activation of the EMV Secure Remote Commerce industry stand ard that enables a faster , more
secure checkout experience across web and mobile sites, mobile apps and connected devices. This checkout experience is
designed to provide consumers the same conv enience and security in a digital environment that they have when paying in a
store, make it easier for merchants to implement secure digital payments and provide issuers with improved fraud detection and
prevention capability .
•reinforced our support for contactless payments across all markets, including launching tap-and- go payments for transit systems
in multiple cities globally (including New York City, Miami, Portland and Mexico City), which  is creating the foundations for
increased adoption of this technology to deliver a faster in-person payment experience.
Commercial and B2B
Building on our corporate T&E, fleet, purchasing card and small business capabilities, we have been increasingly focused on
developing solutions to address other ways that businesses move money . In 2019, we:
•announced Mastercard Track, our B2B payment ecosystem which represents a collection of products and services aimed at
improving the way businesses pay and get paid. The Track suite of products aims to introduce Mastercard Track Business
Payment Service™, an open-loop commercial service built to simplify and automate payments between suppliers and buyers.
•extended our support for commercial cards by adding new partners to our virtual card program, with a focus on helping to make
virtual cards a preferred tool with straight-through (automated) acceptance and processing.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 13
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
New payment flows
In order to help grow our business and offer more electronic payment options to consumers, businesses and governments,
Mastercard has developed and enhanced solutions beyond the principal switching capabilities available on our core network. We
believe this will allow us to capture more payment flows, including B2B, P2P , B2C and government disbursements. In 2019, we:
•signed new agreements to bring our real-time payments infrastructure to more markets, including our relationship with P27
Nordic Paym ents Platform that will help deliver one real-time and batch payments solution across the Nordic markets. This
solution uses the same technology that powers the ability for consumers and businesses in the U.S. to send and receive
immediate payments through the Clearing House platform. We were also selected to enhance the InstaPay real-time retail
payment system in the Philippines, including operating the infrastructure for and providing anti-money laundering tools to the
national clearing switch in the Philippines.
•positioned ourselves to add to our real-time paym ents solutions, including our pending acquisition of the majority of the Corporate
Services business of Nets Denmark A/S. The pending acquisition primarily comprises the clearing and instant payment services,
and e-billing solutions of the business.
•enhanced Mastercard Bill Pay Exchange™ with the acquisition of Transactis, a platform that makes it easier for consumers to
view, manage and pay their bills either with cards or real-time and batch ACH payments from their bank accounts.
•acquired Transfast, enabling us to continue servicing the growing needs of consumers and businesses, as well as governments
and mercha nts, to send and receive money beyond borders with greater speed and ease. When combined with our proprietary
Mastercard Send™ assets, we have greatly extended our network reach.
•drove blockc hain initiatives, with an initial focus on the cross-border B2B payments space and proof of provenance solutions for
supply chains.
Services
We provide services including data analytics, consulting, loyalty , cyber and intelligence, and processing that meet evolving
requirements and the expectations of our stakeholders. W e recently:
•extended our investments in Artificial Intelligence (“AI”) by:
◦launching Mastercard ThreatScan, an AI-powered solution that helps banks proactively identify potential vulnerabilities in their
authorization systems. The service works alongside an issuer ’s existing fraud tools, imitating known criminal transaction
behavior to identify potential weaknesses and prompt action before fraud potentially occurs.
◦scaling Decision Intelligence™, our fraud scoring technology , to score billions of transactions in real time every day while
increasing approvals and reducing false declines.
•acquired Ethoca, an e-commerce fraud and dispute management network that enables the sharing of intelligence between
merchants and issuers, sending near real-time information to merchants to stop delivery when a fraudulent or disputed
transaction is identified, and refund the cardholder to avoid the chargeback process.
•acquired RiskRecon, a provider of AI and data analytics with cyber risk assessment capabilities that are designed to help
financial institutions, merchants, corporations and governments secure their digital assets.
•acquired Session M, a loyalty platform that enables stronger relationships with retailers, restaurants, airlines and consumer
packaged goods companies by creating experiences that drive loyalty and impactful consumer engagement.
•enhanced the services we are able to offer to customers based on account-to-account flows, including data insights we are
providing U.K. and U.S. customers to help them with anti-money laundering compliance and identification and prevention of other
financial crimes.
Other Initiatives
•In 2019, we continued to implement our shift to a symbol brand by dropping our name from our logo, and debuted our sonic
brand identit y, comprised  of a comprehensive sound architecture featuring a distinctive melody that will be employed in physical,
digital and voice environments where consumers engage with Mastercard across the globe.
14 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•In 2019, we contributed an additional $100 million towards initiatives that focus on inclusive growth for a total of $200 million
contributed through December 31, 2019. These contributions are part of our previously announced $500 million commitment to
support inclusive growth  efforts, such as financial inclusion, economic development, the future of work and data science for social
impact.
Revenue Sources
We generate revenue primarily from assessing our customers based on GDV on the products that carry our brands, from the fees
we charge to our customers for providing trans action processing and from other payment-related products and services. Our net
revenues are classified into five categories: domestic assessments, cross-border volume fees, transaction processing, other
revenues and rebates and incentives (contra-revenue).
See “Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Revenue” in Part II, Item 7 and Note
3, Revenue for more detail about our revenue, GDV , processed transactions and our other payment-related products and services.
Intellectual Property
We own a number of valuable trademarks that are essential to our business, including Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus, through one
or more affiliates. We also own numerous other trademarks covering various brands, programs and services offered by us to support
our paymen t programs. Trademark and service mark registrations are generally valid indefinite ly as long as they are used and/or
properly maintained. Through license agreements with our customers, we authorize the use of our trademarks on a royalty-free
basis in connection with our customers’  issuing and merchant acquiring businesses. In addition , we own a number of patents and
patent applications relating to payment solutions, transaction processing, smart cards, contactless, mobile, biometrics, AI, security
systems, blockchain and other matters, many of which are important to our business operations. Patents are of varying duration
depending on the jurisdiction and filing date.
Competition
We compete in the global payments industry against all forms of payment including:
•cash and checks
•card-based payments, including credit, charge, debit, ATM and prepaid products, as well as limited-use products such as private
label
•contactless, mobile and e-commerce payments, as well as cryptocurrency
•other electronic payments, including ACH payments and wire transfers
We face a number of competitors both within and outside of the global payments industry:
•Cash, Chec k and Legacy ACH.  Cash and checks continue to represent one of the most widely used forms of payment.
However , an even larger share of payments on a U.S. dollar volume basis are made via legacy , or “slow ,” ACH platforms.
•General Purpose Payment Networks.  We compete worldwide with payment networks such as Visa, American Express, JCB,
China Union Pay and Discover , among others. Some competitors have more market share than we do in certain jurisdictions.
Some also have different business models that may provide an advantage in pricing, regulatory compliance burdens or
otherwise. In addition, several governments are promoting, or considering promoting, local networks for domestic switching. See
“Risk Factor s” in Part I, Item 1A for a more detailed discussion of the risks related to payments system regulation and
government actions that may prevent us from competing ef fectively .
•Debit and Local Networks.  We compet e with ATM and point-of-sale debit networks in various countries. In addition, in many
countries outside of the United States, local debit brands serve as the main domestic brands, while our brands are used mostly to
enable cross-border transactions (typically repre senting a small portion of overall transaction volume). Certain jurisdictions have
also created domestic card schemes focused mostly on debit.
•Competition for Customer Business. We compete  intensely with other payments companies for customer business. Globally ,
financial institutions typically issue both Mastercard and Visa-branded payment products, and we compete with Visa for business
on the basis of individu al portfolios or progra ms. In addition, a number of our customers issue American Express and/or
Discover-branded payment cards in a manner consistent with a four-party system. We continue to face intense competitive
pressure on the prices we charge our issuers and acquirers, and we seek to enter into business  agreements with them through
which we offer incentive s and other support to issue and promote our payment products. We also compete for business from
merchants, governments and mobile providers.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 15
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
•Real-time Account-based Payment Systems. We face competition in the real-time account-based payment space from other
companies that provide  these payment solutions. In addition, real-time account-based payments face competition from other
payment methods, such as cash and checks, cards, electronic, mobile and e-commerce payment platforms, cryptocurrencies and
other payments networks.
•Alternative Payments Systems and New Entrants. As the global payment s industry becomes more complex, we face
increasing competition from alternative payment systems and emerging payment providers. Many of these providers, who in
many circumstances can also be our partners or customers, have developed payments systems focused on online activity in e-
commerce and mobile channels (in some cases, expanding to other channels), and may process payments using in-house
account transfers, real-time account-based payment networks or global or local networks. Examples include digital wallet
providers (such as Paytm, PayPal, Alipay and Amazon), mobile operator services, mobile phone-based money transfer and
microfinancing services (such as mPesa), handset manufacturers and cryptocurrencies.
•Value-Added Products  and Services.  We face competition from companies that provide alternatives to our value-added
products and services, including information services and consulting firms that provide cons ulting services and insights to
financial institutions, as well as companies that compete against us as providers of loyalty and program management solutions.
In addition, our integra ted products and services offerings face competition and potential displacement from transaction
processors throughout the world, which are seeking to enhance their networks that link issuers directly with point-of-sale devices
for payment  transaction authorization and proce ssing services. Regulatory initiatives could also lead to increased competition in
this space.
Our competitive advantages include our:
•globally recognized brands
•highly adaptable global acceptance network built over 50 years which can reach a variety of parties enabling payments
•global payments network with world-class operating performance
•expertise in real-time account-based payments
•adoption of innovative products and digital solutions
•safety and security solutions embedded in our networks
•analytics insights and consulting services dedicated solely to the payments industry
•ability to serve a broad array of participants in global payments due to our expanded on-soil presence in individual markets and a
heightened focus on working with governments
•world class talent
Government Regulation
General. Government regulation impacts key aspects of our business. We are subject to regulations that affect the payments
industry in the many countries in which our integrated products and services are used. See “Risk  Factors” in Part I, Item 1A for more
detail and examples.
Payments Oversight and Regulation.  Central banks and other regulators in several jurisdictions around the world either have, or
are seeking to establish,  formal oversight over the payments industry , as well as authority to regulate certain aspects of the payment
systems in their countries. In addition to oversight and regulation from established regulatory bodies, several jurisdictions have
created or granted authority to create new regulatory bodies that either have or would have  the authority to regulate payment
systems, including the United Kingdom’ s PSR (Vocalink and Mastercard are both participants in the payments system and are
therefore subject to the PSR’ s duties and powers), the National Bank of Belgium, India (which has also designated us as a payments
system subject to regulation), and regulators in Brazil, Hong Kong, Mexico and Russia. Such authority has resulted in regulation of
various aspects of our business. In the Europea n Union, legislation requires us to separate our scheme activities (brand, products,
franchise and licensing) from our switching activities and other processing in terms of how we go to market, make decisions and
organize our structure. Mastercard also could be subject to new regulation, supervisions and examination requirements. For
example, in the U.K., the Bank of England has expanded its oversight of systemically important payment systems to include service
providers.
Interchange Fees.  Interchange fees associated with four-party payments systems like ours are being reviewed or challenged in
various jurisdictions around the world via legislation to regulate interchange fees, competition-rel ated regulatory proceedings, central
bank regulation and litigation. Examples include statutes in the United States that cap debit interchange for certain regulated
activities, our settlement with the European Commission resolving its investigation into our interregional interchange fees and the
European Union legislation capping consumer credit and debit interchange fees on payments issued and acquired within the
European Economic Area (the “EEA”). For more detail, see “Risk Factors - Other Regulation” in Part I, Item 1A and Note 21 (Legal
and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
16 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
Preferential or Protective Government Actions. Some gove rnments have taken action to provide resources, preferential
treatment or other protection to selected dome stic payments and processing providers, as well as to create their own national
providers. For example, governments in some countries mandate switching of domestic payment s either entirely in that country or by
only domest ic companies. In China, we are currently excluded from domestic switching and are seeking market access, which is
uncertain and subject to a number of factors, including receiving regulatory approval.  We are in active discussions to explore
different solutions.
Anti-Money Laundering , Counter Terrorist Financing, Economic Sanctions and Anti-Corruption. We are subject to anti-money
laundering (“AML”) and counter financing of terrorism (“CFT”) laws and regulations globally , including the U.S. Bank Secrecy Act and
the USA PATRIOT  Act, as well as the various economic sanctions programs, including those imposed and administered by the U.S.
Office of Foreign Asset s Control (“OFAC”). We have implemented a comprehensive AML/CFT  program, comprised of policies,
procedures and internal controls, including the designation of a compliance officer, which is designed to prevent our payment
network from being used to facilitate money laundering and other illicit activity and to address these legal and regulatory
requirements and assist in managing money laundering and terrorist financing risks. The econom ic sanctions programs administered
by OFAC restrict financial transactions and other dealings with certain countries and geographies (specifically Crimea, Cuba, Iran,
North Korea  and Syria) and with persons and entities included in OFAC sanctions lists includ ing its list of Specially Designated
Nationals and Blocked Persons (the “SDN List”). We take measures to prevent transactions that do not comply with OFAC and other
applicable sanctions, including establishing a risk-based compliance program that has policies, procedures and controls designed to
prevent us from having unlawful business dealings with prohibited countries, regions, individuals or entities. As part of this program,
we obligate issuers and acquirers to comply with their local sanctions obligations and the U.S. sanctions programs, including
requiring the screening of account holders and merchants, respectively , against OFAC sanctions lists (including the SDN List). Iran,
Sudan and Syria have been identified by the U.S. State Department as terrorist-sponsoring states, and we have no offices,
subsidiaries or affiliated entities located in any of these countries or geographies and do not license entities domiciled there. We are
also subject to anti-corru ption laws and regulations globally , including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt  Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery
Act, which, among other things, generally prohibit giving or offering payments or anything of value for the purpose of improperly
influencing a business decision or to gain an unfair business advantage. We have implemented policies, procedures and internal
controls to proactively manage corruption risk.
Financial Sector Overs ight.  We are or may be subject to regulations related  to our role in the financial industry and our relationship
with our financial institution customers. In addition, we are or may be subject to regulation by a number of agencies charged with
oversight of, among other things, consumer protection, financial and banking matters. The regulators have supervisory and
independent examination  authority as well as enforcement authority that we may be subject to because of the services we provide to
financial institutions that issue and acquire our products.
Issuer Prac tice Legisla tion and Regulation. Our customers are subje ct to numerous regulati ons and investigations applicable to
banks and other financia l institutions in their capacity as issuers and otherwise, impacting us as a consequence. Such regulations
and investigations have been related to payment card add-on products, campus cards, bank overdraft practices, fees issuers charge
to account holders and the transparency of terms and conditions. Additionally , regulations such as the revised Payment Services
Directive (commonly referred to as “PSD2”) in the EEA require financial institutions to provide third-party payment-processors access
to consumer payment accounts, enabling them to route transactions away from Mastercard products and provide payment initiation
and account information services directly to consumers who use our products. PSD2 also requires a new standard for authentication
of transactions, which necessitates additional verification information from consumers to comple te transactions. This may increase
the number of transactio ns that consumers abandon if we are unable to ensure a frictionless authentication experience under the
new standards.
Regulation of Internet and Digital Transactions.  Various jurisdictions have enacted or have proposed regulation related to internet
transactions. The legislation applies to payments system participants, including us and our U.S. customers, and is implemented
through a federal regula tion. We may also be impacted by evolving laws surrounding gamblin g, including fantasy sports. Certain
jurisdictions are also considering regulatory initiatives in digital-related areas that could impact us, such as cyber-security and
copyright and trademark infringement.
Privacy , Data and Information Security . Aspects of our operation s or business are subject to increasingly complex privacy and
data protect ion laws in the United States, the European Union and elsewhere around the world. For example, in the United States,
we and our customers are respectively subject to Federal Trade Commission and federal banking agency information safeguarding
requirements under the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act that require the maintenance of a written, comprehensive information security
program. In the European Union, we are subject to the General Data Protection Regulation (the “GDPR”), which requires a
comprehensive privacy and data protection program to protect the personal and sensitive data of EEA residents. A number of
regulators and policymakers around the globe are using the GDPR as a reference to adopt  new or updated privacy and data
protection laws, including in the U.S. (California ), Argentina, Brazil, Chile, India, Indonesia and Kenya. Some jurisdictions, such as
India, are currently considering adopting or have  adopted “data localization” requirements, which mandate the collection, processing,
and/or storage of data within their borders. Due to constant changes to the nature of data and the use of emerging technologies
such as artificial intellige nce, regulations in this area are constantly evolving with regulatory and legislative authorities in numerous
parts of the world adopting proposals to protect information. In addition,
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 17
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
the interpretation and application of these privacy and data protection laws are often uncertain and in a state of flux, thus requiring
constant monitoring for compliance.
Additional Regulatory Developments. Various regulatory agencies also continue to examine a wide variety of issues that could
impact us, including evolving laws surrounding marijuana, prepaid payroll cards, virtual currencies, identity theft, account
management guidelines, disclosure rules, security and marketing that would impact our customers directly .
Employees
As of December 31, 2019 , we employed approximately 18,600 persons, of whom approximately 11,400 were employed outside of
the United States.
Additional Information
Mastercard Incorporated was incorporated as a Delaware corporation in May 2001. We conduct our business principally through our
principal operating subs idiary , Mastercard International Incorporated, a Delaware non-stock (or membership) corporation that was
formed in November 1966. For more information about our capital structure, including our Class A common stock (our voting stock)
and Class B common stock (our non-voting stock), see Note 16 (Stockholders' Equity)  to the cons olidated financial statements
included in Part II, Item 8.
Website and SEC Reports
Our internet address is www .mastercard.com. From time to time, we may use our corporate website as a channel of distribution of
material company information. Financial and other material information is routinely posted and accessible on the investor relations
section of our corporate website. You can also visit “Investor Alerts” in the investor relations section to enroll your email address to
automatically receive email alerts and other information about Mastercard.
Our annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly repor ts on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and amendments to those reports are
available for review , without charge, on the investor relations section of our corporate website  as soon as reasonably practicable
after they are filed with, or furnished to, the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (the “SEC”). The information contained on
our corporat e website is not incorporated by reference into this Report. Our filings are also available electronically from the SEC at
www .sec.gov .
Item 1A. Risk factors
RISK HIGHLIGHTS
 Legal and Regulatory   Business and Operations
 Payments Industry Regulation   Competition and Technology
 Preferential or Protective Government Actions   Information Security and Service Disruptions
 Privacy , Data and Security   Stakeholder Relationships
 Other Regulation   Settlement and Third-Party Obligations
18 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Legal and Regulatory
Payments Industry Regulation
Global regulatory and legislative activity directly related to the payments industry may have a material adverse impact on
our overall business and results of operations.
Regulators increasingly seek to regulate certain aspects of payments systems such as ours, or establish or expand their authority to
do so. Many jurisdiction s have enacted such regulations, establishing, and potentially further expanding, obligations or restrictions
with respect  to the types of products and services that we may offer to financial institutions for consumers, the countries in which our
integrated products and services may be used,  the way we structure and operate our business and the types of consumers and
merchants who can obtain or accept our products or services. New regulations and oversight could also relate to our clearing and
settlement activities (including risk management policies and procedures, collateral requireme nts, participant default policies and
procedures, the ability to complete timely switching of financial transactions, and capital and financial resource requirements).
Several jurisdictions have also inquired about the network fees we charge to our customers (typically as part of broader market
reviews of retail payments). In addition, several central banks or similar regulatory bodies aroun d the world have increased, or are
seeking to increase, their formal oversight of the electronic payments industry and, in some cases, are considering designating
certain payments networks as “systemically important payment systems” or “critical infrastructu re.” These obligations, designations
and restrictions may further expand and could conflict with each other as more jurisdictions impose oversight of payment systems.
Moreover , as regulators around the world increasingly look to replicate similar regulation of paym ents and other industries, efforts in
any one jurisdiction may influence approaches in other jurisdictions. Similarly , new initiatives within a jurisdiction involving one
product may lead to regulation of similar or related products (for example, debit regulations  could lead to regulation of credit
products). As a result, the risks to our business created by any one new law or regulation are magnified by the potential it has to be
replicated in other jurisdictions or involve other products within any particular jurisdiction.
Increased regulation and oversight of payment systems may result in costly compliance burdens or otherwise increase our costs.
Such laws or complianc e burdens could result in issuers and acquirers being less willing to participate in our payments system,
reduce the benefits offered in connection with the use of our products (making our products less desirable to consumers), reduce the
volume of domestic and cross-border transactions or other operational metrics, disintermediate us, impact our profitability and limit
our ability to innovate or offer differentiated products and services, all of which could materially  and adversely impact our financial
performance. In addition, any regulation that is enacted related to the type and level of network fees we charge our customers could
also materially and adve rsely impact our results of operations. Regulators could also require us to obtain prior approval for changes
to its system  rules, procedures or operations, or could require customization with regard to such changes, which could impact
market participant risk and therefore risk to us. Such regulatory changes could lead to new or different criteria for participation in and
access to our payments system by financial institutions or other customers. Moreover , failure to comply with the laws and regulations
to which we are subject could result in fines, sanctions, civil damages or other penalties, which could materially and adversely affect
our overall business and results of operations, as well as have an impact on our brand and reputation.
Increased regulatory , legislative and litigation activity with respect to interchange rates could have an adverse impact on
our business.
Interchange rates are a significant component of the costs that merchants pay in connection with the acceptance of our products.
Although we do not earn revenues from interc hange, interchange rates can impact the volume of transactions we see on our
payment products. If interchange rates are too high, merchants may stop accepting our products or route transactions away from our
network. If interchange rates are too low, issue rs may stop promoting our integrated products and services, eliminate or reduce
loyalty rewa rds programs or other account holder benefits (e.g., free checking or low interest rates on balances), or charge fees to
account holders (e.g., annual fees or late payment fees).
Governments and merchant groups in a number  of countries have implemented or are seeking interchange rate reductions through
legislation, competition law, central bank regulation and litigation. See “Business - Government Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 and Note
21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for more details.
If issuers cannot collect  or we are forced to reduce interchange rates, issuers may be less willing to participate in our four-party
payments system, or may reduce the benefits offered in connection with the use of our products, reducing the attractiveness of our
products to consumers.  In particular , changes to interregional interchange fees as a result of the resolution of the European
Commission’ s investigation could impact our cross-border transaction activity disproportionately versus competitors that are not
subject to similar reduc tions. These and other impacts could lower transaction volumes, and/or make proprietary three-party
networks or other forms  of payment more attractive. Issuers could reduce the benefits associa ted with our products or choose to
charge higher fees to consumers to attempt to recoup a portion of the costs incurred for their services. In addition, issuers could
seek to decrease the expense of their payment programs by seeking a reduction in the fees that we charge to them, particularly if
regulation has a disproportionate impact
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 19
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
on us as compared to our competitors in terms of the fees we can charge. This could make our products less desirable to
consumers, reduce the volume of transactions and our profitability , and limit our ability to innovate or of fer dif ferentiated products.
We are devoting substan tial resources to defending our right to establish interchange rates in regulatory proceedings, litigation and
legislative activity . The potential outcome of any of these activities could have a more positive or negative impact on us relative to
our competi tors. If we are ultimately unsuccessful in defending our ability to establish interchange rates, any resulting legislation,
regulation and/or litigation may have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations. In addition,
regulatory proceedings and litigation could result (and in some cases has resulted) in us being fined and/or having to pay civil
damages, the amount of which could be material.
Limitations on our ability to restrict merchant surcharging could materially and adversely impact our results of operations.
We have historically implemented policies, referred to as no-surcharge rules, in certain jurisdictions, including the United States, that
prohibit merchants from charging higher prices to consumers who pay using our products instead of other means. Authorities in
several jurisdictions have acted to end or limit the application of these no-surcharge rules (or indicated interest in doing so).
Additionally , we have modified our no-surcharge rules to permit U.S. merchants to surchar ge credit cards, subject to certain
limitations. It is possible that over time merchants in some or all merchant categories in these jurisdictions may choose to surcharge
as permitted by the rule change. This could result in consumers viewing our products less favor ably and/or using alternative means
of payment instead of electronic products, which could result in a decrease in our overall transaction volumes, and which in turn
could materially and adversely impact our results of operations.
Preferential or Protective Government Actions
Preferential and protective government actions related to domestic payment services could adversely affect our ability to
maintain or increase our revenues.
Governments in some countries have acted, or in the future may act, to provide resources, preferential treatment or other protection
to selected national paym ent and switching providers, or have created, or may in the future create, their own national provider . This
action may displace us from, prevent us from entering into, or substantially restrict us from participating in, particular geographies,
and may prevent us from competing ef fectively against those providers. For example:
•Governments in some countries are considering, or may consider , regulatory requirements that mandate switching of domestic
payments either entirely in that country or by only domestic companies.
•Some jurisdictions are considering requirements to collect, process and/or store data within their borders, as well as prohibitions
on the transfer of data abroad, leading to technological and operational implications.
•Geopolitical events and resulting OFAC sanctions, adverse trade policies or other types of government actions could lead
jurisdictions af fected by those sanctions to take actions in response that could adversely af fect our business.
•Regional groups of countries are considering, or may consider , efforts to restrict our participa tion in the switching of regional
transactions.
Such developments prevent us from utilizing our global switching capabilities for domestic or regional customers. Our efforts to effect
change in, or work with, these countries may not succeed. This could adversely affect our ability to maintain or increase our
revenues and extend our global brand.
Additionally , some jurisdictions have implement ed, or may implement, foreign ownership restrictions, which could potentially have
the effect of forcing or inducing the transfer of our technology and proprietary information as a condition of access to their markets.
Such restrictions could adversely impact our ability to compete in these markets.
Privacy , Data and Security
Regulation of privacy , data, security and the digital economy could increase our costs, as well as negatively impact our
growth.
We are subject to increasingly complex regulations related to privacy , data and information security in the jurisdictions in which we
do business . These regulations could result in negative impacts to our business. As we continue to develop integrated and
personalized products and services to meet the needs of a changing marketplace, as well as acquire new companies, we may
expand our information profile through the collection of additional data from additional sources and across multiple channels. This
expansion could amplify the impact of these regulations on our business. Regulation of privacy and data and information security
often times require monitoring of and changes to our data practices in regard to the collection , use, disclosure, storage, transfer
and/or secur ity of personal and sensitive informa tion. We are also subject to enhanced complian ce and operational requirements in
the European Union, and policymakers around the globe are using these requirements as a reference to adopt new or updated
privacy laws that could result in similar or stricter requirements in other jurisdictions. Some  jurisdictions are also considering
requirements to collect, process and/or store data within
20 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
their borders , as well as prohibitions on the transfer of data abroad, leading to technological and operational implications. Other
jurisdictions are considering adopting sector-specific regulations for the payments industry , including forced data sharing
requirements or additional verification requirements that overlap or conflict with, or diverge from, general privacy rules. Failure to
comply with these laws,  regulations and requirements could result in fines, sanctions or other penalties, which could materially and
adversely af fect our results of operations and overall business, as well as have an impact on our reputation.
New requirements or interpretations of existing requirements in these areas, or the development  of new regulatory schemes related
to the digital economy in general, may also increase our costs and could impact the produc ts and services we offer and other
aspects of our business, such as fraud monitoring, the development of information-based products and solutions and technology
operations. In addition, these requirements may increase the costs to our customers of issuin g payment products, which may, in
turn, decrea se the number of our payment produ cts that they issue. Moreover , due to account data compromise events and privacy
abuses by other compan ies, as well as the disclosure of monitoring activities by certain governmental agencies in combination with
the use of artificial intelligence and new technologies, there has been heightened legislative and regulatory scrutiny around the world
that could lead to further regulation and requirements and/or future enforcement. Those developments have also raised public
attention on companies’  data practices and have changed consumer and societal expectations for enhanced privacy and data
protection. Any of these developments could materially and adversely af fect our overall business and results of operations.
In addition, fraudulent activity could encourage regulatory intervention, which could damage our reputation and reduce the use and
acceptance of our integrated products and services or increase our compliance costs. Criminals are using increasingly sophisticated
methods to capture cons umer account information to engage in illegal activities such as counterf eiting or other fraud. As outsourcing
and specialization become common in the paym ents industry , there are more third parties involv ed in processing transactions using
our payment products. While we are taking measures to make card and digital payments more secure, increased fraud levels
involving our integrated products and services, or misconduct or negligence by third parties switching or otherwise servicing our
integrated products and services, could lead to regulatory intervention, such as enhanced security requirements, as well as damage
to our reputation.
Other Regulation
Regulations that directly or indirectly apply to Mastercard as a result of our participation  in the global payments industry
may materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
We are subject to regulations that affect the payments industry in the many jurisdictions in which our integrated products and
services are used. Many of our customers are also subject to regulations applicable to banks and other financial institutions that, at
times, consequently affect us. Regulation of the payments industry , including regulations applicable to us and our customers, has
increased significantly in the last several years. See “Business - Government Regulation” in Part I, Item 1 for a detailed description
of such regulation and related legislation. Examples include:
•Anti-Money Laundering , Counter Terrorist Financing, Economic Sanctions and Anti-Corruption  - We are subject to AML
and CFT laws and regulations globally , including the U.S. Bank Secrecy Act and the USA PATRIOT  Act, as well as the various
economic sanctions programs, including those imposed and administered by OFAC. The economic sanctions programs
administered by OFAC restrict financial transa ctions and other dealings with certain countries and geographies (specifically
Crimea, Cuba, Iran, North Korea and Syria) and with persons and entities included in OFAC sanctions lists including the SDN
List. Iran, Sudan and Syria have been identified by the U.S. State Department as terrorist-sponsoring states. We are also subject
to anti-corru ption laws and regulations globally , including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery Act, which,
among other  things, generally prohibit giving or offering payments or anything of value for the purpose of improperly influencing a
business decision or to gain an unfair business advantage. A violation and subsequent judgment or settlement against us, or
those with whom we may be associated, under these laws could subject us to substantial monetary penalties, damages, and/or
have a significant reputational impact.
•Account-based Payme nt Systems  - In the U.K., Her Majesty’ s Treasury has expanded the Bank of England’ s oversight of
certain paym ent system providers that are systemically important to U.K.’ s payment network. As a result of these changes,
aspects of our Vocalink business are now subject to the U.K. payment system oversight regime and are directly overseen by the
Bank of England.
•Issuer Practice Legislation and Regulation  - Our financial institution customers are subjec t to numerous regulations, which
impact us as a consequence. In addition, certain  regulations (such as PSD2 in the EEA) may disintermediate issuers. PSD2 may
enable third- party paym ent processors to route transactions away from Mastercard products by offering account information or
payment initiation services directly to those who currently use our products. This may also allow these processors to commoditize
the data that are include d in the transactions. If our customers are disintermediated in their business, we could face diminished
demand for our integrated products and services. Other regulations, such as PSD2’ s strong authentication requirement, could
increase the number of transactions that consumers abandon if we are unable to secure a frictio nless authentication experience
under the new standards. An increase in the rate of abandoned transactions could adversely impact our volumes or other
operational metrics.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 21
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Increased regulatory focus on us, such as in connection with the matters discussed above, may result in costly compliance burdens
and/or may otherwise increase our costs. Similarly , increased regulatory focus on our custom ers may cause such customers to
reduce the volume of transactions processed through our systems, or may otherwise impact the competitiveness of our products.
Actions by regulators could influence other organizations around the world to enact or consider adopting similar measures,
amplifying any potential compliance burden. Finally, failure to comply with the laws and regulations discussed above to which we are
subject could result in fines, sanctions or other penalties. Each may individually or collectively materially and adversely affect our
financial performance and/or our overall business and results of operations, as well as have an impact on our reputation.
We could be subject to adverse changes in tax laws, regulations and interpretations or challenges to our tax positions.
We are subject to tax laws and regulations of the U.S. federal, state and local governments as well as various non-U.S. jurisdictions.
Potential changes in existing tax laws, including future regulatory guidance, may impact our effective income tax rate and tax
payments. There can be no assurance that changes in tax laws or regulations, both within the U.S. and the other jurisdictions in
which we operate, will not materially and advers ely affect our effective income tax rate, tax payments, financial condition and results
of operations. Similarly , changes in tax laws and regulations that impact our customers and counterparties or the economy generally
may also impact our financial condition and results of operations.
In addition, tax laws and regulations are comple x and subject to varying interpretations, and any significant failure to comply with
applicable tax laws and regulations in all relevan t jurisdictions could give rise to substantial penalties and liabilities. Any changes in
enacted tax laws, rules or regulatory or judicial interpretations; any adverse outcome in connectio n with tax audits in any jurisdiction;
or any change in the pronouncements relating to accounting for income taxes could materially  and adversely impact our effective
income tax rate, tax payments, financial condition and results of operations.
Litigation
Liabilities we may incur or limitations on our business related to any litigation or litigation settlements could materially and
adversely affect our results of operations.
We are a defendant on a number of civil litigations and regulatory proceedings and investigati ons, including among others, those
alleging violations of competition and antitrust law and those involving intellectual property  claims. See Note 21 (Legal and
Regulatory Proceedings)  to the conso lidated finan cial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for more details regarding the allegations
contained in these complaints and the status of these proceedings. In the event we are found liable in any material litigations or
proceedings, particularly  in the event we may be found liable in a large class-action lawsuit or on the basis of an antitrust claim
entitling the plaintif f to treble damages or under which we were jointly and severally liable, we could be subject to significant
damages, which could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Certain limitations have been placed on our business in recent years because of litigation and litigation settlements, such as
changes to our no-surch arge rule in the United States. Any future limitations on our business resulting from litigation or litigation
settlements could impact our relationships with our customers, including reducing the volume of business that we do with them,
which may materially and adversely af fect our overall business and results of operations.
Business and Operations
Competition and T echnology
Substantial and intense competition worldwide in the global payments industry may materially and adversely affect our
overall business and results of operations.
The global payments industry is highly competi tive. Our payment programs compete against all forms of payment, including cash
and checks; electronic, mobile and e-commerce payment platforms; cryptocurrencies; ACH payment services; and other payments
networks, which can have several competitive impacts on our business:
•Some of our traditional competitors, as well as alternative payment service providers, may have substantially greater financial
and other resources than we have, may offer a wider range of programs and services than we offer or may use more effective
advertising and marketing strategies to achieve broader brand recognition or merchant acceptance than we have.
•Our ability to compete may also be affected by the outcomes of litigation, competition-related regulatory proceedings, central
bank activity and legislative activity .
Certain of our competitors operate three-party payments systems with direct connections to both merchants and consumers and
these compe titors may derive competitive advan tages from their business models. If we continu e to attract more regulatory scrutiny
than
22 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
these compe titors becau se we operate a four-party system, or we are regulated because of the system we operate in a way in which
our competitors are not, we could lose business to these competitors. See “Business - Competition” in Part I, Item 1.
If we are not able to differentiate ourselves from our competitors, drive value for our customers and/or effectively align our resources
with our goals and objectives, we may not be able to compete effectively against these threats. Our competitors may also more
effectively introduce their own innovative progra ms and services that adversely impact our growth. We also compete against new
entrants that have deve loped alternative payments systems, e-commerce payments systems and payments systems for mobile
devices, as well as phys ical store locations. A number of these new entrants rely principally on the Internet to support their services
and may enjoy lower costs than we do, which could put us at a competitive disadvantage. Our failure to compete effectively against
any of the foregoing competitive threats could materially and adversely af fect our overall business and results of operations.
Disintermediation from stakeholders both within and outside of the payments value chain could harm our business.
As the payments industry continues to develop and change, we face disintermediation and related risks, including:
•Parties that process our transactions in certain countries may try to eliminate our position as an intermediary in the payment
process. For example, merchants could switch (and in some cases are switching) transactions directly with issuers. Additionally ,
processors could process transactions directly between issuers and acquirers. Large scale consolidation within processors could
result in these processo rs developing bilateral agreements or in some cases switching the entire transaction on their own
network, thereby disintermediating us.
•Regulation in the EEA may disintermediate us by enabling third-party providers opportunities to route payment transactions away
from our networks and towards other forms of payment.
•Although we partner with technology companies (such as digital players and mobile providers) that leverage our technology ,
platforms and networks to deliver their products , they could develop platforms or networks that disintermediate us from digital
payments and impact our ability to compete in the digital economy . This risk is heightened when we have relationships with these
entities where we share  Mastercard data. While we share this data in a controlled manner subject to applicable anonymization
and privacy and data standards, without proper oversight we could inadvertently share too much data which could give the
partner a competitive advantage.
•Competitors, customers , technology companies, governments and other industry participan ts may develop products that
compete with or replace value-added products and services we currently provide to support our switched transaction and
payment offerings. These products could replace our own switching and payments offerings or could force us to change our
pricing or practices for these offerings. In addition, governments that develop national payment platforms may promote their
platforms in such a way that could put us at a competitive disadvantage in those markets.
•Participants in the paym ents industry may merge , create joint ventures or form other business combinations that may strengthen
their existing business services or create new payment products and services that compete with our services.
Our failure to compete effectively against any of the foregoing competitive threats could materially and adversely affect our overall
business and results of operations.
Continued intense pricing pressure may materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
In order to increase transaction volumes, enter new markets and expand our Mastercard-branded cards and enabled products and
services, we seek to enter into business agreem ents with customers through which we offer incentives, pricing discounts and other
support that promote our products. In order to stay competitive, we may have to increase the amount of these incentives and pricing
discounts. Over the past several years, we have experienced continued pricing pressure. The demand from our customers for better
pricing arran gements and greater rebates and incentives moderates our growth. We may not be able to continue our expansion
strategy to switch additio nal transaction volumes or to provide additional services to our custome rs at levels sufficient to compensate
for such lower fees or increased costs in the future, which could materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of
operations. In addition, increased pressure on prices increases the importance of cost containment and productivity initiatives in
areas other than those relating to customer incentives.
In the future, we may not be able to enter into agreements with our customers if they require terms that we are unable or unwilling to
offer, and we may be required to modify existing agreements in order to maintain relationships and to compete with others in the
industry . Some of our competitors are larger and have greater financial resources than we do and accordingly may be able to charge
lower prices  to our customers. In addition, to the extent that we offer discounts or incentives under such agreements, we will need to
further increase transaction volumes or the amount of services provided thereunder in order to benefit incrementally from such
agreements and to increase revenue and profit, and we may not be successful in doing so, particularly in the current regulatory
environment. Our customers also may implement cost reduction initiatives that reduce or eliminate payment product marketing or
increase requests for greater incentives or great er cost stability . These factors could have a material adverse impact on our overall
business and results of operations.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 23
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Rapid and significant technological developm ents and changes could negatively impact our overall business and results
of operations or limit our future growth.
The payments industry is subject to rapid and significant technological changes, which can impact our business in several ways:
•Technological changes, including continuing developments of technologies in the areas of smar t cards and devices, contactless
and mobile payments, e-commerce, cryptocurrency and block chain technology , machine learning and AI, could result in new
technologies that may be superior to, or rende r obsolete, the technologies we currently use in our programs and services.
Moreover , these change s could result in new and innovative payment methods and products that could place us at a competitive
disadvantage and that could reduce the use of our products.
•We rely in part on third parties, including some of our competitors and potential competitors, for the development of and access
to new technologies. The inability of these companies to keep pace with technological developm ents, or the acquisition of these
companies by competitors, could negatively impact our of ferings.
•Our ability to develop and adopt new services and technologies may be inhibited by industry-wid e solutions and standards (such
as those related to EMV, tokenization or other safety and security technologies), and by resistan ce from customers or merchants
to such changes.
•Our ability to develop evolving systems and products may be inhibited by any difficulty we may experience in attracting and
retaining technology experts.
•Our ability to adopt these technologies can also be inhibited by intellectual property rights of third parties. We have received, and
we may in the future receive, notices or inquiries from patent holders (for example, other operating companies or non-practicing
entities) suggesting that we may be infringing certain patents or that we need to license the use of their patents to avoid
infringement. Such notices may, among other things, threaten litigation against us or our custome rs or demand significant license
fees.
•Our ability to develop new technologies and reflect technological changes in our payments offerings will require resources, which
may result in additional expenses.
•We work with technology  companies (such as digital players and mobile providers) that use our technology to enhance payment
safety and security and to deliver their payment -related products and services quickly and efficiently to consumers. Our inability
to keep pace technologi cally could negatively impact the willingness of these customers to work with us, and could encourage
them to use their own technology and compete against us.
We cannot predict the effect of technological changes on our business, and our future success will depend, in part, on our ability to
anticipate, develop or adapt to technological changes and evolving industry standards. Failure to keep pace with these technological
developments or otherwise bring to market products that reflect these technologies could lead to a decline in the use of our products,
which could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Operating a real-time account-based payment network presents risks that could materially affect our business.
Our acquisition of Vocalink in 2017 added real-time account-based payment technology to the suite of capabilities we offer. While
expansion into this space presents business opportunities, there are also regulatory and operational risks associated with
administering a real-time account-based payment network.
British regulators have designated this platform to be “critical national infrastructure” and regulators in other countries may in the
future expand their regulatory oversight of real-time account-based payment systems in similar ways. In addition, any prolonged
service outage on this network could result in quickly escalating impacts, including potential intervention by the Bank of England and
significant reputational risk to Vocalink and us. For a discussion of the regulatory risks related to our real-time account-based
payment platform, see our risk factor in “Risk Factors - Payments Industry Regulation” in this Part I, Item 1A. Furthermore, the
complexity of this payment technology requires careful management to address security vulnerabilities that are different from those
faced on our core network. Operational difficulties, such as the temporary unavailability of our services or products, or security
breaches on our real-time account-based payment network could cause a loss of business for these products and services, result in
potential liability for us and adversely af fect our reputation.
Working with new customers and end users  as we expand our integrated products and services can present operational
challenges, be costly and result in reputational damage if the new products or services do not perform as intended.
The payments markets in which we compete are characterized by rapid technological change, new product introductions, evolving
industry standards and changing customer and consumer needs. In order to remain competitive and meet the needs of the
payments market, we are continually involved in diversifying our integrated products and services. These efforts carry the risks
associated with any diversification initiative, including cost overruns, delays in delivery and performance problems. These projects
also carry risks associated with working with different types of customers, for example organizations such as corporations that are
not financial
24 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
institutions and non-governmental organizations (“NGOs”), and end users other than those we have traditionally worked with. These
differences may present new operational challenges in the development and implementation of our new products or services.
Our failure to render these integrated products and services could make our other integrated products and services less desirable to
customers, or put us at a competitive disadvantage. In addition, if there is a delay in the implem entation of our products or services
or if our products or services do not perform as anticipated, we could face additional regulatory scrutiny , fines, sanctions or other
penalties, which could materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operatio ns, as well as negatively impact our
brand and reputation.
Information Security and Service Disruptions
Information security incidents or account data compromise events could disrupt our business, damage our reputation,
increase our costs and cause losses.
Information security risks for payments and technology companies such as ours have significantly increased in recent years in part
because of the proliferation of new technologies , the use of the Internet and telecommunication s technologies to conduct financial
transactions, and the increased sophistication and activities of organized crime, hackers, terrorists and other external parties. These
threats may derive from fraud or malice on the part of our employees or third parties, or may result from human error or accidental
technological failure. These threats include cybe r-attacks such as computer viruses, malicious code, phishing attacks or information
security breaches and could lead to the misappropriation of consumer account and other information and identity theft.
Our operations rely on the secure processing, transmission and storage of confidential, proprietary and other information and
technology in our computer systems and networks, as well as the systems of our third-party providers. Our customers and other
parties in the payments value chain, as well as account holders, rely on our digital technologie s, computer systems, software and
networks to conduct their operations. In addition, to access our integrated products and services,  our customers and account holders
increasingly use personal smartphones, tablet PCs and other mobile devices that may be beyond  our control. We, like other financial
technology organizations, routinely are subject to cyber-threats and our technologies, systems and networks, as well as the systems
of our third-party provide rs, have been subject to attempted cyber-attacks. Because of our position in the payments value chain, we
believe that we are likely to continue to be a target of such threats and attacks. Additionally , geopolitical events and resulting
government activity could also lead to information security threats and attacks by af fected jurisdictions and their sympathizers.
To date, we have not experienced any material  impact relating to cyber-attacks or other information security breaches. However ,
future attacks or breach es could lead to security breaches of the networks, systems (including third-party provider systems) or
devices that our customers use to access our integrated products and services, which in turn could result in the unauthorized
disclosure, release, gathering, monitoring, misuse, loss or destruction of confidential, proprietary and other information (including
account data informatio n) or data security compromises. Such attacks or breaches could also cause service interruptions,
malfunctions or other failures in the physical infrastructure or operations systems that support our businesses and customers (such
as the lack of availability of our value-added services), as well as the operations of our customer s or other third parties.  In addition,
they could lead to damage to our reputation with our customers and other parties and the market, additional costs to us (such as
repairing systems, adding new personnel or protection technologies or compliance costs), regulatory penalties, financial losses to
both us and our customers and partners and the loss of customers and business opportunitie s. If such attacks are not detected
immediately , their ef fect could be compounded.
Despite various mitigation efforts that we undertake, there can be no assurance that we will be immune to these risks and not suffer
material breaches and resulting losses in the future, or that our insurance coverage would be sufficient to cover all losses. Our risk
and exposure to these matters remain heightened because of, among other things, the evolving nature of these threats, our
prominent size and scale and our role in the global payments and technology industries, our plans to continue to implement our
digital and mobile channel strategies and develop additional remote connectivity solutions to serve our customers and account
holders when and how they want to be served, our global presence, our extensive use of third-party vendors and future joint venture
and merger and acquisition opportunities. As a result, information security and the continued development and enhancement of our
controls, processes and practices designed to protect our systems, computers, software, data and networks from attack, damage or
unauthorized access remain a priority for us. As cyber-threats continue to evolve, we may be required to expend significant
additional resources to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures or to investig ate and remediate any information
security vulnerabilities. Any of the risks described above could materially adversely affect our overall business and results of
operations.
In addition to information security risks for our systems, we also routinely encounter account data compromise events involving
merchants and third-party payment processors that process, store or transmit payment transaction data, which affect millions of
Mastercard, Visa, Discover , American Express and other types of account holders. Further events of this type may subject us to
reputational damage and/or lawsuits involving payment products carrying our brands. Damage to our reputation or that of our brands
resulting from an account data breach of either our systems or the systems of our customers, merchants and other third parties
could decrease the use and acceptance of our integrated products and services. Such events could also slow or reverse the trend
toward
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 25
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
electronic payments. In addition to reputational concerns, the cumulative impact of multiple account data compromise events could
increase the impact of the fraud resulting from such events by, among other things, making it more difficult to identify consumers.
Moreover , while most of the lawsuits resulting from account data breaches do not involve direct claims against us and while we have
releases from many issuers and acquirers, we could still face damage claims, which, if upheld, could materially and adversely affect
our results of operations. Such events could have a material adverse impact on our transaction  volumes, results of operations and
prospects for future growth, or increase our costs by leading to additional regulatory burdens being imposed on us.
Service disruptions that cause us to be unable to process transactions or service our customers could materially affect our
overall business and results of operations.
Our transaction switching systems and other offerings have experienced in limited instances and may continue to experience
interruptions as a result of technology malfunctions, fire, weather events, power outages, telecom munications disruptions, terrorism,
workplace violence, accidents or other catastrophic events. Our visibility in the global payments industry may also put us at greater
risk of attack by terrorists, activists, or hackers who intend to disrupt our facilities and/or systems. Additionally , we rely on third-party
service providers for the timely transmission of information across our global data network. Inadequate infrastructure in lesser-
developed markets could also result in service disruptions, which could impact our ability to do business in those markets. If one of
our service providers fails to provide the commu nications capacity or services we require, as a result of natural disaster , operational
disruptions, terrorism, hacking or any other reason, the failure could interrupt our services. Although we maintain a business
continuity program to analyze risk, assess poten tial impacts, and develop effective response strategies, we cannot ensure that our
business would be immune to these risks, because of the intrinsic importance of our switch ing systems to our business, any
interruption or degradation could adversely affect the perception of the reliability of products carrying our brands and materially
adversely af fect our overall business and our results of operations.
Stakeholder Relationships
Losing a significant portion of business from one or more of our largest financial institution customers could lead to
significant revenue decreases in the longer term, which could have a material adverse impact on our business and our
results of operations.
Most of our financial institution customer relationships are not exclusive and may be terminated  by our customers. Our customers
can reassess their commitments to us at any time in the future and/or develop their own competitive services. Accordingly , our
business agreements with these customers may not reduce the risk inherent in our business that customers may terminate their
relationships with us in favor of relationships with our competitors, or for other reasons, or might not meet their contractual
obligations to us.
In addition, a significan t portion of our revenue is concentrated among our five largest finan cial institution customers. Loss of
business from any of our large customers could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Exclusive/near exclusi ve relationships certain customers have with our competitors may have a material adverse impact
on our business.
Certain customers have exclusive, or nearly-exclusive, relationships with our competitors to issue payment products, and these
relationships may make it difficult or cost-prohibitive for us to do significant amounts of business with them to increase our revenues.
In addition, these custo mers may be more successful and may grow faster than the custome rs that primarily issue our payment
products, which could put us at a competitive disadvantage. Furthermore, we earn substantial revenue from customers with nearly-
exclusive relationships with our competitors. Such relationships could provide advantages to the customers to shift business from us
to the compe titors with which they are principally aligned. A significant loss of our existing revenue or transaction volumes from these
customers could have a material adverse impact on our business.
Consolidation in the banking industry could materially and adversely affect our overall business and results of operations.
The banking industry has undergone substantial, accelerated consolidation in the past. Consolida tions have included customers with
a substantial Mastercard portfolio being acquired by institutions with a strong relationship with a competitor . If significant
consolidation among customers were to contin ue, it could result in the substantial loss of business for us, which could have a
material adverse impact on our business and prospects. In addition, one or more of our customers could seek to merge with, or
acquire, one of our competitors, and any such transaction could also have a material adverse impact on our overall business.
Consolidation could also produce a smaller number of large customers, which could increase their bargaining power and lead to
lower prices  and/or more favorable terms for our customers. These developments could materiall y and adversely affect our results of
operations.
26 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Our business significantly depends on the continued success and competitiveness of our issuing and acquiring
customers and, in many jurisdictions, their ability to effectively manage or help manage our brands.
While we work directly with many stakeholders in the payments system, including merchants, governments and large digital
companies and other technology companies, we are, and will continue to be, significantly depe ndent on our relationships with our
issuers and acquirers and their respective relatio nships with account holders and merchants to support our programs and services.
Furthermore, we depend on our issuing partner s and acquirers to continue to innovate to maintain competitiveness in the market.
We do not issue cards or other payment devices, extend credit to account holders or determine the interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders. Each issuer determines these and most other competitive payment program features. In addition, we do
not establish the discount rate that merchants are charged for acceptance, which is the responsibility of our acquiring customers. As
a result, our business significantly depends on the continued success and competitiveness of our issuing and acquiring customers
and the strength of our relationships with them. In turn, our customers’  success depends on a variety of factors over which we have
little or no influence, including economic conditions in global financial markets or their disintermediation by competitors or emerging
technologies, as well as regulation. If our custom ers become financially unstable, we may lose revenue or we may be exposed to
settlement risk. See our risk factor in “Risk Factors - Settlement and Third-Party Obligations” in this Part I, Item 1A with respect to
how we guarantee certain third-party obligations for further discussion.
With the exception of the United States and a select number of other jurisdictions, most in-country (as opposed to cross-border)
transactions conducted using Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus cards are authorized, cleared and settled by our customers or other
processors. Because we do not provide domesti c switching services in these countries and do not, as described above, have direct
relationships with account holders, we depend on our close working relationships with our customers to effectively manage our
brands, and the percepti on of our payments system, among consumers in these countries. We also rely on these customers to help
manage our brands and perception among regulators and merchants in these countries, alongside our own relationships with them.
From time to time, our customers may take actio ns that we do not believe to be in the best intere sts of our payments system overall,
which may materially and adversely impact our business.
Merchants’  continued focus on acceptance costs may lead to additional litigation and regulatory proceedings and increase
our incentive program costs, which could materially and adversely affect our profitability .
Merchants are important constituents in our payments system. We rely on both our relationships with them, as well as their
relationships with our issuer and acquirer custom ers, to continue to expand the acceptance of our integrated products and services.
We also work with merchants to help them enable new sales channels, create better purchase  experiences, improve efficiencies,
increase revenues and fight fraud. In the retail industry , there is a set of larger merchants with increasingly global scope and
influence. We believe that these merchants are having a significant impact on all participant s in the global payments industry ,
including Mastercard. Some large merchants have supported the legal, regulatory and legislative challenges to interchange fees that
Mastercard has been defending, including the U.S. merchant litigations. See our risk factor in “Risk Factors – Other Regulation” in
this Part I, Item 1A with respect to payments industry regulation, including interchange fees. The continued focus of merchants on
the costs of accepting various forms of payment , including in connection with the growth of digital payments, may lead to additional
litigation and regulatory proceedings.
Certain larger merchants are also able to negotiate incentives from us and pricing concessions from our issuer and acquirer
customers as a condition to accepting our products. We also make payments to certain merchants to incentivize them to create co-
branded payment programs with us. As mercha nts consolidate and become even larger , we may have to increase the amount of
incentives that we provide to certain merchants, which could materially and adversely affect our results of operations. Competitive
and regulatory pressures on pricing could make it difficult to offset the costs of these incentives. Additionally , if the rate of merchant
acceptance growth slows our business could suf fer.
Our work with governm ents exposes us to unique risks that could have a material impac t on our business and results of
operations.
As we increase our work with national, state and local governments, both indirectly through financial institutions and with them
directly as our customers, we may face various risks inherent in associating or contracting directly with governments. These risks
include, but are not limited to, the following:
•Governmental entities typically fund projects through appropriated monies. Changes in governm ental priorities or other political
developments, including  disruptions in governm ental operations, could impact approved fundin g and result in changes in the
scope, or lead to the termination of, the arrangements or contracts we or financial institution s enter into with respect to our
payment products and services.
•Our work with governments subjects us to U.S. and international anti-corruption laws, including the U.S. Foreign Corrupt
Practices Act and the U.K. Bribery Act. A violation and subsequent judgment or settlement under these laws could subject us to
substantial monetary penalties and damages and have a significant reputational impact.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 27
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
•Working or contracting with governments, either directly or via our financial institution customers, can subject us to heightened
reputational risks, including extensive scrutiny and publicity , as well as a potential association with the policies of a government
as a result of a business arrangement with that government. Any negative publicity or negative association with a government
entity , regardless of its accuracy , may adversely af fect our reputation.
Settlement and Third-Party Obligations
Our role as guarantor , as well as other contractual obligations, expose us to risk of loss or illiquidity .
We are a guarantor of certain third-party obligations, including those of certain of our customers.  In this capacity , we are exposed to
credit and liquidity risk from these customers and certain service providers. We may incur significant losses in connection with
transaction settlements if a customer fails to fund its daily settlement obligations due to technical problems, liquidity shortfalls,
insolvency or other reasons. Concurrent settlement failures of more than one of our larger customers or of several of our smaller
customers either on a given day or over a condensed period of time may exceed our available resources and could materially and
adversely af fect our results of operations.
We have significant contractual indemnification  obligations with certain customers. Should an event occur that triggers these
obligations, such an event could materially and adversely af fect our overall business and result of operations.
Global Economic and Political Environment
Global economic, political, financial and societal events or conditions could result in a material and adverse impact on our
overall business and results of operations.
Adverse economic trend s in key countries in which we operate may adversely affect our financ ial performance. Such impact may
include, but is not limited to, the following:
•Customers mitigating their economic exposure by limiting the issuance of new Mastercard products and requesting greater
incentive or greater cost stability from us
•Consumers and businesses lowering spending, which could impact domestic and cross-border spend
•Government intervention (including the effect of laws, regulations and/or government investments on or in our financial institution
customers), as well as uncertainty due to changing political regimes in executive, legislative and/or judicial branches of
government, that may have potential negative effects on our business and our relationships with customers or otherwise alter
their strategic direction away from our products
•Tightening of credit availability that could impact the ability of participating financial institutions to lend to us under the terms of
our credit facility
Additionally , we switch substantially all cross-border transactions using Mastercard, Maestro and Cirrus-branded cards and generate
a significant  amount of revenue from cross-border volume fees and fees related to switched transactions. Revenue from switching
cross-border and currency conversion transacti ons for our customers fluctuates with the levels and destinations of cross-border
travel and our customers’  need for transactions to be converted into their base currency . Cros s-border activity may be adversely
affected by world geopo litical, economic, weather and other conditions. These include the threa t of terrorism and outbreaks of flu,
viruses and other diseases, as well as major environmental events (including those related to climate change). The uncertainty that
could result from such events could decrease cross-border activity . Additionally , any regulation of interregional interchange fees
could also negatively impact our cross-border activity. In each case, decreased cross-border activity could decrease the revenue we
receive.
Our operatio ns as a global payments network rely in part on global interoperable standards to help facilitate safe and simple
payments. To the extent geopolitical events result in jurisdictions no longer participating in the creation or adoption of these
standards, or the creation of competing standards, the products and services we of fer could be negatively impacted.
Any of these developments could have a material adverse impact on our overall business and results of operations.
Adverse currency fluctuations and foreign exchange controls could negatively impact our results of operations.   
During 2019 , approximately 68% of our revenue was generated from activities outside the United States. This revenue (and the
related expense) could be transacted in a non-functional currency or valued based on a currenc y other than the functional currency
of the entity generating the revenues. Resulting exchange gains and losses are included in our net income. Our risk management
activities provide protection with respect to adverse changes in the value of only a limited number of currencies and are based on
estimates of exposures to these currencies.
In addition, some of the revenue we generate outside the United States is subject to unpredict able currency fluctuations including
devaluation of currencies where the values of other currencies change relative to the U.S. dollar . If the U.S. dollar strengthens
compared
28 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
to currencies in which we generate revenue, this revenue may be translated at a materi ally lower amount than expected.
Furthermore, we may become subject to exchange control regulations that might restrict or prohibit the conversion of our other
revenue currencies into U.S. dollars, such as what we have experienced in V enezuela.
The occurrence of currency fluctuations or exchange controls could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
The United Kingdom’ s proposed withdrawal from the European Union could harm our business and financial results.
In June 2016, voters in the United Kingdom approved the withdrawal of the U.K. from the E.U. (commonly referred to as “Brexit”).
The U.K. government triggered Article 50 of the Lisbon Treaty on March 29, 2017, which commenced the official E.U. withdrawal
process. In January 2020, Parliament and the E.U. approved of an agreement between the U.K. and the E.U., and the U.K. officially
departed from the E.U. On February 1, 2020, the U.K. entered into a transition/implementation period, during which all E.U. laws
regulations, court decisions, trading agreements and other obligations continue to apply to the U.K. During this period, which is set to
expire on December 31, 2020, the U.K. and E.U. will negotiate additional terms. Uncertainty over these terms could cause political
and economic uncertainty in the U.K. and the rest of Europe, which could harm our business and financial results.
Subsequent to the end of the transition/implementation period on December 31, 2020, Brexit could lead to legal uncertainty and
potentially divergent national laws and regulations in the U.K. and E.U. We, as well as our customers who have significant
operations in the U.K., may incur additional costs  and expenses as we adapt to potentially divergent regulatory frameworks from the
rest of the E.U. We may also face additional complexity with regard to immigration and travel rights for our employees located in the
U.K. and the E.U. These  factors may impact our ability to operate in the E.U. and U.K. seamle ssly. Any of these effects of Brexit,
among others, could harm our business and financial results.
Brand and Reputational Impact
Negative brand perception may materially and adversely affect our overall business.
Our brands and their attributes are key assets of our business. The ability to attract consumers to our branded products and retain
them depends upon the external perception of us and our industry . Our business may be affected by actions taken by our customers,
merchants or other organizations that impact the perception of our brands or the payments industry in general. From time to time,
our customers may take actions that we do not believe to be in the best interests of our brands, such as creditor practices that may
be viewed as “predatory”. Moreover , adverse developments with respect to our industry or the industries of our customers or other
companies and organizations with which we work may also, by association, impair our reputation, or result in greater regulatory or
legislative scrutiny . We have also been pursuin g the use of social media channels at an increasingly rapid pace. Under some
circumstances, our use of social media, or the use of social media by others as a channel for criticism or other purposes, could also
cause rapid, widespread reputational harm to our brands by disseminating rapidly and globally actual or perceived damaging
information about us, our products or merchants or other end users who utilize our products. To the extent any of our published
sustainability metrics are subsequently viewed as inaccurate or we are unable to execute on our sustainability initiatives, we may be
viewed negatively by consumers, investors and other stakeholders concerned about these matters. Also, as we are headquartered in
the United States, a negative perception of the United States could impact the perception of our company , which could adversely
affect our business. Any of the above issues could have a material and adverse ef fect to our overall business.
Lack of visibility of our brand in our products and services, or in the products and services of our partners who use our
technology , may materially and adversely affect our business.
As more players enter the global payments syste m, the layers between our brand and consume rs and merchants increase. In order
to compete with other powerful consumer brands that are also becoming part of the consumer payment experience, we often partner
with those brands on payment solutions. These brands include large digital companies and other  technology companies who are our
customers and use our networks to build their own acceptance brands. In some cases, our brand may not be featured in the
payment solution or may be secondary to other brands. Additionally , as part of our relationshi ps with some issuers, our payment
brand is only included on the back of the card. As a result, our brand may either be invisible to consumers or may not be the primary
brand with which consumers associate the payment experience. This brand invisibility , or any consumer confusion as to our role in
the consumer payment experience, could decrease the value of our brand, which could adversely af fect our business.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 29
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Talent and Culture
We may not be able to attract, hire and retain a highly qualified and diverse workforce, or maintain our corporate culture,
which could impact our ability to grow effectively .
Our performance largely depends on the talents and efforts of our employees, particularly our key personnel and senior
management. We may be unable to retain or to attract highly qualified employees. The market for key personnel is highly
competitive, particularly in technology and other skill areas significant to our business. Additionally , changes in immigration and work
permit laws and regulations and related enforcement have made it difficult for employees to work in, or transfer among, jurisdictions
in which we have operations and could impair our ability to attract and retain qualified employees. Failure to attract, hire, develop,
motivate and retain highly qualified and diverse employee talent, or to maintain a corporate cultu re that fosters innovation, creativity
and teamwork could harm our overall business and results of operations.
We rely on key personnel to lead with integrity . To the extent our leaders behave in a manner that is not consistent with our values,
we could experience significant impact to our brand and reputation, as well as to our corporate culture.
Acquisitions
Acquisitions, strategic investments or entry into new businesses could disrupt our business and harm our results of
operations or reputation.
Although we may continue to evaluate and/or make strategic acquisitions of, or acquire interests in joint ventures or other entities
related to, complementa ry businesses, products or technologies, we may not be able to success fully partner with or integrate them,
despite original intentions and focused efforts. In addition, such an integration may divert mana gement’ s time and resources from
our core business and disrupt our operations. Moreover , we may spend time and money on acquisitions or projects that do not meet
our expectations or incre ase our revenue. To the extent we pay the purchase price of any acqu isition in cash, it would reduce our
cash reserves available to us for other uses, and to the extent the purchase price is paid with our stock, it could be dilutive to our
stockholders. Furthermo re, we may not be able to successfully finance the business following the acquisition as a result of costs of
operations, including any litigation risk which may be inherited from the acquisition.
Any acquisition or entry  into a new business could subject us to new regulations with which we would need to comply . This
compliance could increase our costs, and we could be subject to liability or reputational harm to the extent we cannot meet any such
compliance requirement s. Our expansion into new businesses could also result in unanticipat ed issues which may be difficult to
manage.
Class A Common Stock and Governance Structure
Provisions in our organizational documents and Delaware law could be considered anti- takeover provisions and have an
impact on change-in-control.
Provisions contained in our amended and restated certificate of incorporation and bylaws and Delaware law could be considered
anti-takeover provisions, including provisions that could delay or prevent entirely a merger or acquisition that our stockholders
consider favorable. These provisions may also discourage acquisition proposals or have the effect of delaying or preventing entirely
a change in control, which could harm our stock price. For example, subject to limited exceptions, our amended and restated
certificate of incorporatio n prohibits any person from beneficially owning more than 15% of any of the Class A common stock or any
other class or series of our stock with general voting power , or more than 15% of our total voting power . In addition:
•our stockholders are not entitled to the right to cumulate votes in the election of directors
•our stockholders are not entitled to act by written consent
•a vote of 80% or more of all of the outstanding shares of our stock then entitled to vote is required for stockholders to amend any
provision of our bylaws
•any representative of a competitor of Mastercard or of Mastercard Foundation is disqualified  from service on our board of
directors
30 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
Mastercard Foundation’ s substantial stock ownership, and restrictions on its sales, may impact corporate actions or
acquisition proposals favorable to, or favored by , the other public stockholders.
As of February 11, 2020 , Mastercard Foundation owned 111,101,204  shares of Class A common stock, representing approximately
11.2%  of our gene ral voting power . Mastercard Foundation may not sell or otherwise transfer its shares of Class A common stock
prior to May 1, 2027, except to the extent necessary to satisfy its charitable disbursement requirements, for which purpose earlier
sales are permitted and have occurred. Mastercard Foundation is permitted to sell all of its remaining shares after May 1, 2027,
subject to certain condit ions. The directors of Mastercard Foundation are required to be indepen dent of us and our customers. The
ownership of Class A common stock by Mastercard Foundation, together with the restrictions on transfer , could discourage or make
more difficult acquisition proposals favored by the other holders of the Class A common stock. In addition, because Mastercard
Foundation is restricted from selling its shares for an extended period of time, it may not have the same interest in short or medium-
term movements in our stock price as, or incentive to approve a corporate action that may be favorable to, our other stockholders.
Item 1B. Unresolved staf f comments
Not applicable.
Item 2. Properties
We own our corporate headquarters, located in Purchase, New York, and our principal technolo gy and operations center , located in
O’Fallon, Missouri. As of December 31, 2019 , Mastercard and its subsidiaries owned or leased commercial properties throughout the
U.S. and other countries around the world, consisting of corporate and regional of fices, as well as our operations centers.
We believe that our facilities are suitable and adequate for the business that we currently conduct. However , we periodically review
our space requirements and may acquire or lease new space to meet the needs of our busin ess, or consolidate and dispose of
facilities that are no longer required.
Item 3. Legal proceedings
Refer to Note 13 (Accrued Expen ses and Accrued Litigation)  and Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the consolidated
financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 31
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Information about our executive of ficers
(as of February 14, 2020 )
Name
Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Ajay Banga 
President &
Chief Executive Officer
since July 201060
 President and COO (2009-2010) Executive positions at Citigroup (1996-2009),
including CEO, Asia Pacific region; Chairman
and CEO, International Global Consumer Group;
Executive V ice President, Global Consumer
Group; President, Retail Banking, North America;
and business head for CitiFinancial and the U.S.
Consumer Assets Division
Previous experience at Nestlé India and PepsiCo
totaling 15 years, in roles of increasing
responsibility
Ajay Bhalla
President, Cyber and
Intelligence Solutions
since November 201854
 President, Enterprise Security Solutions
(2014- 2018)
President, Digital Gateway Services (2011-
2013)
President, South Asia and Southeast Asia
(2008-2011)
President, Southeast Asia (2002-2007)
Country Manager , Singapore and Head of
Marketing, Southeast Asia (1997-2002)
Vice President (1993-1997)Various leadership positions at HSBC and Xerox
Corporation (1988-1993)
Ann Cairns 
Vice Chairman
since June 201863
 President, International (2011-2018) Managing director , Alvarez & Marsal (led the
European team managing the estate of Lehman
Brothers Holdings International through the
Chapter 11 process in Europe) (2002-2008)
CEO, ABN AMRO
Senior corporate and investment banking roles at
Citigroup
Research scientist and engineer for British Gas
Gilberto Caldart 
President, International
since June 201860
 President, Latin America and Caribbean
region (2013-2018)
Division President, South Latin
America/Brazil (2008-2013)Various leadership positions at Citigroup,
including Country Business Manager , Brazil
(2002-2008)
Michael Fraccaro 
Chief People Officer
since July 201654
 Executive V ice President, Human
Resources, Global Products and Solutions
(2014-2016)
Senior V ice President, Human Resources,
Global Products and Solutions (2012-2014)Various executive-level human resources
positions at HSBC Group, Hong Kong, a banking
and financial services firm (2000-2012)
Prior senior human resources positions in
banking and financial services in Australia and
the Middle East
32 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name
Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Michael Froman 
Vice Chairman and
President, Strategic
Growth
since April 201857
 Mr. Froman joined the Company in April
2018 in his current roleU.S. Trade Representative in the Executive
Office of President Obama (2013-2017)
Assistant to the President and Deputy National
Security Advisor for International Economic
Policy (2009-2013)
Various executive positions at Citigroup (1999-
2009), including CEO, CitiInsurance and COO of
Citigroup’ s alternative investments business
Edward McLaughlin 
President, Operations
and T echnology
since May 201754
 Chief Information Of ficer (2016-2017)
Chief Emerging Payments Of ficer (2010-
2015)
Chief Franchise Development Of ficer (2009-
2010)
Senior V ice President, Bill Payment and
Healthcare (2005-2009)Group V ice President, Product and Strategy ,
Metavante Corporation (financial services
technology company) (2002-2005)
Co-Founder and CEO, Paytrust, Inc. (online
payments company acquired by Metavante
Corporation in 2002) (1998-2002)
Sachin Mehra 
Chief Financial Officer
since April 201949
 Chief Financial Operations Of ficer (2018-
2019)
Executive V ice President, Commercial
Products (2015-2018)
Executive V ice President and Business
Financial Of ficer, North America (2013-
2015)
Corporate Treasurer (2010-2013)Vice President and Treasurer , Hess Corporation
(2008-2010)
Vice President and Deputy Treasurer , Hess
Corporation (2007-2008)
Various treasury and finance positions of
increasing responsibility , General Motors
Corporation and GMAC (1996-2007)
Michael Miebach 
Chief Product Officer
since January 201652
 President, Middle East and Africa (2010-
2015)Managing Director , Middle East and North Africa,
Barclays Bank PLC (2008-2010)
Managing Director , Sub-Saharan Africa, Barclays
Bank PLC (2007-2008)
Various executive positions at Citigroup in
Germany , Austria, U.K. and Turkey (1994-2007)
Tim Murphy 
General Counsel
since April 201452
 Chief Product Of ficer (2009-2014)
President, U.S. Region (2007-2009)
Executive V ice President, Customer
Business Planning and Analysis (2006-
2007)
Senior V ice President and Associate
General Counsel (2002-2006)Associate, Cleary , Gottlieb, Steen and Hamilton,
New York and London
Raja Rajamannar 
Chief Marketing and
Communications Officer
and President,
Healthcare   
since January 201658
 Chief Marketing Of ficer (2013-2015) Executive V ice President-Senior Business and
Chief Transformation Of ficer, Anthem (formerly ,
WellPoint, Inc.) (2012- 2013)
Senior V ice President and Chief Innovation and
Marketing Of ficer, Humana Inc. (2009-2012)
Various management positions at Citigroup
(1994-2009), including Executive V ice President
and Chief Marketing Of ficer-Citi Global Cards
(2008-2009)
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 33
PART I
EXECUTIVE OFFICERS
Name
Current Position Age Previous Mastercard Experience Previous Business Experience
Raj Seshadri
President, Data and
Services
since January 202054
 President, U.S. Issuers (2016-2019) Managing Director , Head of iShares U.S. W ealth
Advisory business, BlackRock (2014-2016)
Kevin Stanton 
Chief T ransformation
Officer
since January 202058
 Chief Services Of ficer (2018-2019)
President, Mastercard Advisors (2010-2017)
President, Canada (2004-2010)
Senior V ice President, Strategy and Market
Development (2002-2004)
Vice President, Senior Counsel and North
America Region Counsel (1995-2002)
Craig Vosburg  
President, North America
since January 201652
 Chief Product Of ficer (2014-2015)
Executive V ice President, U.S. Market
Development (2010-2014)
Head of Mastercard Advisors, U.S. and
Canada (2008-2010)
Head of Mastercard Advisors, Southeast
Asia, Greater China and South Asia/Middle
East/Africa (2006-2008)Senior member-financial services practice, Bain
& Company (2002-2006) and A.T. Kearney
(1997-2002)
Vice president, CoreStates Financial Corporation
(1989-1995)
34 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
  PART II
  Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related
stockholder matters and issuer purchases of equity securities
  Item 6. Selected financial data
  Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial
condition and results of operations
  Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market
risk
  Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
  Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on
accounting and financial disclosure
  Item 9A. Controls and procedures
  Item 9B. Other information
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUES PURCHASES OF
Item 5. Market for registrant’ s common equity , related stockholder
matters and issuer purchases of equity securities
Our Class A common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “MA”. At February 11, 2020 , we had 68
stockholders of record for our Class A common stock. We believe that the number of beneficial owners is substantially greater than
the number of record holders because a large portion of our Class A common stock is held in “street name” by brokers.
There is currently no established public trading market for our Class B common stock. There were approximately 271 holders of
record of our non-voting  Class B common stock as of February 11, 2020 , constituting approximately 1.1%  of our total outstanding
equity .
Stock Performance Graph
The graph and table below compare the cumulative total stockholder return of Mastercard’ s Class A common stock, the S&P 500
Financials and the S&P 500 Index for the five-ye ar period ended December 31, 2019 . The graph assumes a $100 investment in our
Class A common stock and both of the indices and the reinvestment of dividends. Mastercard’ s Class B common stock is not publicly
traded or listed on any exchange or dealer quotation system.
Comparison of cumulative five-year total return
Total returns to stockholders for each of the years presented were as follows:
  
Base
periodIndexed Returns
  For the Years Ended December 31,
Company/Index  2014 2015 2016  2017 2018  2019
Mastercard  $100.00 $113.80 $121.67  $179.67 $225.17  $358.38
S&P 500 Financials  100.00 98.47 120.92  147.75 128.50  169.78
S&P 500 Index  100.00 101.38 113.51  138.29 132.23  173.86
36 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUES PURCHASES OF
Dividend Declaration and Policy
On December 3, 2019, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.40  per share paid on February 7, 2020 to
holders of record on January 9, 2020 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock. On February 4, 2020, our Board of
Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.40  per share payable on May 8, 2020 to holders of record on April 9, 2020 of our
Class A common stock and Class B common stock.
Subject to legally availab le funds, we intend to continue to pay a quarterly cash dividend on our outstanding Class A common stock
and Class B common stock. However , the declaration and payment of future dividends is at the sole discretion of our Board of
Directors after taking into account various factors , including our financial condition, operating results, available cash and current and
anticipated cash needs.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
On Decemb er 4, 2018, our Board of Directors approved a share repurchase program authorizing us to repurchase up to $6.5 billion
of our Class A common  stock (the “2018 Share Repurchase Program”). This program beca me effective in January 2019. On
December 3, 2019, our Board of Directors approved a share repurchase program authorizing us to repurchase up to $8.0 billion of
our Class A common stock (the “2019 Share Repurchase Program”). This program became ef fective in January 2020.
During the fourth quarter of 2019 , we repurchased a total of approximately 3.6 million  shares for $994 million  at an avera ge price of
$275.00  per share of Class A common stock. Our repurchase activity during the fourth quarter of 2019  consisted of open market
share repurchases and is summarized in the following table:
Period  Total Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage Price
Paid per Share
(including
commission cost) Total Number of
Shares Purchased as
Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
Programs  Dollar Value of
Shares that may yet
be Purchased under
the Plans or
Programs 1
October 1 – 31  2,128,776 $ 271.55  2,128,776  $ 719,951,874
November 1 – 30  1,363,616 278.93  1,363,616  339,605,253
December 1 – 31  121,837 291.38  121,837  8,304,104,890
Total  3,614,229 275.00  3,614,229  
1 Dollar value of shares that may yet be purchased under the 2018 Share Repurchase Program and the 2019 Share Repurchase Program are as
of the end of each period presented.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 37
PART II
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
Item 6. Selected financial data
The stateme nt of operations data and the cash  dividends declared per share presented below for the years ended December 31,
2019, 2018 and 2017 , and the balance sheet data as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 , were derived from the audited consolidated
financial statements of Mastercard Incorporated included in Part II, Item 8. The statement of operations data and the cash dividends
declared per share presented below for the years ended December 31, 2016  and 2015 , and the balance sheet data as of December
31, 2017 , 2016  and 2015 , were  derived from audited consolidated financial statements not included in this Report. The data set forth
below shoul d be read in conjunction with, and are qualified by reference to, “Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial
Condition and Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 and our consolidated financial statements and notes thereto included in Part
II, Item 8.
  Years Ended December 31,
  2019 2018 2017 2016 2015
  (in millions, except per share data)
Statement of Operations Data:          
Net revenue  $16,883  $14,950  $12,497  $10,776 $9,667
Operating expenses  7,219  7,668  5,875  5,015 4,589
Operating income  9,664  7,282  6,622  5,761 5,078
Net income  8,118  5,859  3,915  4,059 3,808
Basic earnings per share  7.98  5.63  3.67  3.70 3.36
Diluted earnings per share  7.94  5.60  3.65  3.69 3.35
Balance Sheet Data:          
Total assets  $29,236  $24,860  $21,329  $18,675 $16,250
Long-term debt  8,527  5,834  5,424  5,180 3,268
Total equity  5,917  5,418  5,497  5,684 6,062
Cash dividends declared per share  $ 1.39  $ 1.08  $ 0.91  $ 0.79 $ 0.67
38 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Item 7. Management’ s discussion and analysis of financial
condition and results of operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes of Mastercard
Incorporated and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Mastercard International Incorporated (“Mastercard International”) (together ,
“Mastercard” or the “Company”), included elsewhere in this Report. Percentage changes provided throughout “Management’ s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” were calculated on amounts rounded to the nearest
thousand. For discussion related to the results of operations for the year ended December 31, 2018 compared to the year ended
December 31, 2017, please see Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Business Overview
Mastercard is a technol ogy company in the global payments industry that connects consumer s, financial institutions, merchants,
governments, digital partners, businesses and other organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment
instead of cash and checks. We make payments easier and more efficient by providing a wide range of payment solutions and
services using our family of well-known brands , including Mastercard®, Maestro® and Cirrus® . We are a multi-rail network that
offers customers one partner to turn to for their domestic and cross-border payment needs. Through our unique and proprietary
global payments network, which we refer to as our core network, we switch (authorize, clear and settle) payment transactions and
deliver related products  and services. We have additional payment capabilities that include automated clearing house (“ACH”)
transactions (both batch and real-time account-based payments). We also provide integrated value-added offerings such as cyber
and intellige nce products, information and analyt ics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs and processing. Our payment
solutions of fer customers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and security for the global payments system.
A typical transaction on our core network involves four participants in addition to us: account holder (a person or entity who holds a
card or uses another device enabled for paym ent), issuer (the account holder ’s financial institution), merchant and acquirer (the
merchant’ s financial institution). We do not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue from interest rates or other fees
charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection  with merchants’  acceptance of our
products. In most cases, account holder relationships belong to, and are managed by , our financial institution customers.
Financial Results Overview
The following table provides a summary of our key GAAP  operating results, as reported: 
  Year ended December 31,  2019
Increase/
(Decrease)2018
Increase/
(Decrease)   2019 2018 2017  
  ($ in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue  $16,883 $14,950 $12,497  13% 20%
Operating expenses  $7,219 $7,668 $5,875  (6)% 31%
Operating income  $9,664 $7,282 $6,622  33% 10%
Operating margin  57.2% 48.7% 53.0% 8.5 ppt (4.3) ppt
Income tax expense  $1,613 $1,345 $2,607  20% (48)%
Effective income tax rate  16.6% 18.7% 40.0% (2.1) ppt (21.3) ppt
Net income  $8,118 $5,859 $3,915  39% 50%
Diluted earnings per share  $ 7.94 $ 5.60 $ 3.65  42% 53%
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding  1,022 1,047 1,072  (2)% (2)%
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 39
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following table provides a summary of key non-GAAP  operating results 1, 2, adjusted to exclude the impact of gains and losses
on our equity investmen ts, special items (which represent litigation judgments and settlements and certain one-time items) and the
related tax impacts on our non-GAAP  adjustments. In addition, we have presented growth rates, adjusted for the impact of currency:
  Year ended December 31,  2019
 Increase/(Decrease)2018
Increase/(Decrease)
  2019 2018  2017  As
adjusted Currency-
neutralAs
adjustedCurrency-
neutral
  ($ in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue  $16,883 $14,950  $12,497  13%  16% 20% 20%
Adjusted operating expenses  $7,219 $6,540  $5,693  10%  12% 15% 15%
Adjusted operating margin  57.2% 56.2% 54.4% 1.0 ppt  1.3 ppt 1.8 ppt 1.8 ppt
Adjusted ef fective income tax rate 2  17.0% 18.5% 26.8% (1.5) ppt  (1.3) ppt (8.3) ppt (8.2) ppt
Adjusted net income 2  $7,937 $6,792  $4,906  17%  20% 38% 38%
Adjusted diluted earnings per share 2  $ 7.77 $ 6.49  $ 4.58  20%  23% 42% 41%
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
1 See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.  
2 For 2019 we updated our non-GAAP methodology to exclude the impact of gains and losses on our equity investments. Prior year periods were
not restated as the impact of the change was immaterial in relation to our non-GAAP results.
Key highlights for 2019  as compared to 2018  were as follows:
Net revenue
GAAP Non-GAAP (currency-neutral)Net revenue increased 16% on a currency-neutral basis, which included growth
of approximately 1 percentage point from acquisitions. The primary drivers of our
up 13% up 16%net revenue growth were  1:
     - Gross dollar volume growth of 13% on a local currency basis
      - Cross-border growth of 16% on a local currency basis
      - Switched transaction growth of 19%
      - Other revenues growth of 23%, or 24% on a currency-neutral basis. This
         includes 2 percentage points of growth due to acquisitions. The remaining
         growth was primarily driven by our Cyber & Intelligence and Data & Services
         solutions.
      - These increases were partially of fset by higher rebates and incentives, which
         increased 18%, or 20% on a currency-neutral basis, primarily due to the
         impact from new and renewed agreements and increased volumes.
1 The cross-border volume and switched transactions growth rates have been normalized to eliminate the effects of differing switching and
carryover days between periods. Carryover days are those where transactions and volumes from days where the company does not clear and
settle are processed.
40 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Operating
expensesAdjusted
operating expenses
GAAP Non-GAAP (currency-neutral)Adjusted operating expenses on a currency-n eutral basis included growth of
approximately 2 percentage points from acquisitions and 1 percentage point
related to the differential in hedging gains and losses versus the year-ago period.
The remaining 9 percentage points of growth was primarily related to our
continued investment in strategic initiatives.down 6% up 12%
 
Effective income
tax rateAdjusted
effective income tax rate
GAAP Non-GAAP (currency-neutral)Adjusted effective income tax rate of 17.0% primarily attributable to a more
favorable geographic mix of earnings and discrete tax benefits including a
favorable court ruling in the current period. 16.6% 17.0%
Other 2019  financial highlights were as follows:
•We generated net cash flows from operations of $8.2 billion .
•We completed the acquisitions of businesses for total consideration of $1.5 billion .
•We repurchased 26 million  shares of our common stock for $6.5 billion  and paid dividends of $1.3 billion
•We completed debt offerings for an aggregate principal amount of $2.8 billion and separa tely repaid $500 million of principal that
matured related to our 2014 USD Notes.
Non-GAAP  Financial Information
Non-GAAP  financial information is defined as a numerical measure of a company’ s performance that excludes or includes amounts
so as to be different than the most comparable measure calculated and presented in acco rdance with accounting principles
generally accepted in the United States (“GAAP ”). Our non-GAAP  financial measures exclude the impact of special items, where
applicable, which represent litigation judgments and settlements and certain one-time items, as well as the related tax impacts
(“Special Items”). For 2019, our non-GAAP  financial measures also exclude the impact of gains and losses on our equity
investments which includes mark-to-market fair value adjustments, impairments and gains and losses upon disposition and the
related tax impacts. Prior year periods were not restated as the impact of the change was immaterial in relation to our non-GAAP
results. Our non-GAAP  financial measures for the comparable periods exclude the impact of the following:
Gains and Losses on Equity Investments
•During 2019, we recorded net gains of $167 million  ($124 million  after tax, or $0.12  per diluted share), primarily related to
unrealized fair market value adjustments on marketable and non-marketable equity securities.
Special Items
Tax act
•During 2019, we recorde d a $57 million  net tax benefit ($0.06  per diluted share) which included a $30 million  benefit related to a
reduction to the 2017 one-time deemed repatriation tax on accumulated foreign earnings (the “Transition Tax”) resulting from final
tax regulations issued in 2019 and a $27 million benef it related to additional foreign tax credits which can be carried back under
transition rules.
•During 2018 , we recorded a $75 million net tax benefit ($0.07  per diluted share) which  included a $90 million benef it related to the
carryback of foreign tax credits due to transition  rules, offset by a net $15 million expen se primarily related to an increase to our
Transition Tax.
•During 2017, we record ed additional tax expense of $873 million  ($0.81  per diluted share) which included $825 million  of
provisional charges attributable to the Transitio n Tax, the remeasurement of our net deferred tax asset in the U.S. and the
recognition of a deferred tax liability related to a change in assertion regarding reinvestment of foreign earnings, as well as $48
million  additional tax expense related to a foregone foreign tax credit benefit on 2017 repatriations.
Litigation provisions
•During 2018, we recorde d pre-tax charges of $1,128 million  ($1,008 million  after tax, or $0.96  per diluted share) relate d to litigation
provisions which included pre-tax charges of:
◦$654 million  related to a fine issued by the European Commission
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 41
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
◦$237 million  related to both the U.S. merchant class litigation and the filed and anticipated opt-out U.S. merchant cases
◦$237 million  related to litigation settlements with U.K. and Pan-European merchants.
•During 2017, we recorded pre-tax charges of $15 million  ($10 million  after tax, or $0.01  per diluted share) related to a litigation
settlement with Canadian merchants.
Venezuela charge
•During 2017, we record ed a pre-tax charge of $167 million  ($108 million  after tax, or $0.10  per diluted share) in general and
administrative expenses related to the deconsolidation of our V enezuelan subsidiaries.
See Note 1 (Sum mary of Significant Accounting Policies) , Note 7 (Inve stments) , Note 20 (Income Taxes)  and Note 21 (Legal and
Regulatory Proceedings ) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion. We excluded
these items because management evaluates the underlying operations and performance of the Company separately from these
recurring and nonrecurring items.
We believe that the non-GAAP  financial measures presented facilitate an understanding of our operating performance and provide a
meaningful comparison of our results between periods. We use non-GAAP  financial measures to, among other things, evaluate our
ongoing operations in relation to historical results, for internal planning and forecasting purposes and in the calculation of
performance-based compensation.
In addition, we present growth rates adjusted for the impact of currency , which is a non-GAAP  financial measure. Currency-neutral
growth rates are calculated by remeasuring the prior period’ s results using the current period’ s exchange rates for both the
translational and transactional impacts on operating results. The impact of currency translation represents the effect of translating
operating results where the functional currency is different than our U.S. dollar reporting curren cy. The impact of the transactional
currency represents the effect of converting revenue and expenses occurring in a currency other than the functional currency . We
believe the presentation of currency-neutral growth rates provides relevant information to facilitate an understanding of our operating
results.
Net revenue, operating expenses, operating margin, other income (expense), effective income tax rate, net income and diluted
earnings per share adjusted for the impact of gains and losses on our equity investments, Special Items and/or the impact of
currency , are non-GAAP  financial measures and should not be relied upon as substitutes for measures calculated in accordance
with GAAP .
42 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following tables reconcile our reported financial measures calculated in accordance with GAAP  to the respective non-GAAP
adjusted financial measures:
 Year ended December 31, 2019
  Operating
expensesOperating 
marginOther
income 
(expense)Effective 
income 
tax rate Net
income Diluted
earnings
per share
 ($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP  $7,219 57.2%$ 67 16.6 % $8,118 $ 7.94
(Gains) losses on equity investments  ** **  (167) (0.2)% (124) (0.12 )
Tax act  ** **  ** 0.6 % (57) (0.06 )
Non-GAAP  $7,219 57.2%$ (100) 17.0 % $7,937 $ 7.77
  Year ended December 31, 2018
   Operating
expenses Operating
margin Other
income 
(expense) Effective
income
tax rate  Net
income Diluted
earnings
per share
  ($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP  $7,668  48.7% $ (78) 18.7 % $5,859 $ 5.60
Litigation provisions  (1,128 ) 7.5% ** (1.1)% 1,008 0.96
Tax act  ** **  ** 0.9 % (75) (0.07 )
Non-GAAP  $6,540  56.2% $ (78) 18.5 % $6,792 $ 6.49
 Year ended December 31, 2017
  Operating
expensesOperating
marginOther
income 
(expense) Effective
income
tax rate Net
income  Diluted
earnings
per share
 ($ in millions, except per share data)
Reported - GAAP $5,875 53.0%$ (100) 40.0 % $3,915  $ 3.65
Tax act ** ** ** (13.4 )% 873  0.81
Venezuela charge (167) 1.3% ** 0.2 % 108  0.10
Litigation provisions (15) 0.1% ** — % 10 0.01
Non-GAAP $5,693 54.4%$ (100) 26.8 % $4,906  $ 4.58
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
** Not applicable
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 43
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following tables represent the reconciliation of our growth rates reported under GAAP  to our non-GAAP  growth rates:
 Year Ended December 31, 2019 as compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Increase/(Decrease)
 Net revenue Operating
expenses Operating
marginEffective
income tax
rate  Net income Diluted
earnings per
share
Reported - GAAP 13% (6)% 8.5 (2.1) ppt 39 % 42 %
(Gains) losses on equity investments 1  **  **   ** (0.2) ppt (2)% (2)%
Tax act  **  **   ** (0.3) ppt 1 % 1 %
Litigation provisions  ** 16 % (7.5) ppt 1.1 ppt (20)% (21)%
Non-GAAP 13% 10 % 1.0 ppt (1.5) ppt 17 % 20 %
Currency impact 2 3% 2 % 0.3 ppt 0.2 ppt 3 % 3 %
Non-GAAP  - currency-neutral 16% 12 % 1.3 ppt (1.3) ppt 20 % 23 %
 Year Ended December 31, 2018 as compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2017
 Increase/(Decrease)
 Net revenue  Operating
expensesOperating
margin Effective
income tax
rate  Net income Diluted
earnings per
share
Reported - GAAP 20 % 31 % (4.3) ppt  (21.3) ppt 50 % 53 %
Litigation provisions **  (19)% 7.4 ppt  (1.0) ppt 25 % 26 %
Tax act **  ** ** 14.2 ppt (33)% (34)%
Venezuela charge **  3 % (1.3) ppt  (0.2) ppt (3)% (3)%
Non-GAAP 20 % 15 % 1.8 ppt  (8.3) ppt 38 % 42 %
Currency impact 2 — % — % — 0.1 ppt — % — %
Non-GAAP  - currency-neutral 20 % 15 % 1.8 ppt  (8.2) ppt 38 % 41 %
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
** Not applicable
1 For 2019 we updated our non-GAAP methodology to exclude the impact of gains and losses on our equity investments. Prior year periods were
not restated as the impact of the change was immaterial in relation to our non-GAAP results.
2 Represents the currency translational and transactional impact.
44 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Foreign Currency
Currency Impact (T ranslation and T ransactional)
Our primary revenue functional currencies are the U.S. dollar , euro, Brazilian real and the British pound. Our overall operating results
are impacted by currenc y translation, which represents the effect of translating operating results where the functional currency is
different than our U.S. dollar reporting currency .
Our operating results can also be impacted by transactional currency . The impact of the transact ional currency represents the effect
of converting revenue and expense transaction s occurring in a currency other than the functional currency . Changes in currency
exchange rates directly impact the calculation of gross dollar volume (“GDV”) and gross euro volume (“GEV”), which are used in the
calculation of our domestic assessments, cross-border volume fees and volume-related rebates and incentives. In most non-
European regions, GDV is calculated based on local currency spending volume converted to U.S. dollars using average exchange
rates for the period. In Europe, GEV is calculated based on local currency spending volume  converted to euros using average
exchange rates for the period. As a result, our domestic assessments, cross-border volume fees and volume-related rebates and
incentives are impacted by the strengthening or weakening of the U.S. dollar versus non-European local currencies and the
strengthening or weakening of the euro versus other European local currencies. For example, our billing in Australia is in the U.S.
dollar , howe ver, consum er spend in Australia is in the Australian dollar . The currency transactio nal impact of converting Australian
dollars to our U.S. dollar  billing currency will have an impact on the revenue generated. The strengthening or weakening of the U.S.
dollar is evident when GDV growth on a U.S. dollar-converted basis is compared to GDV growth on a local currency basis. In 2019 ,
GDV on a U.S. dollar-converted basis increased 9.6% , while GDV on a local currency basis increased 13.0%  versus 2018 . In 2018 ,
GDV on a U.S. dollar-converted basis increased  12.8% , while GDV on a local currency basis increased 13.8%  versus 2017 . Further,
the impact from transactional currency occurs in transaction processing revenue, other revenue and operating expenses when the
local currency of these items are dif ferent than the functional currency .
The translational and transactional impact of currency (“Currency impact”) has been identified in our growth impact tables and has
been excluded from our currency neutral growth rates, which are non-GAAP  financial measures. See “Non-GAAP  Financial
Information” for further information on our non-GAAP  adjustments.
Foreign Exchange Activity
We incur foreign currency gains and losses from remeasuring monetary assets and liabilities that are in a currency other than the
functional currency and from remeasuring foreign exchange derivative contracts (“Foreign Exchange Activity”). The impact of
Foreign Exchange Activity has not been eliminated in our currency-neutral results (see “Non-GAAP  Financial Information”) and is
recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations. We manage foreign currency balance
sheet remea surement and transactional currency exposure through our foreign exchange risk management activities, which are
discussed further in Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item
8. Since we do not designate foreign exchange derivatives as hedging instruments pursuant to the accounting standards for
derivative instruments and hedging activities, we record gains and losses on foreign exchange derivatives immediately in current-
period earnings, with the related hedged item being recognized as the exposures materialize.
Risk of Currency Devaluation
We are exposed to curre ncy devaluation in certain countries. In addition, we are subject to exchange control regulations that restrict
the conversion of financial assets into U.S. dolla rs. While these revenues and assets are not material to us on a consolidated basis,
we can be negatively impacted should there be a continued and sustained devaluation of local currencies relative to the U.S. dollar
and/or a continued and sustained deterioration of economic conditions in these countries. Specifically , in 2017, due to foreign
exchange regulations which were restricting access to U.S. dollars in Venezuela, an other-than -temporary lack of exchangeability
between the Venezuela bolivar and the U.S. dollar impacted our ability to manage risk, process cross-border transactions and satisfy
U.S. dollar denominated liabilities related to our Venezuelan operations. As a result of these factors, we concluded that, effective
December 31, 2017, we did not meet the accounting criteria for consolidation of these subsidiaries, and therefore we transitioned to
the cost method of acco unting. This accounting change resulted in a pre-tax charge of $167 million  ($108 million  after tax, or $0.10
per diluted share) in 2017. We continue to operate and serve our Venezuelan issuers, acquire rs, merchants and account holders
with our products and services. See Note 1 (Sum mary of Significant Accounting Policies)  to the consolidated financial statements
included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 45
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Financial Results
Revenue
Gross reven ue increase d 14%, or 17% on a curren cy-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year, primarily due to an increase in
transactions, dollar volume of activity on cards  carrying our brands for both domestic and cross-border transactions and other
payment-related products and services.
Rebates and incentives increased 18%, or 20% on a curren cy-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year, primarily due to the impac t
from new and renewed agreements and increased volumes.
Our net revenue increased 13%, or 16% on a curren cy-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year, including growth of 1 perce ntage
point from our acquisitions.
See Note 3 (Revenue)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for a further discussion of how we
recognize revenue.
The components of net revenue were as follows:
  For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
  2019  2018  2017 2019 2018
  ($ in millions)
Domestic assessments  $ 6,781  $ 6,138  $ 5,130 10% 20%
Cross-border volume fees  5,606  4,954  4,174 13% 19%
Transaction processing  8,469  7,391  6,188 15% 19%
Other revenues  4,124  3,348  2,853 23% 17%
Gross revenue  24,980  21,831  18,345 14% 19%
Rebates and incentives (contra-revenue)  (8,097 ) (6,881 ) (5,848 ) 18% 18%
Net revenue  $ 16,883  $ 14,950  $ 12,497 13% 20%
The following table summarizes the drivers of net revenue growth:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 Volume  AcquisitionsRevenue
Standard 1 Currency
Impact 2 Other 3 Total
 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
Domestic assessments 13% 14%  —%  —% ** 6%  (3)%  (1)% 1%4 2 %4 10% 20%
Cross-border volume
fees 14% 17%  —%  —% ** 1%  (3)%  1% 2% — % 13% 19%
Transaction processing 14% 14%  —%  —% ** —%  (2)%  —% 3% 5 % 15% 19%
Other revenues ** **  2%  2% ** —%  (1)%  (1)% 22%5 16 %5 23% 17%
Rebates and incentives 9% 10%  —%  —% ** (2)%  (3)%  (1)% 11%6 11 %6 18% 18%
Net revenue 13% 14%  1%  0.5% ** 4%  (3)%  —% 2% 2 % 13% 20%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding
** Not applicable
1 Represents the impact of our adoption of the revenue guidance in 2018. For a more detailed discussion on the impact of the revenue guidance,
refer to Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
2 Represents the currency translational and transactional impact.
3 Includes impact from pricing and other non-volume based fees.
4 Includes impact of the allocation of revenue to service deliverables, which are primarily recorded in other revenue when services are performed.
5 Includes impacts from cyber and intelligence fees, data analytics and consulting fees and other payment-related products and services.
6 Includes the impact of new, renewed and expired agreements.
46 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following tables provide a summary of the trend in volume and transaction growth. The cross-border volume and switched
transactions growth rates have been normalized to eliminate the effects of differing switching and carryover days between periods.
Carryover days are those where transactions and volumes from days where the company does not clear and settle are processed.
Additionally , we adjusted the switched transactions growth rate in the prior period for the deconsolidation of our Venezuelan
subsidiaries in 2017. For a more detailed discussion of the deconsolidation of our Venezuelan subsidiaries, refer to Note 1
(Summary of Significant Accounting Policies)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
  For the Years Ended December 31,
  2019  2018
  Growth
(USD)Growth
(Local) Growth
(USD)Growth
(Local)
Mastercard-branded GDV 1  10% 13% 13% 14%
Asia Pacific/Middle East/Africa  8% 12% 13% 13%
Canada  4% 7% 10% 10%
Europe  12% 18% 18% 19%
Latin America  9% 15% 8% 17%
United States  10% 10% 10% 10%
Cross-border volume 1  16%  18%
1 Excludes volume generated by Maestro and Cirrus cards.
 For the Years Ended
December 31,
 2019  2018
Switched transactions 19% 17%
No individual country , other than the United States, generated more than 10% of net revenue in any such period. A significant portion
of our net revenue is concentrated among our five largest customers. In 2019 , the net revenue from these customers was
approximately $3.5 billion , or 21%, of total net revenue. The loss of any of these customers or their significant card programs could
adversely impact our revenue.
Operating Expenses
Operating expenses decreased 6% in 2019  versus the prior year. Adjusted operating expenses increased 10%, or 12% on a
currency-neutral basis in 2019  versu s the prior year. Current year results include growth of approximately 2 perce ntage points from
acquisitions and 1 percentage point primarily from foreign exchange derivative contracts.
The components of operating expenses were as follows:
 For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
 2019 2018 2017 2019  2018
 ($ in millions)
General and administrative $5,763 $5,174  $4,653  11 % 11%
Advertising and marketing      934 907  771  3 % 18%
Depreciation and amortization 522 459  436  14 % 5%
Provision for litigation — 1,128  15 **  **
Total operating expenses            7,219 7,668  5,875  (6)% 31%
Special Items 1 — (1,128 ) (182) **  **
Adjusted operating expenses (excluding Special Items 1) $7,219 $6,540  $5,693  10 % 15%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
1 See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 47
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
The following table summarizes the drivers of changes in operating expenses:
  For the Years Ended December 31,
  OperationalSpecial 
Items 2  AcquisitionsRevenue
Standard 3 Currency Impact 4 Total
  2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018 2019 2018
General and
administrative  11% 14 %1 **  (4)% 2% 1% ** —% (2)% — % 11 % 11%
Advertising and
marketing  5% (4)% **  **  —% —% ** 21% (2)% — % 3 % 18%
Depreciation and
amortization  9% (5)% **  **  7% 10% ** —% (2)% — % 14 % 5%
Provision for
litigation  ** ** **  **  ** ** ** ** ** **  ** **
Total operating
expenses  10% 10 %1 (16)% 16 % 2% 2% ** 3% (2)% — % (6)% 31%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
1 Includes a 2 percentage point impact to general and administrative and total operating expenses growth due to contributions made in 2018 to
support inclusive growth efforts. Contributions made in 2019 were comparable to the prior year.
2 See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.
3 Represents the impact of our adoption of the revenue guidance in 2018. For a more detailed discussion on the impact of the revenue guidance,
refer to Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
4 Represents the currency translational and transactional impact.
General and Administrative
General and administrative expenses increased 11%, or 13% on a currency-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year. Current year
results include growth of approximately 2 percentage points from acquisitions and 1 percentage point primarily from foreign
exchange derivative contracts. The remaining increase was primarily driven by an increase in personnel to support our continued
investment in our strategic initiatives.
The components of general and administrative expenses were as follows:
  For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
  2019 2018 2017 2019 2018
  ($ in millions)
Personnel  $3,537  $3,214  $2,687  10% 20%
Professional fees  447  377  355  19% 6%
Data processing and telecommunications  666  600  504  11% 19%
Foreign exchange activity 1  32 (36) 106  ** **
Other  1,081  1,019  1,001  6% 2%
Total general and administrative expenses  5,763  5,174  4,653  11% 11%
Special Items 2  — — (167) ** **
Adjusted general and administrative expenses (excluding Special Items 2) $5,763  $5,174  $4,486  11% 15%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
1 Foreign exchange activity includes gains and losses on foreign exchange derivative contracts and the impact of remeasurement of assets and
liabilities denominated in foreign currencies. See Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) to the consolidated financial statements included in
Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
2 See “Non-GAAP Financial Information” for further information on our non-GAAP adjustments and the reconciliation to GAAP reported amounts.
Advertising and Marketing
Advertising and marketing expenses increased 3%, or 5% on a currency-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year, primarily due to
higher spending on certain sponsorship initiatives.
48 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Depreciation and Amortization
Depreciation and amortization expenses increas ed 14% , or 15% on a curren cy-neutral basis in 2019  versus the prior year. Current
year results include grow th of approximately 7 percentage points from acquisitions with the remaining increase primarily driven by
amortization of certain intangible assets and depreciation on data center assets.
Provision for Litigation
Provision for litigation decreased in 2019  versus the prior year as there were no litigation charges in the current year. See Note 21
(Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Other Income (Expense)
Other incom e (expense) increased in 2019  versus the prior year primarily due to net gains of $167 million  which were related to
unrealized fair market value adjustments on marketable and non-marketable equity securities in the current period.
The components of other income (expense) were as follows:
  For the Years Ended December 31, Increase (Decrease)
  2019 2018 2017 2019  2018
  ($ in millions)
Investment Income  $ 97 $ 122 $ 56 (21)% **
Gains (losses) on equity investments, net  167 — — **  **
Interest expense  (224) (186) (154) 20 % 21 %
Other income (expense), net  27 (14) (2) **  **
Total other income (expense)  67 (78) (100) **  (22)%
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
** Not meaningful
Income T axes
The effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2019  and 2018  were 16.6%  and 18.7% , respe ctively . The effective
income tax rate for 2019  was lower than the effective income tax rate for 2018 , primarily due to the nondeductible nature of the fine
issued by the European  Commission in 2018 and a discrete tax benefit related to a favorable court ruling in 2019 . These 2019
benefits were partially offset by discrete tax benefits in 2018  prima rily related to foreign tax credits generated in 2018 as a result of
U.S. tax reform, which can be carried back and utilized in 2017 under transition rules issued by the Department of the Treasury and
the Internal Revenue Service.
The adjusted effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2019  and 2018  were 17.0%  and 18.5% , respectively . The
adjusted effective income tax rate was lower than the prior year primarily due to a more favora ble geographic mix of earnings and
discrete tax benefits including a favorable court ruling in 2019.
See Note 20 (Income Taxes)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
We rely on existing liquidity, cash generated from operations and access to capital to fund our global operations, credit and
settlement exposure, capital expenditures, investments in our business and current and poten tial obligations. The following table
summarizes the cash, cash equivalents, investments and credit available to us at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in billions)
Cash, cash equivalents and investments 1 $ 7.7 $ 8.4
Unused line of credit 6.0 4.5
1 Investments include available-for-sale securities and held-to-maturity securities. This amount excludes restricted cash and restricted cash
equivalents of $2.0 billion and $1.7 billion at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 49
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
We believe that our existing cash, cash equivale nts and investment securities balances, our cash flow generating capabilities, and
our access to capital resources are sufficient to satisfy our future operating cash needs, capital asset purchases, outstanding
commitments and other liquidity requirements associated with our existing operations and potential obligations.
Our liquidity and access to capital could be nega tively impacted by global credit market conditions. We guarantee the settlement of
many of the transactions between our customers. Historically , payments under these guarantees have not been significant; however ,
historical trends may not be an indication of potential future losses. The risk of loss on these guarantees is specific to individual
customers, but may also be driven by regional or global economic conditions, including, but not limited to the health of the financial
institutions in a country or region. See Note 22 (Settlement and Other Risk Management)  to the conso lidated financial statements in
Part II, Item 8 for a description of these guarantees.
Our liquidity and access to capital could also be negatively impacted by the outcome of any of the legal or regulatory proceedings to
which we are a party . For additional discussion  of these and other risks facing our business, see Part I, Item 1A - Risk Factors -
Legal and Regulatory Risks and Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the cons olidated financial statements included in
Part II, Item 8; and Part II, Item 7 (Business Environment).
Cash Flow
The table below shows a summary of the cash flows from operating, investing and financing activities for the years ended
December 31 :
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Net cash provided by operating activities $8,183 $6,223 $5,664
Net cash used in investing activities (1,640 ) (506) (1,781 )
Net cash used in financing activities (5,867 ) (4,966 ) (4,764 )
Net cash provided by operating activities increased $2.0 billion in 2019  versu s the prior year, primarily due to higher net income as
adjusted for non-cash items.
Net cash used in investing activities increased $1.1 billion in 2019  versus the prior year, primarily due to acquisitions and purchases
of equity investments, partially offset by higher net proceeds from our investments in available-for-sale and held-to-maturity
securities.
Net cash used in financi ng activities increased $901 million  in 2019  versus the prior year, primarily due to higher repurchases of our
Class A common stock, higher dividends paid and the settlement of the contingent cons ideration attributable to our 2017
acquisitions, partially of fset by higher net debt proceeds in the current period.
Debt and Credit Availability
In May 2019, we issued $1.0 billion  principal amount of notes due June 2029 and $1.0 billion  principal amount of notes due June
2049 and in December 2019, we issued $750 million  principal amount of notes due March 2025. Additionally , during 2019, $500
million  of principal related to the 2014 USD Notes matured and was paid. Our total debt outstanding was $8.5 billion  at
December 31, 2019 , with the earliest maturity of $650 million  of principal occurring in November 2021.
As of December 31, 2019 , we have a commercial paper program (the “Com mercial Paper Program”), under which we are authorized
to issue up to $6 billion  in outstanding notes, with maturities up to 397 days from the date of issuance. In conjunction  with the
Commercial Paper Program, we have a committ ed unsecured $6 billion revolving credit facility (the “Credit Facility”) which expires in
November 2024.
Borrowings under the Commercial Paper Program and the Credit Facility are to provide liquidity for general corporate purposes,
including providing liquidity in the event of one or more settlement failures by our customers. In addition, we may borrow and repay
amounts under these facilities for business continuity purposes. We had no borrowings outstanding under the Commercial Paper
Program or the Credit Facility at December 31, 2019 .
See Note 15 (Debt)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion on our debt, the
Commercial Paper Program and the Credit Facility .
Dividends and Share Repurchases
We have historically paid quarterly dividends on our outstanding Class A common stock and Class B common stock. Subject to
legally availa ble funds, we intend to continue to pay a quarterly cash dividend. However , the declaration and payment of future
dividends is at the sole discretion of our Board of Directors after taking into account various facto rs, including our financial condition,
operating
50 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
results, available cash and current and anticipated cash needs. The following table summarizes the annual, per share dividends paid
in the years reflected:
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2019 2018  2017
 (in millions, except per share data)
Cash dividend, per share $ 1.32 $ 1.00  $ 0.88
Cash dividends paid $ 1,345 $ 1,044  $ 942
On December 4, 2019, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.40  per share paid on February 7, 2020 to
holders of record on January 9, 2020 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock. The aggregate amount of this
dividend was $403 million .
On February 4, 2020, our Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $0.40  per share payable on May 8, 2020 to
holders of record on April 9, 2020 of our Class A common stock and Class B common stock. The aggregate amount of this dividend
is estimated to be $402 million .
Repurchased shares of our common stock are considered treasury stock. The timing and actual number of additional shares
repurchased will depend on a variety of factors, including the operating needs of the busin ess, legal requirements, price and
economic and market conditions. In December 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , our Board of Directors approved share repurch ase programs
authorizing us to repurch ase up to $8.0 billion, $6.5 billion and $4.0 billion, respe ctively , of our Class A common stock. The program
approved in 2019 became effective in January  2020 after completion of the share repurchase  program authorized in 2018. The
following table summarizes our share repurchase authorizations of our Class A common stock through December 31, 2019 , under
the plans approved in 2018 and 2017:
  (in millions, except per share
data)
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2018  $ 6,801
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2019  $ 6,497
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2019  $ 8,304
Shares repurchased in 2019  26.4
Average price paid per share in 2019  $ 245.89
See Note 16 (Stockholders' Equity)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We have no of f-balance sheet debt, other than the commitments presented in the Future Obligations table that follows.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 51
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Future Obligations
The following table summ arizes our obligations as of December 31, 2019  that are expected to impact liquidity and cash flow in future
periods. W e believe we will be able to fund these obligations through cash generated from operations and our cash balances.
  Payments Due by Period
  2020  2021 - 2022 2023 - 2024 2025 and
thereafter Total
  (in millions)
Debt  $ — $ 1,435 $ 1,000  $ 6,165  $ 8,600
Interest on debt  242  470 423  2,235  3,370
Operating leases 1  112  216 169  376  873
Other obligations      
Sponsorship, licensing and other  404  356 59 — 819
Employee benefits  2  62 50 48 113  273
Transition Tax 3  — 89 227  161  477
Redeemable non-controlling interests 4  76 — — — 76
Total 5  $ 896  $ 2,616 $ 1,926  $ 9,050  $ 14,488
1 Amounts relate to the maturity of our operating lease liabilities. See Note 10 (Property, Equipment and Right-of-Use Assets) to the consolidated
financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.  
2 Amounts relate to severance along with expected funding requirements for defined benefit pension and postretirement plans.
3 Amounts relate to the U.S. tax liability on the Transition Tax on accumulated non-U.S. earnings of U.S entities. See Note 20 (Income Taxes) to the
consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
4 Amount relates to the fixed-price put option for the Vocalink remaining shareholders to sell their ownership interest to Mastercard on the third and
fifth anniversaries of the transaction and quarterly thereafter. See Note 2 (Acquisitions) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II,
Item 8 for further discussion.
5 The table does not include the following:
•Payment related to a definitive agreement to acquire the majority of the Corporate Services business of Nets Denmark A/S, for €2.85 billion
(approximately $3.19 billion as of December 31, 2019) as the transaction is subject to regulatory approval and other customary closing
conditions. See Note 2 (Acquisitions) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
•Liability for unrecognized tax benefits of $203 million as of December 31, 2019. These amounts have been excluded from the table since the
settlement period of this liability cannot be reasonably estimated and the timing of these payments will depend on the progress of tax
examinations with the various authorities. See Note 20 (Income Taxes) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for
further discussion.
•Litigation provision of $914 million as of December 31, 2019 as the timing of payments is not fixed and determinable. See Note 21 (Legal and
Regulatory Proceedings) to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
•Future cash payments that will become due to customers and merchants under business agreements as the amounts due are contingent on
future performance. We have accrued $4.8 billion as of December 31, 2019 related to these customer and merchant agreements.
Critical Accounting Estimates
The applicat ion of GAAP  requires us to make estimates and assumptions about certain items and future events that directly affect
our reported financial condition. Our significant accounting policies, including recent accounting pronouncements, are described in
Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Revenue Recognition - Rebates and Incentives
We enter into business agreements with certain customers that provide for rebates or support when customers meet certain volume
thresholds as well as other support incentives, which are tied to customer performance. We consider various factors in estimating
customer performance, including forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion volumes, expected payments and
historical experience with that customer . Rebat es and incentives are recorded as a reduction to gross revenue based on these
estimates primarily when volume- and transaction - based revenues are recognized over the contractual term. Differences between
actual results and our estimates are adjusted in the period the customer reports actual performance. If our customers’  actual
performance is not consistent with our estimates of their performance, net revenue may be materially dif ferent.
52 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Loss Contingencies
We are currently involve d in various claims and legal proceedings. We regularly review the status of each significant matter and
assess its potential financial exposure. If the potential loss from any claim or legal proceedi ng is considered probable and the
amount can be reasona bly estimated, we accrue a liability for the estimated loss. Significan t judgment is required in both the
determination of probability and whether an expo sure is reasonably estimable. Our judgments are subjective based on the status of
the legal or regulatory proceedings, the merits of our defenses and consultation with in-house and outside legal counsel. Because of
uncertainties related to these matters, accruals are based only on the best information available at the time. As additional information
becomes available, we reassess the potential liability related to pending claims and litigation and may revise our estimates. Due to
the inherent uncertaintie s of the legal and regula tory process in the multiple jurisdictions in which we operate, our judgments may be
materially different than the actual outcomes. See Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  to the consolidated financial
statements included in Part II, Item 8 for further discussion.
Income T axes
In calculatin g our effective income tax rate, we need to make estimates regarding the timing and amount of taxable and deductible
items which  will adjust the pretax income earned in various tax jurisdictions. Through our interpretation of local tax regulations,
adjustments to pretax income for income earned in various tax jurisdictions are reflected within various tax filings. Although we
believe that our estimates and judgments discussed herein are reasonable, actual results may be materially different than the
estimated amounts.
We record a valuation allowance to reduce our deferred tax assets to the amount that is more likely than not to be realized.
Significant judgment is required in determining the valuation allowance. We consider projected future taxable income and ongoing
tax planning strategies in assessing the need for the valuation allowance. If it is determined that we are able to realize deferred tax
assets in excess of the net carrying value or to the extent we are unable to realize a deferr ed tax asset, we would adjust the
valuation allowance in the period in which such a determination is made, with a corresponding increase or decrease to earnings.
We record tax liabilities for uncertain tax positions taken, or expected to be taken, which may not be sustained or may only be
partially sustained, upon examination by the relevant taxing authorities. We consider all relevan t facts and current authorities in the
tax law in assessing whether any benefit resulting from an uncertain tax position is more likely than not to be sustained and, if so,
how current law impacts the amount reflected within these financial statements. If upon examination, we realize a tax benefit which
is not fully sustained or is more favorably sustained, this would decrease or increase earnings in the period. In certain situations, we
will have of fsetting tax credits or taxes in other jurisdictions.
Deferred taxes are established on the estimated foreign exchange gains or losses for foreign  earnings that are not considered
permanently reinvested, which will be recognize d through cumulative translation adjustments as incurred. Ultimately , the working
capital requirements of foreign af filiates will determine the amount of cash to be remitted from respective jurisdictions.
Business Combinations
We account for our business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting. The acqu isition purchase price is allocated to
the underlying identified, tangible and intangible assets, liabilities assumed and any non-controlling interest in the acquiree, based
on their respective estimated fair values on the acquisition date. Any excess of purchase price over the fair value of net assets
acquired, including identifiable intangible assets, is recorded as goodwill. The amounts and useful lives assigned to acquisition-
related tangible and intangible assets impact the amount and timing of future amortization expense. We use various valuation
techniques to determine fair value, primarily discounted cash flows analysis, relief-from-royalty and multi-period excess earnings for
estimating the value of intangible assets. Thes e valuation techniques included comparable company multiples, discount rates,
growth projections and other assumptions of future business conditions. Determining the fair value of assets acquired, liabilities
assumed, any non-controlling interest in the acquiree and the expected useful lives, requires management’ s judgment. The
significance of management’ s estimates and assumptions is relative to the size of the acquisition. Our estimates are based upon
assumptions believed to be reasonable, but which are inherently uncertain and unpredictable.
Item 7A. Quantitative and qualitative disclosures about market risk
Market risk is the potent ial for economic losses to be incurred on market risk sensitive instruments arising from adverse changes in
factors such as interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. Our exposure to market risk from changes in interest rates and
foreign exchange rates is limited. Management monitors risk exposures on an ongoing basis and establishes and oversees the
implementation of policies governing our funding, investments and use of derivative financial instruments to manage these risks.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 53
PART II
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
Foreign currency and interest rate exposures are managed through our risk management activities, which are discussed further in
Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments)  to the consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8.
Foreign Exchange Risk
We enter into foreign exchange derivative contracts to manage transactional currency exposure associated with anticipated receipts
and disburse ments occurring in a currency other than the functional currency of the entity . We may also enter into foreign currency
derivative contracts to offset possible changes in value of assets and liabilities due to foreign exchange fluctuations. The objective of
these activities is to reduce our exposure to transaction gains and losses resulting from fluctuatio ns of foreign currencies against our
functional and reporting currencies, principally the U.S. dollar and euro. The effect of a hypothetical 10% adverse change in foreign
exchange rates could result in a fair value loss of approximately $144 million and $113 million on our foreign exchang e derivative
contracts outstanding at December 31, 2019  and 2018 , respectively , related to the hedging program.
We are also subject to foreign exchange risk as part of our daily settlement activities. To manage this risk, we enter into foreign
exchange contracts based upon anticipated receipts and disbursements for the respective currency position. This risk is typically
limited to a few days between the timing of when a payment transaction takes place and the subsequent settlement with our
customers.
Interest Rate Risk
During the fourth quarte r of 2019, we entered into interest rate derivative contracts that were designated as cash flow hedges in
order to manage our exposure to interest rate changes on future forecasted debt issuances. At December 31, 2019 , the total
notional amount of these contracts was $1 billion . The maximum length of time over which we have hedged our exposure to the
variability in future cash flows is 30 years. The effect of a hypothetical 100 basis point adverse change in interest rates could result in
a fair value loss of approximately $168 million on our interest rate derivative contracts outstanding at December 31, 2019 . There
were no similar contracts outstanding as of December 31, 2018 .
In addition, our availab le-for-sale debt investments include fixed and variable rate securities  that are sensitive to interest rate
fluctuations. Our policy is to invest in high quality securities, while providing adequate liquidity and maintaining diversification to
avoid significant exposure. A hypothetical 100 basis point adverse change in interest rates would not have a material impact on our
investments at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
54 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Item 8. Financial statements and supplementary data
Mastercard Incorporated
Index to consolidated financial statements
 Page
  As of December 31, 2019 and 2018 and for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
 Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting 56
 Report of independent registered public accounting firm 57
 Consolidated Statement of Operations 59
 Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income 60
 Consolidated Balance Sheet 61
 Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity 62
 Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows 64
 Notes to consolidated financial statements 65
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 55
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Management’ s report on internal control over financial reporting
The management of Mastercard Incorporated (“Mastercard”) is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal
control over financial reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance
regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America. Because of its inherent limitations,
internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. As required by Section 404 of the Sarbanes-Oxley
Act of 2002, management has assessed the effectiveness of Mastercard’ s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019 . In making its assessm ent, management has utilized the criteria set forth in Internal Control - Integrated
Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). Management has
concluded that, based on its assessment, Mast ercard’ s internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31,
2019 . The effectiveness of Mastercard’ s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019  has been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in their report which appears on the next
page.
56 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of Mastercard Incorporated:
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidate d balance sheets of Mastercard Incorporated and its subsidiaries (the “Company”)
as of December 31, 2019 and 2018  and the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, changes in
equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019 , including the related notes (collectively
referred to as the “conso lidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’ s internal control over financial reporting
as of December 31, 2019 , base d on criteria established in Internal Contro l - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee
of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO).
In our opinion, the conso lidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of
the Compan y as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 , and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2019  in conformity with acco unting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019 , based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’ s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financia l reporting,  and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the
accompanying Management’ s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express opinions on the
Company’ s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’ s internal control over financia l reporting based on our audits. We
are a public accounting  firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board  (United States) (PCAOB) and are
required to be independe nt with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules
and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit s in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether ef fective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessin g the risk that a material weakness
exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk. Our audits
also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audits
provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’ s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’ s internal control over financial reporting includes those policie s and procedures that (i) pertain to
the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’ s assets that
could have a material ef fect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections
of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may beco me inadequate because of changes
in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 57
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relates to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below , providing a separate opinion on the
critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Revenue Recognition - Rebates and Incentives
As described in Notes 1 and 3 to the consolida ted financial statements, the Company provides certain customers with rebates or
incentives which totaled  $8.1 billion for the year ended December 31, 2019. The Company has business agreements with certain
customers that provide for rebates or other support when customers meet certain volume hurdles as well as other support
incentives, which are tied to performance. Rebates and incentives are recorded as a reductio n to gross revenue primarily when
volume- and transaction-based revenues are recognized over the contractual term. Rebates and incentives are calculated based
upon estimated customer performance and the terms of the related business agreements. Management considers various factors in
estimating customer performance, including forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion volumes, expected
payments and historical experience with that customer .
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to rebates and incentives is a critical audit
matter was the significant judgment of management when developing estimates related to rebates and incentives based on
customer performance. This in turn led to a high degree of auditor judgment, subjectivity and effort in performing procedures and
evaluating management’ s estimates related to customer performance and the reasonablene ss of assumptions related to the
forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion volumes, expected payments and historical experience with that
customer .
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall opinion
on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to customer
rebates and incentives,  including controls over evaluating customer performance based upon historical experience with that
customer , forecasted transactions, card issuance and card conversion volumes and expected payments. These procedures also
included, among others, evaluating the reasona bleness of estimated customer performance for a sample of customer agreements,
including (i) evaluating rebate and incentive contracts to identify whether all incentives are identified and recorded accurately; (ii)
testing mana gement’ s process for developing the estimated customer performance, including evaluating the reasonableness of the
assumptions related to the forecasted transactio ns, card issuance and card conversion volumes, expected payments and historical
customer experience; and (iii) evaluating the estimated customer performance as compared to actual results in the period the
customer reports actual performance.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
New York, New York
February 14, 2020
We have served as the Company’ s auditor since 1989.
58 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Operations      
  For the Years Ended December 31,
  2019  2018 2017
  (in millions, except per share data)
Net Revenue  $ 16,883  $ 14,950 $ 12,497
Operating Expenses      
General and administrative  5,763  5,174 4,653
Advertising and marketing  934  907 771
Depreciation and amortization  522  459 436
Provision for litigation  — 1,128 15
Total operating expenses  7,219  7,668 5,875
Operating income  9,664  7,282 6,622
Other Income (Expense)      
Investment income  97 122 56
Gains (losses) on equity investments, net  167  — —
Interest expense  (224) (186) (154)
Other income (expense), net  27 (14) (2)
Total other income (expense)  67 (78) (100)
Income before income taxes  9,731  7,204 6,522
Income tax expense  1,613  1,345 2,607
Net Income  $ 8,118  $ 5,859 $ 3,915
Basic Earnings per Share  $ 7.98  $ 5.63 $ 3.67
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding  1,017  1,041 1,067
Diluted Earnings per Share  $ 7.94  $ 5.60 $ 3.65
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding  1,022  1,047 1,072
      
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 59
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Comprehensive Income   
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Net Income $8,118 $5,859 $3,915
Other comprehensive income (loss):   
Foreign currency translation adjustments 10 (319) 565
Income tax ef fect 13 40 2
Foreign currency translation adjustments, net of income tax ef fect 23 (279) 567
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge 36 96 (236)
Income tax ef fect (8) (21) 83
Translation adjustments on net investment hedge, net of income tax ef fect 28 75 (153)
Cash flow hedges 14 — —
Income tax ef fect (3) — —
Cash flow hedges, net of income tax ef fect 11 — —
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans (22) (18) 15
Income tax ef fect 3 3 (1)
Defined benefit pension and other postretirement plans, net of income tax ef fect (19) (15) 14
Investment securities available-for-sale 3 (3) (3)
Income tax ef fect (1) 1 2
Investment securities available-for-sale, net of income tax ef fect 2 (2) (1)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of income tax ef fect 45 (221) 427
Comprehensive Income $8,163 $5,638 $4,342
   
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
60 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Balance Sheet  
 December 31,
 2019 2018
 (in millions, except per share data)
Assets  
Current assets:  
Cash and cash equivalents $ 6,988 $ 6,682
Restricted cash for litigation settlement 584 553
Investments 688 1,696
Accounts receivable 2,514 2,276
Settlement due from customers 2,995 2,452
Restricted security deposits held for customers 1,370 1,080
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,763 1,432
Total current assets 16,902 16,171
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net 1,828 921
Deferred income taxes 543 570
Goodwill 4,021 2,904
Other intangible assets, net 1,417 991
Other assets 4,525 3,303
Total Assets $ 29,236 $ 24,860
Liabilities, Redeemable Non-controlling Interests and Equity  
Current liabilities:  
Accounts payable $ 489 $ 537
Settlement due to customers 2,714 2,189
Restricted security deposits held for customers 1,370 1,080
Accrued litigation 914 1,591
Accrued expenses 5,489 4,747
Current portion of long-term debt — 500
Other current liabilities 928 949
Total current liabilities 11,904 11,593
Long-term debt 8,527 5,834
Deferred income taxes 85 67
Other liabilities 2,729 1,877
Total Liabilities 23,245 19,371
Commitments and Contingencies
Redeemable Non-controlling Interests 74 71
Stockholders’  Equity  
Class A common stock, $0.0001 par value; authorized 3,000 shares, 1,391 and 1,387 shares
issued and 996 and 1,019 outstanding, respectively — —
Class B common stock, $0.0001 par value; authorized 1,200 shares, 11 and 12 issued and
outstanding, respectively — —
Additional paid-in-capital 4,787 4,580
Class A treasury stock, at cost, 395 and 368 shares, respectively (32,205 ) (25,750 )
Retained earnings 33,984 27,283
Accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) (673) (718)
Mastercard Incorporated Stockholders' Equity 5,893 5,395
Non-controlling interests 24 23
Total Equity 5,917 5,418
Total Liabilities, Redeemable Non-controlling Interests and Equity $ 29,236 $ 24,860
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 61
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity
 Stockholders’ Equity   
   
Common Stock Additional
Paid-In
CapitalClass A
Treasury
Stock Retained
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Mastercard
Incorporated
Stockholders'
EquityNon-
Controlling
InterestsTotal
Equity   Class AClass B 
  (in millions, except per share data)
Balance at
December 31,
2016  $ — $ — $4,183 $(17,021 ) $19,418 $ (924)$ 5,656 $ 28 $5,684
Net income  — — — — 3,915 — 3,915 — 3,915
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests  — — — — — — — 1 1
Redeemable non-
controlling
interest
adjustments  — — — — (2) — (2) — (2)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss)  — — — — — 427 427 — 427
Dividends  — — — — (967) — (967) — (967)
Purchases of
treasury stock  — — — (3,747 ) — — (3,747 ) — (3,747 )
Share-based
payments  — — 182 4 — — 186 — 186
Balance at
December 31,
2017  — — 4,365 (20,764 ) 22,364 (497) 5,468 29 5,497
Adoption of
revenue standard  — — — — 366 — 366 — 366
Adoption of intra-
entity asset
transfers standard  — — — — (183) — (183) — (183)
Net income  — — — — 5,859 — 5,859 — 5,859
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests  — — — — — — — (6) (6)
Redeemable non-
controlling
interest
adjustments  — — — — (3) — (3) — (3)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss)  — — — — — (221) (221) — (221)
Dividends  — — — — (1,120 ) — (1,120 ) — (1,120 )
Purchases of
treasury stock  — — — (4,991 ) — — (4,991 ) — (4,991 )
Share-based
payments  — — 215 5 — — 220 — 220
Balance at
December 31,
2018  — — 4,580 (25,750 ) 27,283 (718) 5,395 23 5,418
        
62 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Changes in Equity (Continued)
 Stockholders’ Equity  
  
Common Stock Additional
Paid-In
Capital Class A
Treasury
StockRetained
Earnings Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)Mastercard
Incorporated
Stockholders'
Equity  Non-
Controlling
InterestsTotal
Equity  Class A Class B
 (in millions, except per share data)
Balance at
December 31,
2018 — — 4,580  (25,750 )27,283  (718) 5,395  23 5,418
Net income   8,118  8,118  — 8,118
Activity related to
non-controlling
interests — — — —  — — 1 1
Redeemable non-
controlling interest
adjustments — — — — (9) — (9) — (9)
Other
comprehensive
income (loss) — — — — — 45 45 — 45
Dividends — — — — (1,408 ) — (1,408 ) — (1,408 )
Purchases of
treasury stock — — — (6,463 ) — — (6,463 ) — (6,463 )
Share-based
payments — — 207  8 — — 215  — 215
Balance at
December 31,
2019 $ — $ — $4,787  $(32,205 )$33,984  $ (673)$ 5,893  $ 24 $5,917
         
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 63
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statement of Cash Flows
 For the Years Ended December 31,
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Operating Activities    
Net income $8,118 $5,859 $3,915
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:    
Amortization of customer and merchant incentives 1,141 1,235 1,001
Depreciation and amortization 522 459 437
(Gains) losses on equity investments, net (167) — —
Share-based compensation 250 196 176
Deferred income taxes (7) (244) 86
Venezuela charge — — 167
Other 24 31 59
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:    
Accounts receivable (246) (317) (445)
Income taxes receivable (202) (120) (8)
Settlement due from customers (444) (1,078) (281)
Prepaid expenses (1,661) (1,769) (1,402)
Accrued litigation and legal settlements (662) 869 (12)
Restricted security deposits held for customers 290 (6) 94
Accounts payable (42) 101 290
Settlement due to customers 477 849 394
Accrued expenses 657 439 589
Long-term taxes payable 2 (20) 577
Net change in other assets and liabilities 133 (261) 27
Net cash provided by operating activities 8,183 6,223 5,664
Investing Activities    
Purchases of investment securities available-for-sale (643) (1,300) (714)
Purchases of investments held-to-maturity (215) (509) (1,145)
Proceeds from sales of investment securities available-for-sale 1,098 604 304
Proceeds from maturities of investment securities available-for-sale 376 379 500
Proceeds from maturities of investments held-to-maturity 383 929 1,020
Purchases of property and equipment (422) (330) (300)
Capitalized software (306) (174) (123)
Purchases of equity investments (467) (91) (147)
Acquisition of businesses, net of cash acquired (1,440) — (1,175)
Other investing activities (4) (14) (1)
Net cash used in investing activities (1,640) (506) (1,781)
Financing Activities    
Purchases of treasury stock (6,497) (4,933) (3,762)
Dividends paid (1,345) (1,044) (942)
Proceeds from debt 2,724 991 —
Payment of debt (500) — (64)
Contingent consideration paid (199) — —
Tax withholdings related to share-based payments (161) (80) (47)
Cash proceeds from exercise of stock options 126 104 57
Other financing activities (15) (4) (6)
Net cash used in financing activities (5,867) (4,966) (4,764)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents (44) (6) 200
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents 632 745 (681)
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents - beginning of period 8,337 7,592 8,273
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents - end of period $8,969 $8,337 $7,592
    
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
64 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Notes to consolidated financial statements
Note 1. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Organization
Mastercard Incorporate d and its consolidated subsidiaries, including Mastercard International Incorporated (“Mastercard
International” and together with Mastercard Incorporated, “Mastercard” or the “Company”), is a technology company in the global
payments industry that connects consumers, financial institutions, merchants, governments, digital partners, businesses and other
organizations worldwide, enabling them to use electronic forms of payment instead of cash and checks. The Company makes
payments easier and more efficient by providing  a wide range of payment solutions and services through its family of well-known
brands, including Mastercard®, Maestro® and Cirrus®. The Company is a multi-rail network that offers customers one partner to
turn to for their domestic and cross-border paym ent needs. Through its unique and proprietary global payments network, which is
referred to as the core network, the Company switches (authorizes, clears and settles) payment transactions and delivers related
products and services. Mastercard has additional payment capabilities that include automated clearing house (“ACH”) transactions
(both batch and real-tim e account-based payments). The Company also provides integrated value-added offerings such as cyber
and intelligence products, information and analytics services, consulting, loyalty and reward programs and processing. The
Company’ s payment solutions offer customers choice and flexibility and are designed to ensure safety and security for the global
payments system.
A typical transaction on the Company’ s core network involves four participants in addition to the Company: account holder (a person
or entity who holds a card or uses another device enabled for payment), issuer (the account holder ’s financial institution), merchant
and acquirer  (the merchant’ s financial institution). The Company does not issue cards, extend credit, determine or receive revenue
from interest rates or other fees charged to account holders by issuers, or establish the rates charged by acquirers in connection
with merchants’  acceptance of the Company’ s products. In most cases, account holder relationsh ips belong to, and are managed by,
the Company’ s financial institution customers.
Significant Accounting Policies
Consolidation and basis of presentation  - The consolidated finan cial statements include the accounts of Mastercard and its majority-
owned and controlled entities, including any variable interest entities (“VIEs”) for which the Company is the primary beneficiary .
Investments in VIEs for which the Company is not considered the primary beneficiary are not consolidated and are accounted for as
equity metho d or measurement alternative method investments and recorded in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet.  At
December 31, 2019 and 2018 , there were no significant VIEs which required consolidation and the investments were not consi dered
material to the consolidated financial statements . The Company consolidates acquisitions as of the date in which the Company has
obtained a controlling financial interest. Intercom pany transactions and balances have been eliminated in consolidation. Certain prior
period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the 2019 presentation. The Company follows accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America (“GAAP”).
Prior to December 31, 2017, the Company includ ed the financial results from its Venezuela subsidiaries in the consolidated financial
statements using the consolidation method of accounting. In 2017, due to foreign exchange regulations restricting access to U.S.
dollars in Venezuela, an other-than-temporary lack of exchangeability between the Venezuelan bolivar and U.S. dollar impacted the
Company’ s ability to manage risk, process cross-border transactions and satisfy U.S. dollar denominated liabilities related to
operations in Venezuela.  As a result of these factors, Mastercard concluded that effective December 31, 2017, it did not meet the
accounting criteria for consolidation of these Venezuelan subsidiaries, and therefore would transition to the measurement alternative
method of accounting as of December 31, 2017. This accounting change resulted in a pre-tax charge of $167 million  ($108 million
after tax or $0.10 per diluted share) that was recorded in genera l and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of
operations for the year ended December 31, 2017.
Non-controlling interests represent the equity interest not owned by the Company and are recorded for consolidated entities in which
the Company owns less than 100% of the interests. Changes in a parent’ s ownership interest while the parent retains its controlling
interest are accounted for as equity transactions,  and upon loss of control, retained ownership interests are remeasured at fair value,
with any gain or loss recognized in earnings. For 2019, 2018 and 2017 , net losses from non-co ntrolling interests were not material
and, as a result, amounts are included on the consolidated statement of operations within other income (expense).
Use of estimates  - The preparation of financial statements in conformity with GAAP  requires management to make estimates and
assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of
the financial statements and the reported amou nts of revenue and expenses during the reporti ng periods. Future events and their
effects cannot be predicted with certainty; accordingly , accounting estimates require the exercise of judgment. The accounting
estimates used in the preparation of the Compa ny’s consolidated financial statements may change as new events occur , as more
experience is
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 65
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
acquired, as additional information is obtained and as the Company’ s operating environment changes. Actual results may differ from
these estimates.
Revenue recognition  - Revenue is recognized to depict the transfer of promised goods or services to customers in an amount that
reflects the consideration to which the Compan y expects to be entitled to in exchange for those goods or services. Revenue is
primarily generated by charging fees to issuers, acquirers and other stakeholders for providing switching services, as well as by
assessing customers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity , or gross dollar volume, on the products that carry the
Company’ s brands. Revenue is generally derive d from transactional information accumulated by Mastercard’ s systems or reported
by customers.
Volume-based revenue (domestic assessments and cross-border volume fees) is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned,
which is when the related volume is generated on the cards. Certain volume-based revenue is based upon information reported by
customers. Transaction-based revenue (transaction processing) is primarily based on the number and type of transactions and is
recognized as revenue in the same period in which the related transactions occur . Other payment-related products and services are
recognized as revenue in the period in which the related services are performed or transactions occur .
Mastercard has business agreements with certain customers that provide for rebates or other support when the customers meet
certain volum e hurdles as well as other support incentives, which are tied to performance. Rebates and incentives are recorded as a
reduction of gross revenue primarily when volume- and transaction-based revenues are recognized over the contractual term.
Rebates and incentives are calculated based upon estimated customer performance and the terms of the related business
agreements. In addition, Mastercard may make payments to a customer directly related to entering into an agreement, which are
generally capitalized and amortized over the life of the agreement on a straight-line basis.
Contract assets include unbilled consideration typically resulting from executed data analytic and consulting services performed for
customers in connection  with Mastercard’ s payment network service arrangements. Collection  for these services typically occurs
over the contractual term. Contract assets are included in prepaid expenses and other current assets and other assets on the
consolidated balance sheet.
The Company defers the recognition of revenue when consideration has been received prior to the satisfaction of performance
obligations. As these performance obligations are satisfied, revenue is subsequently recogni zed. Deferred revenue is primarily
derived from data analytic and consulting service s. Deferred revenue is included in other current  liabilities and other liabilities on the
consolidated balance sheet.
Business combinations  - The Company accounts for business comb inations under the acquisition method of accounting. The
Company measures the tangible and intangible identifiable assets acquired, liabilities assumed and any non-controlling interest in
the acquiree, at fair value as of the acquisition date. Acquisition-related costs are expensed as incurred and are included in general
and adminis trative expe nses. Any excess purch ase price over the fair value of net assets acquired, including identifiable intangible
assets, is recorded as goodwill.  Measureme nt period adjustments, if any, to the preliminary estimated fair value of the intangibles
assets as of the acquisition date will be recorded in goodwill.
Goodwill and other intangible assets  - Indefinite-lived intangible assets consist of goodwill, which represents the synergies expected
to arise after the acquisi tion date and the assembled workforce, and customer relationships. Finite-lived intangible assets consist of
capitalized software costs, trademarks, tradenames, customer relationships and other intangible  assets. Intangible assets with finite
useful lives are amortiz ed over their estimate d useful lives, on a straight-line basis, which  range from one to twenty years .
Capitalized software includes internal and extern al costs incurred directly related to the design, development and testing phases of
each capitalized software project.
Impairment of assets - Goodwill and indefinite -lived intangible assets are not amortized but tested annually for impa irment at the
reporting unit level in the fourth quarter , or sooner when circumstances indicate an impair ment may exist.  The impairment
evaluation for goodwill utilizes a qualitative assessment to determine whether it is more likely than not that goodwill is impaired. The
qualitative factors may include, but are not limited to, macroeconomic conditions, industry  and market conditions, operating
environment, financial performance and other relevant events. If it is determined that it is more likely than not that goodwill is
impaired, then the Com pany is required to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. If the fair value of a reporting unit
exceeds the carrying value, goodwill is not impaired. If the fair value of the reporting unit is less than its carrying value, then goodwill
is impaired and the excess of the reporting unit’ s carrying value over the fair value is recognized as an impairment charge.
The impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets consists of a qualitative assessment to evaluate relevant events and
circumstances that could affect the significant inputs used to determine the fair value of indefinite-lived intangible assets.  If the
qualitative assessment indicates that it is more likely than not that indefinite-lived intangible assets are impaired, then a quantitative
assessment is required. 
Long-lived assets, other than goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets, are tested for impairment whenever events or
circumstances indicate that their carrying amount may not be recoverable. If the carrying value of the asset cannot be recovered
from estimated
66 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
future cash flows, undiscounted and without interest, the fair value of the asset is calculated using the present value of estimated net
future cash flows. If the carrying amount of the asset exceeds its fair value, an impairment is recorded.
Impairment charges, if any , are recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Litigation  - The Company is a party to certain legal and regulatory proceedings with respect to a variety  of matters. The Company
evaluates the likelihood of an unfavorable outco me of all legal or regulatory proceedings to which it is a party and accrues a loss
contingency when the loss is probable and reasonably estimable. Loss contingencies are recorded in provision for litigation on the
consolidated statement of operations. These judgments are subjective based on the status of the legal or regulatory proceedings,
the merits of its defense s and consultation with in-house and external legal counsel. Legal costs are expensed as incurred and
recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Settlement and other risk management  - Mastercard’ s rules guarantee the settlement of many of the transactions between its
customers. Settlement exposure is the outstanding settlement risk to customers under Masterc ard’s rules due to the difference in
timing between the paym ent transaction date and subsequent settlement. While the term and amount of the guarantee are unlimited,
the duration of settlement exposure is short term and typically limited to a few days.
The Compan y also enters into agreements in the ordinary course of business under which the Company agrees to indemnify third
parties again st damages, losses and expenses incurred in connection with legal and other proceedings arising from relationships or
transactions with the Company . As the extent of the Company’ s obligations under these agreements depends entirely upon the
occurrence of future events, the Company’ s potential future liability under these agreements is not determinable.
The Company accounts for each of its guarantees by recording the guarantee at its fair value at the inception or modification date
through earnings.
Income taxes - The Company follows an asset and liability based approach in accounting for income taxes as required under GAAP .
Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recorded to reflect the tax consequences on future years of temporary differences
between the financial statement carrying amounts and income tax bases of assets and liabilities. Deferred income taxes are
displayed separately as noncurrent assets and liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. Valuation allowances are provided
against assets which are not more likely than not to be realized. The Company recognizes all material tax positions, including
uncertain tax positions in which it is more likely than not that the position will be sustained based on its technical merits and if
challenged by the relevant taxing authorities. At each balance sheet date, unresolved uncertain tax positions are reassessed to
determine whether subsequent developments require a change in the amount of recognized tax benefit. The allowance for uncertain
tax positions is recorded in other current and noncurrent liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company records interest
expense related to income tax matters as interest expense on the consolidated statement of operations. The Company includes
penalties related to income tax matters in the income tax provision.
Cash and cash equivale nts - Cash and cash equivalents include certain investments with daily liquidity and with an original maturity
of three months or less from the date of purchase. Cash equivalents are recorded at cost, which approximates fair value.
Restricted cash - The Comp any classifie s cash and cash equivalents as restricted when it is unavailable for withdrawal or use in its
general operations. The Company has the following types of restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents which are included in
the reconciliation of beginning-of-period and end-of-period amounts shown on the consolidated statement of cash flows:
•Restricted cash for litigation settlement  - The Company has restricted cash for litigation within a qualified settlement fund related
to the settlement agreement for the U.S. merchant class litigation. The funds continue to be restricted for payments until the
litigation matter is resolved.
•Restricted security deposits held for customers  - The Company requires collateral from certain customers for settlement of their
transactions. The majority of collateral for settlement is in the form of standby letters of credit and bank guarantees which are not
recorded on the consolidated balance sheet. Additionally , the Company holds cash deposits and certificates of deposit from
certain customers as collateral for settlement of their transactions, which are recorded as asse ts on the consolidated balance
sheet. These assets are fully offset by corresponding liabilities included on the consolidated balance sheet. These security
deposits are typically held for the duration of the agreement with the customers.
•Other restricted cash balances  - The Company has other restricted cash balances which include contractually restricted deposits,
as well as cash balances that are restricted based on the Company’ s intention with regard to usage. These funds are classified
on the consolidated balance sheet within prepaid expenses and other current assets and other assets.
Fair value - The Comp any measures certain financial assets and liabilities at fair value on a recurring basis by estimating the price
that would be received upon the sale of an asse t or paid to transfer a liability in an orderly transaction between market participants.
The Company classifies these recurring fair value measurements into a three-level hierarchy (“V aluation Hierarchy”).
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 67
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Valuation Hierarchy is based upon the trans parency of inputs to the valuation of an asset or liability as of the measurement date.
A financial instrument’ s categorization within the Valuation Hierarchy is based upon the lowest level of input that is significant to the
fair value measurement. The three levels of the V aluation Hierarchy are as follows: 
•Level 1 - inputs to the valuation methodology are quoted prices (unadjusted) for identical assets or liabilities in active markets
•Level 2 - inputs to the valuation methodology include quoted prices for similar assets and liabilities in active markets, quoted
prices for identical or similar assets and liabilities in inactive markets and inputs that are observable for the asset or liability
•Level 3 - inputs to the valuation methodology are unobservable and cannot be directly corroborated by observable market data
Certain assets are meas ured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis. The Company’ s non-financial assets measured at fair value on a
nonrecurring basis include property , equipment  and right-of-use assets, goodwill and other intangible assets. These assets are
subject to fair value adjustments in certain circumstances, such as when there is evidence of impairment.
The valuation methods for goodwill and other intangible assets acquired in business combinations involve assumptions concerning
comparable company multiples, discount rates , growth projections and other assumptions of future business conditions. The
Company uses various valuation techniques to determine fair value, primarily discounted cash flows analysis, relief-from-royalty , and
multi-period excess earnings for estimating the fair value of its intangible assets. As the assum ptions employed to measure these
assets are based on management’ s judgment using internal and external data, these fair value determinations are classified in Level
3 of the V aluation Hierarchy .
Contingent consideration  - Certain business combinations involve the potential for future payment of consideration that is contingent
upon the achievement of performance mileston es. These liabilities are classified within Level 3 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the
inputs used  to measure fair value are unobservable and require management’ s judgment. The fair value of the contingent
consideration at the acquisition date and subse quent periods is determined utilizing an income approach based on a Monte Carlo
technique and is recorded in other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet. Changes to projected
performance milestones  of the acquired businesses could result in a higher or lower contingent  consideration liability . The changes
in fair value as a resul t of updated assumptions will be recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated
statement of operations.
Investment securities  - The Company classifies investments as available-for-sale or held-to-maturity at the date of acquisition.
•Available-for-sale debt securities:
◦Available-for-sale securi ties that are available to meet the Company’ s current operational needs are classified as current
assets and the securities that are not available for current operational needs are classified as non-current assets on the
consolidated balance sheet.
The investm ents in debt securities are carried at fair value, with unrealized gains and losses , net of tax, recorded as a
separate component of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) on the consolidated statement of comprehensive
income. Net realized gains and losses on debt securities are recognized in investment income on the consolidated statement
of operations. The specific identification method is used to determine realized gains and losses.
The Company evaluates its debt securities for other-than-temporary impairment on an ongoing basis. When there has been
a decline in fair value of a debt security below the amortized cost basis, the Company recogniz es an other-than-temporary
impairment if: (1) it has the intent to sell the security; (2) it is more likely than not that it will be required to sell the security
before recov ery of the amortized cost basis; or (3) it does not expect to recover the entire amortized cost basis of the
security . The credit loss component of the impairment would be recognized in other income (expense), net on the
consolidated statement of operations while the non-credit loss would remain in accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) until realized from a sale or an other-than-temporary impairment.
•Held-to-maturity securities:
◦Time deposits - The Company classifies time deposits with original maturities greater than three months as held-to-maturity .
Held-to-maturity securit ies that mature within one year are classified as current assets within investments on the
consolidated balance sheet while held-to-maturity securities with maturities of greater than one year are classified as non-
current asse ts. Time deposits are carried at amortized cost on the consolidated balance sheet and are intended to be held
until maturity .
68 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Equity investments - The Company holds equity securities of publicly traded and privately held companies.
•Marketable equity securities - Marketable equity securities are strategic investments in publicly traded companies and are
measured at fair value using quoted prices in their respective active markets with changes recorded through gain (losses) on
equity inves tments, net on the consolidated statement of operations. Securities that are not for use in current operations are
classified in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet.
•Nonmarketable equity investments - The Compa ny’s nonmarketable equity investments, which are reported in other assets on
the consolidated balance sheet, include investments in privately held companies without readily determinable market values.
The Compa ny uses discounted cash flows and market assumptions to estimate the fair value of its nonmarketable equity
investments when certain events or circumstan ces indicate that impairment may exist. The Company’ s nonmarketable equity
investments are accounted for under the equity method or measurement alternative method.
◦Equity method - The Company accounts for investments in common stock or in-substance common stock under the equity
method of accounting when it has the ability to exercise significant influence over the investee, generally when it holds
between 20% and 50% ownership in the entity . In addition, investments  in flow-through entities such as limited partnerships
and limited liability comp anies are also accounted for under the equity method when the Compan y has the ability to exercise
significant influence over the investee, generally  when the investment ownership percentage is equal to or greater than 5%
of the outsta nding owne rship interest. The exce ss of the cost over the underlying net equity of investments accounted for
under the equity method is allocated to identifia ble tangible and intangible assets and liabilities based on fair values at the
date of acquisition. The amortization of the exces s of the cost over the underlying net equity of investments and Mastercard’ s
share of net earnings or losses of entities accounted for under the equity method of accounting is included in other income
(expense), net on the consolidated statement of operations.
◦Measurement alternative method - The Company accounts for investments in common stock or in-substance common stock
under the measurement alternative method of accounting when it does not exercise significant influence, generally when it
holds less than 20% ownership in the entity or when the interest in a limited partnership or limited liability company is less
than 5% and the Company has no significant influence over the operation of the investee. Investments  in companies that
Mastercard does not control, but that are not in the form of common stock or in-substance common stock, are also
accounted for under the measurement alternative method of accounting. Measurement alternative investments are
measured at cost, less any impairment and adjusted for changes resulting from observable price changes in orderly
transactions for identical or similar investments of the same issuer . Fair value adjustments, as well as impairments, are
included in gain (losses) on equity investments, net on the consolidated statement of operations.
Derivative and hedging instruments  - The Company’ s deriva tive financial instruments are recorded as either assets or liabilities on
the balance sheet and measured at fair value. The Company’ s foreign exchange and interest rate derivative contracts are included in
Level 2 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the fair value of the contracts are based on inputs, which are observable based on broker
quotes for the same or similar instruments. As the Company does not designate foreign exchange contracts as hedging instruments,
realized and unrealized gains and losses from the change in fair value of the contracts are recog nized immediately in current-period
earnings. The Company’ s foreign exchange contracts are not entered into for trading or speculative purposes.
The Company’ s derivatives that are designated as hedging instruments are required to meet established accounting criteria. In
addition, an effectiveness assessment is require d to demonstrate that the derivative is expected to be highly effective at offsetting
changes in fair value or cash flows of the underly ing exposure both at inception of the hedging relationship and on an ongoing basis.
The method of assessing hedge effectiveness and measuring hedge results is formally documented at hedge inception and
assessed at least quarterly throughout the desig nated hedge period. For cash flow hedges, the fair value adjustments are recorded,
net of tax, in other comprehensive income (loss). Any gains and losses deferred in other comprehensive income (loss) are then
recognized in current-period earnings when earnings are affected by the variability of cash flows of the hedged forecasted
transaction.
The Company has numerous investments in its foreign subsidiaries.  The net assets of these subsidiaries are exposed to volatility in
foreign currency exchange rates.  The Company  uses foreign currency denominated debt to hedge a portion of its net investment in
foreign operations against adverse movements in exchange rates. The effective portion of the foreign currency gains and losses
related to the foreign currency denominated debt are reported in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) on the
consolidated balance sheet as part of the cumulative translation adjustment component of equity . The Company evaluates the
effectiveness of the net investment hedge each quarter .
Settlement due from/due to customers  - The Company operates systems for clearing and settling payment transactions among
customers. Net settleme nts are generally cleared  daily among customers through settlement cash accounts by wire transfer or other
bank clearing means. However , some transactions may not settle until subsequent business days, resulting in amounts due from
and due to customers.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 69
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets  - Property and equipment are stated at cost less accumulated depreciation and
amortization. Depreciatio n and amortization is computed using the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of the assets.
Depreciation of leasehold improvements and amortization of finance leases is included in depreciation and amortization expense on
the consolidated statement of operations. Operating lease amortization expense is included in general and administrative expenses
on the consolidated statement of operations.
The useful lives of the Company’ s assets are as follows:
Asset Category Estimated Useful Life
Buildings 30 years
Building equipment 10 - 15 years
Furniture and fixtures and equipment 3 - 5 years
Leasehold improvements Shorter of life of improvement or lease term
Right-of-use assets Shorter of life of the asset or lease term
The Company determines if a contract is, or contains, a lease at contract inception. The Company’ s right-of-use (“ROU”) assets are
primarily related to operating leases for office space, automobiles and other equipment. Leases are included in property , equipment
and right-of-use assets, other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
ROU assets represent the right to use an underlying asset for the lease term and lease liabilities represent the obligation to make
lease payme nts arising from the lease. ROU assets and lease liabilities are recognized at the commencement date based on the
present value of lease payments over the lease term. In addition, ROU assets include initial direct costs incurred by the lessee as
well as any lease payments made at or before the commencement date, and exclude lease incentives. As most of the Company's
leases do not provide an implicit rate, the Company uses its incremental borrowing rate based on the information available at the
commencement date in determining the present value of lease payments. The incremental borrowing rate is determined by using the
rate of interest that the Company would pay to borrow on a collateralized basis an amount equa l to the lease payments for a similar
term and in a similar economic environment. Lease terms include options to extend or termina te the lease when it is reasonably
certain that the Compan y will exercise that option. Leases with a term of one year or less are excluded from ROU assets and
liabilities.
The Company excludes variable lease payments  in measuring ROU assets and lease liabilities, other than those that depend on an
index, a rate or are in-substance fixed payments. Lease and nonlease components are generally accounted for separately . When
available, consideration is allocated to the separate lease and nonlease components in a lease contract on a relative standalone
price basis using observable standalone prices.
Pension and other postr etirement plans  - The Comp any recogni zes the funded status of its single-employer defined benefit pension
plans and postretirement plans as assets or liabilities on its consolidated balance sheet and recognizes changes in the funded status
in the year in which the changes occur through accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). The funded status is measured as
the difference between the fair value of plan assets and the projected benefit obligation at December 31, the measurement date.
Overfunded plans, if any, are aggregated and recorded in other assets, while underfunded plans are aggregated and recorded as
accrued expenses and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
Net periodic pension and postretirement benefit cost/(income), excluding the service cost component, is recognized in other income
(expense) on the consolidated statement of operations. These costs include interest cost, expected return on plan assets,
amortization of prior service costs or credits and gains or losses previously recognized as a component of accumulated other
comprehensive income  (loss). The service cost component is recognized in general and administrative expenses on the
consolidated statement of operations.
Defined contribution plans  - The Company’ s contri butions to defined contri bution plans are recorded as employees render service to
the Company . The charge is recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Advertising and marketing  - Expenses incurred to promote Mastercard’ s brand, products and services are recognized in advertising
and marketing on the consolidated statement of operations. The timing of recognition is depe ndent on the type of advertising or
marketing expense .
Foreign currency remeasurement and translatio n - Monetary assets and liabilities are remeasur ed to functional currencies using
current exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet date. Non-monetary assets and liabilities are recorded at historical exchange
rates. Revenue and expense accounts are remeasured at the weighted-average exchange rate for the period. Resulting exchange
gains and losses related  to remeasurement are included in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of
operations.
Where a non-U.S. currency is the functional currency , translation from that functional curren cy to U.S. dollars is performed for
balance sheet accounts using current exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet date and for revenue and expense accounts
using a weighted-
70 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
average exchange rate for the period. Resulting translation adjustments are reported as a component of accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss).
Treasury stock  - The Company records the repurchase of shares of its common stock at cost on the trade date of the transaction.
These share s are considered treasury stock, which is a reduction to stockholders’  equity . Treasury stock is included in authorized
and issued shares but excluded from outstanding shares.
Share-based payments  - The Company measures share-based compensation expense at the grant date, based on the estimated
fair value of the award and uses the straight-line method of attribution, net of estimated forfeitures, for expensing awards over the
requisite employee service period. The Company  estimates the fair value of its non-qualified stock option awards (“Options”) using a
Black-Scholes valuation model. The fair value of restricted stock units (“RSUs”) is determined and fixed on the grant date based on
the Compan y’s stock price, adjusted for the exclu sion of dividend equivalents. The Monte Carlo simulation valuation model is used to
determine the grant date fair value of performance stock units (“PSUs”) granted. All share-based compensation expenses are
recorded in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations.
Redeemable non-contro lling interests  - The Com pany’ s business combinations may include provisions allowing non-controlling
equity owne rs the ability to require the Company to purchase additional interests in the subsidiary at their discretion. The interests
are initially recorded at fair value and in subsequent reporting periods are accreted or adjusted  to the estimated redemption value.
The adjustments to the redemption value are recorded to retained earnings or additional paid-in capital on the consolidated balance
sheet. The redeemable non-controlling interes ts are considered temporary and reported outside of permanent equity on the
consolidated balance sheet at the greater of the carrying amount adjusted for the non-controlling interest’ s share of net income (loss)
or its redemption value.
Earnings per share  - The Comp any calculates basic earnings per share (“EPS”) by dividing net income by the weighted-average
number of common shares outstanding during the year. Diluted EPS is calculated by dividing net income by the weighted-average
number of common shares outstanding during the year, adjusted for the potentially dilutive effect of stock options and unvested
stock units using the treasury stock method. The Company may be required to calculate EPS using the two-class method as a result
of its redeemable non-controlling interests. If redemption value exceeds the fair value of the redeemable non-controlling interests,
the excess would be a reduction to net income for the EPS calculation.
Accounting pronouncements adopted
Leases  - In Februa ry 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (the “FASB”) issued accounting guidance that changed how
companies account for and present lease arrangements. This guidance requires companies to recognize lease assets and liabilities
for both finance and operating leases on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company adopted this guidance effective January 1,
2019, under the modified retrospective transition method with the available practical expedients.
The following table summ arizes the impact of the changes made to the January 1, 2019 consolidated balance sheet for the adoption
of the new accounting standard pertaining to leases. The prior periods have not been restated  and have been reported under the
accounting standard in ef fect for those periods.
  Balance at
December 31, 2018 Impact of lease
standard  Balance at
January 1, 2019
  (in millions)
Assets    
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net  $ 921  $ 375  $ 1,296
Liabilities    
Other current liabilities  949  72 1,021
Other liabilities  1,877  303  2,180
For a more detailed discussion on lease arrangements, refer to Note 10 (Property , Equipment and Right-of-Use Assets) .
Comprehensive income - In Februar y 2018, the FASB issued accounting guidance that allows for a one-time reclassific ation from
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss ) to retained earnings for stranded tax effects resulting from U.S. tax reform. The
Company adopted this guidance effective January 1, 2019, electing to retain the stranded tax effects in accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss). The adoption did not result in a material impact on the Company’ s consolidated financial statements.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 71
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Revenue recognition  - In May 2014, the FASB issued accounting guidance that provides a single, comprehensive revenue
recognition model for all contracts with customers and supersedes most of the existing revenue recognition requirements. Under this
guidance, an entity should recognize revenue to depict the transfer of promised goods or servic es to customers in an amount that
reflects the consideration to which the entity expects to be entitled in exchange for those goods or services. The Company adopted
this guidance effective January 1, 2018 under the modified retrospective transition method, applying the standard to contracts not
completed as of January 1, 2018 and considered the aggregate amount of modifications.
This revenue guidance impacts the timing of certain customer incentives recognized in the Company’ s consolidated statement of
operations, as they are recognized over the life of the contract. Previously , such incentives were recognized when earned by the
customer . This revenue guidance also impacts the Company’ s accounting recognition for certain market development fund
contributions and expenditures. Historically , these items were recorded on a net basis in net revenue and will now be recognized on
a gross basis, resulting in an increase to both revenues and expenses.
The followin g tables summarize the impact of the revenue standard on the Company’ s consol idated statement of operations and
consolidated balance sheet:
 Year Ended December 31, 2018
 Balances
excluding revenue
standardImpact of revenue
standard  As reported
 (in millions)
Net Revenue $ 14,471 $ 479  $ 14,950
Operating Expenses     
Advertising and marketing 743 164  907
Income before income taxes 6,889 315  7,204
Income tax expense 1,278 67 1,345
Net Income 5,611 248  5,859
 December 31, 2018
 Balances
excluding revenue
standard  Impact of revenue
standard As reported
 (in millions)
Assets   
Accounts receivable $ 2,214  $ 62 $ 2,276
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,176  256 1,432
Deferred income taxes 666  (96) 570
Other assets 2,388  915 3,303
Liabilities   
Accounts payable 959  (422) 537
Accrued expenses 4,375  372 4,747
Other current liabilities 1,085  (136) 949
Other liabilities 1,145  732 1,877
Equity   
Retained earnings 26,692  591 27,283
For a more detailed discussion on revenue recognition, refer to Note 3 (Revenue) .
Intra-entity asset transfers  - In Octobe r 2016, the FASB issued accounting guidance to simplify the accounting for income tax
consequences of intra-entity transfers of assets other than inventory . Under this guidance, companies are required to recognize the
income tax consequences of an intra-entity asset transfer when the transfer occurs. This guida nce must be applied on a modified
retrospective basis through a cumulative-ef fect adjustment to retained earnings as of the period of adoption. The guidance is
effective for periods beginning after December 15, 2017. The Company adopted this guidance effective January 1, 2018. See the
section in this note entitl ed Cumulative Effect of the Adopted Accounting Pronouncements for a summary of the cumulative impact of
adopting this standard as of January 1, 2018.
72 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Cumulative effect of the 2018 adopted accounting pronouncements
The following table summarizes the cumulative impact of the changes made to the January 1, 2018 consolidated balance sheet for
the adoption  of the new accounting standards pertaining to revenue recognition and intra-entity asset transfers. The prior periods
have not been restated and have been reported under the accounting standards in ef fect for those periods.
 Balance at
December 31, 2017Impact of revenue
standard  Impact of intra-
entity asset
transfers standardBalance at
January 1, 2018
 (in millions)
Assets     
Accounts receivable $ 1,969 $ 44 $ — $ 2,013
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1,040 181  (17) 1,204
Deferred income taxes 250 (69) 186 367
Other assets 2,298 690  (352) 2,636
Liabilities     
Accounts payable 933 (495) — 438
Accrued expenses 3,931 391  — 4,322
Other current liabilities 792 (44) — 748
Other liabilities 1,438 628  — 2,066
Equity     
Retained earnings 22,364 366  (183) 22,547
Accounting pronouncements not yet adopted
Implementation costs incurred in a hosting arrangement that is a service contract - In August 2018, the FASB issued accounting
guidance which aligns the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred in a hosting arrangement that is a service
contract with the requirements for capitalizing implementation costs incurred to develop or obtain internal-use software. This
guidance is effective for periods beginning after December 15, 2019. Companies are required to adopt this guidance either
retrospectively or by prospectively applying the guidance to all implementation costs incurre d after the date of adoption. The
Company will adopt this guidance effective Janu ary 1, 2020 by applying the prospective approac h as of the date of adoption and this
guidance will not have a material impact on its consolidated financial statements.
Disclosure requirements for fair value measurement - In August 2018, the FASB issued accounting guidance which modifies
disclosure requirements for fair value measure ments by removing, modifying and adding certain disclosures. This guidance is
effective for periods beginning after December 15, 2019. Companies are required to adopt the guidance for certain added
disclosures prospectively for only the most recent interim or annual period presented in the initial fiscal year of adoption and all other
amendments retrospectively to all periods presented upon their effective date. The Company will adopt this guidance effective
January 1, 2020 and the impact will not be material.
Note 2. Acquisitions
In 2019  and 2017 , the Company acquired  several businesses in separate transactions for total consideration of $1.5 billion in each
year, representing both cash and contingent consideration. There were no acquisitions in 2018 . These acquisitions align with the
Company’ s strategy to grow , diversify and build the Company’ s business. Refer to Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting
Policies)  for the valuation techniques Mastercard utilizes to fair value the respective components of business combinations. The
residual value allocated to goodwill is primarily attributable to the synergies expected to arise after the acquisition date and a portion
of the goodwill is expected to be deductible for tax purposes.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 73
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Company is evaluating and finalizing the purchase accounting for businesses acquired during 2019 . In 2018 , the Company
finalized the purchase accounting for businesses acquired during 2017 . The preliminary estimated and final fair values of the
purchase price allocations in aggregate, as of the acquisition dates, are noted below for 2019  and 2017 , respe ctively . There were no
acquisitions in 2018.
 2019 2017
 (in millions)
Assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 54 $ 111
Other current assets 143 110
Other intangible assets 395 488
Goodwill 1,076 1,135
Other assets 48 91
Total assets 1,716 1,935
Liabilities:   
Other current liabilities 121 234
Deferred income taxes 52 64
Other liabilities 32 66
Total liabilities 205 364
Net assets acquired $ 1,511 $ 1,571
The following table summarizes the identified intangible assets acquired for 2019 and 2017:
 2019  2017  2019 2017
 Acquisition Date Fair Value  Weighted-Average Useful Life
 (in millions)  (in years)
Developed technologies $ 199  $ 319  7.7 7.5
Customer relationships 178  166  12.6 9.9
Other 18 3 5.0 1.4
Other intangible assets $ 395  $ 488  9.7 8.3
Pro forma information related to the acquisitions was not included because the impact on the Company's consolidated results of
operations was not considered to be material.
The busines ses acquired in 2019 were not individually significant to Mastercard. For the busin esses acquired in 2017, the largest
acquisition relates to Vocalink, a payment systems and ATM switching platform operator , located principally in the U.K. On April 28,
2017, Maste rcard acquir ed 92.4% controlling interest in Vocalink for cash consider ation of £719 million ($929 million). In addition, the
Vocalink sellers earned additional contingent consideration of £169 million  ($219 million ) upon meeting 2018 revenue targets in
accordance with terms of the purchase agreement. Refer to Note 8 (Fair Value Measurements)  for addition al information related to
the fair value of contingent consideration.
A majo rity of Vocalink’ s shareholders have retained a 7.6% ownership for at least three years, which  is recorded as redeemable non-
controlling interests on the consolidated balanc e sheet. These remaining shareholders have a put option to sell their ownership
interest to Mastercard on the third and fifth anniversaries of the transaction and quarterly thereafter (the “Third Anniversary Option”
and “Fifth Anniversary Option”, respectively).  The Third Anniversary Option is exercisabl e at a fixed price of £58 millio n
(approximately $76 million as of December 31, 2019 ) (“Fixed Price”). The Fifth Anniversary Option is exercisable at the greater of the
Fixed Price or fair value. Additionally , Mastercard has a call option to purchase the remaining interest from Vocalink’ s shareholders
on the fifth anniversary of the transaction and quarterly thereafter , which is exercisable at the greater of the Fixed Price or fair value.
The fair value of the redeemable non-controlling interests was determined utilizing a market approach, which extrapolated the
consideration transferred that was discounted for lack of control and marketability .
74 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Pending Acquisition
In August 2019, Mastercard entered into a defin itive agreement to acquire the majority of the Corporate Services business of Nets
Denmark A/S, for €2.85 billion (approximately $3.19 billion as of December 31, 2019 ) after adjusting for cash and certain other
liabilities at closing. The pending acquisition primarily comprises the clearing and instant payment services, and e-billing solutions of
Nets Denma rk A/S’s Corporate Services business. While the Company anticipates completing the acquisition in the first half of 2020,
the transaction is subject to regulatory approval and other customary closing conditions.
Note 3. Revenue
Mastercard’ s business model involves four participants in addition to the Company: account holders, issuers (the account holders’
financial institutions), merchants and acquirers (the merchants’  financial institutions). Revenue  from contracts with customers is
recognized when services are performed in an amount that reflects the consideration to which the Company expects to be entitled to
in exchange for those services. Revenue recognized from domestic assessments, cross-border volume fees and transaction
processing are derived from Mastercard’ s payment network services. Revenue is primarily generated by charging fees to issuers,
acquirers and other stakeholders for providing switching services, as well as by assessing customers based primarily on the dollar
volume of activity , or gross dollar volume, on the products that carry the Company’ s brands. Revenue is generally derived from
transactional information accumulated by Mastercard’ s systems or reported by customers. In addition, the Company recognizes
revenue from other payment-related products and services in the period in which the related transactions occur or services are
performed.
The price structure for Mastercard’ s products and services is dependent on the nature of volume s, types of transactions and type of
products and services of fered to customers. Net revenue can be impacted by the following:
•domestic or cross-border transactions
•geographic region or country in which the transaction occurs
•volumes/transactions subject to tiered rates
•processed or not processed by the Company
•amount of usage of the Company’ s other products or services
•amount of rebates and incentives provided to customers
The Company classifies its net revenue into the following five categories:
Domestic assessments  are fees charged to issuers and acquirers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity on cards and
other devices that carry the Company’ s brands where the merchant country and the country of issuance are the same. Revenue
from domestic assessments is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned, which is when the related volume is generated on the
cards or other devices that carry the Company’ s brands.
Cross-border volume fees are charged  to issuers and acquirers based primarily on the dollar volume of activity on cards and other
devices that carry the Company’ s brands where the merchant country and the country of issuance are different. Revenue from
cross-border volume is recorded as revenue in the period it is earned, which is when the related volume is generated on the cards or
other devices that carry the Company’ s brands.
Transaction processin g reven ue is recognized for both domestic and cross-border transactions in the period in which the related
transactions occur . Transaction processing includes the following:
•Switched transaction  revenue is generated from the following products and services:
◦Authorization is the process by which a transaction is routed to the issuer for approval. In certain circumstances, such as
when the issuer ’s system s are unavailable or cannot be contacted, Mastercard or others approve such transactions on behalf
of the issuer in accordance with either the issuer ’s instructions or applicable rules (also known as “stand-in”).
◦Clearing is the determination and exchange of financial transaction information between issuers and acquirers after a
transaction has been successfully conducted at the point of interaction. Transactions are cleared among customers through
Mastercard’ s central and regional processing systems.
◦Settlement is facilitating the exchange of funds between parties.
•Connectivity fees are charged to issuers, acquirers and other financial institutions for network access, equipment and the
transmission of authorization and settlement messages. These fees are based on the size of the data being transmitted and the
number of connections to the Company’ s network.
•Other processing fees include issuer and acquirer processing solutions; payment gateways for e-commerce merchants; mobile
gateways for mobile-initiated transactions; and safety and security .
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 75
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Other reven ues consist of value-added service offerings that are typically sold with the Company’ s payment service offerings and
are recognized in the period in which the related services are performed or transactions occur . Other revenues include the following:
•Data analytics and consulting fees.
•Cyber and intelligence fees are for products and services offered to prevent, detect and respond to fraud and to ensure the safety
of transactions made primarily on Mastercard products.
•Loyalty and rewards solutions fees are charged to issuers for benefits provided directly to consumers with Mastercard-branded
cards, such as access to a global airline lounge  network, global and local concierge services, individual insurance coverages,
emergency card replacement, emergency cash advance services and a 24-hour cardholder service center . Loyalty and reward
solution fees also include rewards campaigns and management services.
•Program management services provided to prepaid card issuers consist of foreign exchange margin, commissions, load fees and
ATM withdrawal fees paid by cardholders on the sale and encashment of prepaid cards.
•Batch and real-time account-based payment services relating to ACH transactions and other ACH related services.
•Other paym ent-related products and services, including account and transaction enhancement services, rules compliance and
publications.
Rebates and incentives (contra-revenue)  are provided to custome rs that meet certain volume targets and can be in the form of a
rebate or other support incentives, which are tied to performance.  Rebates and incentives are recorded as a reduction of gross
revenue primarily when volume- and transaction-based revenues are recognized over the contractual term.  In addition, Mastercard
may make incentive payments to a customer directly related to entering into an agreement, which are generally capitalized and
amortized over the life of the agreement on a straight-line basis.
The Company’ s disaggregated net revenue by source and geographic region were as follows for the years ended December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Revenue by source:  
Domestic assessments $ 6,781 $ 6,138
Cross-border volume fees 5,606 4,954
Transaction processing 8,469 7,391
Other revenues 4,124 3,348
Gross revenue 24,980 21,831
Rebates and incentives (contra-revenue) (8,097 ) (6,881 )
Net revenue $ 16,883 $ 14,950
  
Net revenue by geographic region:  
North American Markets $ 5,843 $ 5,312
International Markets 10,869 9,514
Other 1 171 124
Net revenue $ 16,883 $ 14,950
1 Includes revenues managed by corporate functions.
Receivables from contracts with customers of $2.3 billion and $2.1 billion as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 , respe ctively , are
recorded within accounts receivable on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company’ s customers are generally billed weekly ,
however the frequency is dependent upon the nature of the performance obligation and the underlying contractual terms. The
Company does not typically of fer extended payment terms to customers.
Contract assets are included in prepaid expense s and other current assets and other assets on the consolidated balance sheet at
December 31, 2019  in the amounts of $48 million  and $152 million , respectivel y. The comparable amounts included in prepaid
expenses and other current assets and other assets at December 31, 2018  were $40 million  and $92 million , respectively .
Deferred revenue is included in other current liabilities and other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2019
in the amounts of $238 million  and $106 million , respectively . The comparable amounts included in other current liabilities and other
76 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
liabilities at December 31, 2018  were $218 million  and $101 million , respe ctively . In 2019  and 2018 , reven ue recognized from the
satisfaction of such performance obligations was $904 million  in each year .
The Company’ s remaining performance periods for its contracts with customers for its payment network services are typically long-
term in nature (generally up to 10 years). As a payment netwo rk service provider , the Company provides its customers with
continuous access to its global payment processing network and stands ready to provide transaction processing and related
services over the contractual term. Consideration is variable as the Company generates revenues from assessing its customers
based on the GDV of activity on the products that carry the Company’ s brands. The Company has elected the optional exemption to
not disclose the remaining performance obligations related to its payment network services. The Company also earns revenues from
other value-added services comprised of both batch and real-time account-based payment  services, consulting fees, loyalty
programs and other paym ent-related products and services. At December 31, 2019 , the estimated aggregat e consideration allocated
to unsatisfie d performance obligations for these other value-added services is $1.3 billion , which is expected to be recognized
through 2022. The estimated remaining performance obligations related to these revenues are subject to change and are affected by
several factors, including modifications and terminations and are not expected to be material to any future annual period.
Note 4. Earnings Per Share
The components of basic and diluted EPS for common shares for each of the years ended December 31  were as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions, except per share data)
Numerator    
Net income $ 8,118 $ 5,859 $ 3,915
Denominator    
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding 1,017 1,041 1,067
Dilutive stock options and stock units 5 6 5
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1 1,022 1,047 1,072
Earnings per Share    
Basic $ 7.98 $ 5.63 $ 3.67
Diluted $ 7.94 $ 5.60 $ 3.65
Note: Table may not sum due to rounding.
1 For the years presented, the calculation of diluted EPS excluded a minimal amount of anti-dilutive share-based payment awards.
Note 5. Cash, Cash Equivalents, Restricted Cash and Restricted Cash Equivalents
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents reported on
the consolidated balance sheet that total to the amounts shown on the consolidated statement of cash flows for the years ended
December 31 :
  2019 2018 2017 2016
  (in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents  $6,988  $6,682  $5,933  $ 6,721
Restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents       
Restricted cash for litigation settlement  584  553  546  543
Restricted security deposits held for customers  1,370  1,080  1,085  991
Prepaid expenses and other current assets  27 22 28 3
Other assets  — — — 15
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents  $8,969  $8,337  $7,592  $ 8,273
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 77
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 6. Supplemental Cash Flows
The following table includes supplemental cash flow disclosures for each of the years ended December 31 :
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Cash paid for income taxes, net of refunds $ 1,644 $ 1,790 $ 1,893
Cash paid for interest 199 153 135
Cash paid for legal settlements 668 260 47
Non-cash investing and financing activities    
Dividends declared but not yet paid 403 340 263
Accrued property , equipment and right-of-use assets 468 10 30
Fair value of assets acquired, net of cash acquired 1,662 — 1,825
Fair value of liabilities assumed related to acquisitions 205 — 365
Note 7. Investments
The Company’ s investments on the consolidated balance sheet include both available-for-sale and held-to-maturity securities (see
Investments section below). The Company classifies its investments in equity securities of publicly traded and privately held
companies within other assets on the consolidated balance sheet (see Equity Investments section below).
Investments
Investments on the consolidated balance sheet consisted of the following at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Available-for-sale securities $ 591 $ 1,432
Held-to-maturity securities 97 264
Total investments $ 688 $ 1,696
Available-for-Sale Securities
The major classes of the Company’ s available-for-sale investment securities and their respective amortized cost basis and fair
values were as follows:
  December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
  Amortized
Cost  Gross
Unrealized
Gain  Gross
Unrealized
Loss Fair ValueAmortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainGross
Unrealized
Loss Fair Value
  (in millions)
Municipal securities  $ 15 $ — $ — $ 15 $ 15 $ — $ — $ 15
Government and
agency securities  108  — — 108 157 — — 157
Corporate securities  381  1 — 382 1,044 1 (2) 1,043
Asset-backed
securities  85 1 — 86 217 — — 217
Total  $ 589  $ 2 $ — $ 591 $ 1,433 $ 1$ (2)$1,432
The Company’ s available-for-sale investment securities held at December 31, 2019  and 2018 , prima rily carried a credit rating of A-
or better with unrealized gains and losses recorded as a separate component of other comprehensive income (loss) on the
consolidated statement of comprehensive income. The municipal securities are comprised of state tax-exempt bonds and are
diversified across state s and sectors. Government and agency securities include U.S. government bonds, U.S. government
sponsored agency bond s and foreign governme nt bonds with similar credit quality to that of the U.S. government bonds. Corporate
securities are comprised of commercial paper and corporate bonds. The asset-backed securities  are investments in bonds which are
collateralized primarily by automobile loan receivables.
78 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The maturity distribution based on the contractual terms of the Company’ s investment securit ies at December 31, 2019  was as
follows:
  Available-For-Sale
  Amortized
Cost  Fair Value
  (in millions)
Due within 1 year  $ 180  $ 181
Due after 1 year through 5 years  409  410
Total  $ 589  $ 591
Investment income on the consolidated statement of operations primarily consists of interest income generated from cash, cash
equivalents, time deposits, and realized gains and losses on the Company’ s debt securities. The realized gains and losses from the
sale of available-for-sale securities for 2019 , 2018  and 2017  were not significant.
Held-to-Maturity Securities
The Company classifies time deposits with maturities greater than three months but less than one year as held-to-maturity . Time
deposits are carried at amortized cost on the consolidated balance sheet and are intended to be held until maturity . The cost of these
securities approximates fair value.
Equity Investments
Included in other assets on the consolidated balance sheet are equity investments with readily determinable fair values (“Marketable
securities”) and equity investments without readily determinable fair values (“Nonmarketable securities”). Marketable securities are
publicly traded companies and are measured using unadjusted quoted prices in their respective active markets. Nonmarketable
securities that do not qualify for equity method accounting are measured at cost, less any impairment and adjusted for changes
resulting from observable price changes in orderly transactions for the identical or similar investments of the same issuer
(“measurement alternative”).
The following table is a summary of the activity related to the Company’ s equity investments:
 Balance at
December 31,
2018Purchases
(Sales), net1 Changes in
Fair Value2 Balance at
December 31,
2019
 (in millions)
Marketable securities $ — $ 362  $ 117  $ 479
Nonmarketable securities 337 48 50 435
Total equity investments $ 337 $ 410  $ 167  $ 914
1 Includes impact of balance sheet foreign currency translation
2 Recorded in gains (losses) on equity investments, net on the consolidated statement of operations
At December 31, 2019 , the total carrying value of Nonmarketable securities included $317 million  of measurement alternative
investments and $118 million  of equity method investments. At December 31, 2018 , the total carrying value of Nonmarketable
securities included $232 million  of measurement alternative investments and $105 million  of equity method investments.
Note 8. Fair V alue Measurements
The Company classifies its fair value measurements of financial instruments into a three-level hierarchy within the Valuation
Hierarchy . Financial instruments are categorized for fair value measurement purposes as recurring or non-recurring in nature. There
were no transfers made among the three levels in the V aluation Hierarchy for 2019  and 2018 .
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 79
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Financial Instruments - Recurring Measurements
The distribution of the Company’ s financial instruments measured at fair value on a recurring basis within the Valuation Hierarchy
were as follows:
  December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
  Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets
(Level 1) Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2) Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3) Total
  (in millions)
Assets            
Investment
securities available
for sale 1:            
Municipal securities  $ —  $ 15 $ — $15 $ — $ 15 $ — $15
Government and
agency securities  66  42 — 108  65 92 — 157
Corporate securities  —  382  — 382  — 1,043 — 1,043
Asset-backed
securities  —  86 — 86 — 217 — 217
Derivative
instruments 2:            
Foreign exchange
contracts  —  12 — 12 — 35 — 35
Interest rate contracts  —  14 — 14 — — — —
Marketable
securities 3:            
Equity securities  479  — — 479  — — — —
Deferred
compensation plan
4:            
Deferred
compensation assets  67  — — 67 54 — — 54
Liabilities            
Derivative
instruments 2:            
Foreign exchange
derivative liabilities  $ —  $ (32) $ — $(32) $ — $ (6)$ — $ (6)
Deferred
compensation plan
5:            
Deferred
compensation
liabilities  (67) — — (67) (54) — — (54)
1 The Company’s U.S. government securities are classified within Level 1 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the fair values are based on unadjusted
quoted prices for identical assets in active markets. The fair value of the Company’s available-for-sale municipal securities, government and
agency securities, corporate securities and asset-backed securities are based on observable inputs such as quoted prices, benchmark yields and
issuer spreads for similar assets in active markets and are therefore included in Level 2 of the Valuation Hierarchy.
2 The Company’s foreign exchange and interest rate derivative asset and liability contracts have been classified within Level 2 of the Valuation
Hierarchy as the fair value is based on observable inputs such as broker quotes relating to foreign currency exchange rates for similar derivative
instruments. See Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for further details.
3 The Company’s Marketable securities are publicly held and classified within Level 1 of the Valuation Hierarchy as the fair values are based on
unadjusted quoted prices in their respective active markets.
4 The Company has a nonqualified deferred compensation plan where assets are invested primarily in mutual funds held in a rabbi trust, which is
restricted for payments to participants of the plan. The Company has elected to use the fair value option for these mutual funds, which are
measured using quoted prices of identical instruments in active markets and are included in prepaid expenses and other current assets on the
consolidated balance sheet.
5 The deferred compensation liabilities are measured at fair value based on the quoted prices of identical instruments to the investment vehicles
selected by the participants. These are included in other liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet.
80 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Financial Instruments - Non-Recurring Measurements
Nonmarketable Securities
The Company’ s Nonmarketable securities are recorded at fair value on a non-recurring basis in periods after initial recognition under
the equity method or measurement alternative method. Nonmarketable securities are classified within Level 3 of the Valuation
Hierarchy due to the absence of quoted market prices, the inherent lack of liquidity and unobservable inputs used to measure fair
value that require management’ s judgment. The Company uses discounted cash flows and market assumptions to estimate the fair
value of its Nonmarket able securities when certain events or circumstances indicate that impairment may exist. See Note 7
(Investments)  for further details.
Debt
The Company estimates the fair value of its long-term debt based on market quotes. These debt instruments are not traded in active
markets and are classified as Level 2 of the Valuation Hierarchy . At December 31, 2019 , the carryin g value and fair value of total
long-term debt (including  the current portion) was $8.5 billion  and $9.2 billion , respectivel y. At December 31, 2018 , the carrying value
and fair value of long-term debt (including the current portion) was $6.3 billion and $6.5 billion, respectively . See Note 15 (Debt)  for
further details.
Other Financial Instruments
Certain financial instruments are carried on the consolidated balance sheet at cost or amortized cost basis, which approximates fair
value due to their short-term, highly liquid nature. These instruments include cash and cash equivalents, restricted cash, time
deposits, accounts receivable, settlement due from customers, restricted security deposits held for customers, accounts payable,
settlement due to customers and other accrued liabilities.
Contingent Consideration
The contingent consideration attributable to acquisitions made in 2017 was primarily based on the achievement of 2018 revenue
targets and was measured at fair value on a recurring basis. This contingent consideration liability of $219 million  was included in
other current liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2018 . This liabilit y was classified within Level 3 of the
Valuation Hierarchy due to the absence of quoted market prices and unobservable inputs used  to measure fair value that require
management’ s judgment. During 2019, the Company paid $219 million  to settle the contingent consideration .
Note 9. Prepaid Expenses and Other Assets
Prepaid expenses and other current assets consisted of the following at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 872 $ 778
Prepaid income taxes 105 51
Other 786 603
Total prepaid expenses and other current assets $ 1,763 $ 1,432
Other assets consisted of the following at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 2,838 $ 2,458
Equity investments 914 337
Income taxes receivable 460 298
Other 313 210
Total other assets $ 4,525 $ 3,303
Customer and merchant incentives represent payments made to customers and merchants under business agreements. Costs
directly related to entering into such an agreement are generally deferred and amortized over the life of the agreement.
See Note 7 (Investments)  for further information on the Company’ s equity investments.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 81
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 10. Property , Equipment and Right-of-Use Assets
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets consisted of the following at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Building, building equipment and land $ 505 $ 481
Equipment 1,218 987
Furniture and fixtures 92 85
Leasehold improvements 303 215
Operating lease right-of-use assets 810 —
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets 2,928 1,768
Less accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,100 ) (847)
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net $ 1,828 $ 921
Depreciation and amortization expense for the above property , equipment and right-of-use assets  was $336 million , $209 million  and
$185 million  for 2019 , 2018  and 2017 , respectively .
The increase in property , equipment and right-of-use assets at December 31, 2019  from December 31, 2018  was primar ily due to
the impact from the adoption of the new accounting standard pertaining to lease arrangements as of January 1, 2019 as well as
leases that commenced in 2019 . See Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies)  for addition al informat ion of the
accounting policy under the new leasing standard.
Operating lease ROU assets and operating lease liabilities are recorded on the consolidated balance sheet as follows:
  December 31,
2019
  (in millions)
Balance sheet location  
Property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net  $ 711
Other current liabilities  106
Other liabilities  656
Operating lease amortization expense for 2019  was $99 million . As of December 31, 2019 , weighted-a verage remaining lease term
of operating leases was 9.5 years and weighted-average discount rate for operating leases was 2.9%.
The following table summarizes the maturity of the Company’ s operating lease liabilities at December 31, 2019  based on lease term:
 Operating Leases
 (in millions)
2020 $ 112
2021 113
2022 103
2023 90
2024 79
Thereafter 376
Total operating lease payments 873
Less: Interest (111)
Present value of operating lease liabilities $ 762
As of December 31, 2019 , the Company has entered into additional operating leases as a lessee, primarily for real estate. These
leases have not yet commenced and will result in ROU assets and corresponding lease liabilities of approximately $23 million .
These operating leases are expected to commence in fiscal year 2020, with lease terms between one and ten years.
82 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The followin g disclosures relate to periods prior to adoption of the new lease accounting standard, including those operating leases
entered into during 2018, but not yet commenced:
At December 31, 2018, the Company had the following future minimum payments due under non‐cancelable leases:
 Operating Leases
 (in millions)
2019 $ 72
2020 75
2021 76
2022 68
2023 58
Thereafter 327
Total $ 676
Consolidated rental expense for the Company’ s leased office space was $94 million  and $77 million  for 2018  and 2017 , respectivel y.
Consolidated lease expense for automobiles, computer equipment and office equipment was $20 million and $22 million for 2018
and 2017 , respectively .
Note 11. Goodwill
The changes in the carrying amount of goodwill for the years ended December 31  were as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Beginning balance $ 2,904 $ 3,035
Additions 1,076 2
Foreign currency translation 41 (133)
Ending balance $ 4,021 $ 2,904
The Compa ny performed its annual qualitative assessment of goodwill during the fourth quarter of 2019 and determined a
quantitative assessment was not necessary . The Company concluded that goodwill was not impaired and had no accumulated
impairment losses at December 31, 2019 .
Note 12. Other Intangible Assets
The following table sets forth net intangible assets, other than goodwill, at December 31 :
  2019  2018
  Gross Carrying
Amount Accumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
Amount Gross Carrying
Amount Accumulated
AmortizationNet Carrying
Amount
  (in millions)
Finite-lived intangible assets       
Capitalized software  $ 1,884  $ (988)$ 896  $ 1,514  $ (898)$ 616
Customer relationships  621  (264) 357  439  (232) 207
Other  44 (44) — 46 (45) 1
Total  2,549  (1,296 ) 1,253  1,999  (1,175 ) 824
Indefinite-lived intangible assets       
Customer relationships  164  — 164  167  — 167
Total  $ 2,713  $ (1,296 )$ 1,417  $ 2,166  $ (1,175 )$ 991
The increase in the gross carrying amount of amortized intangible assets in 2019  was primari ly related to the businesses acquired in
2019. See Note 2 (Acquisitions)  for further details. Certain intangible assets are denominated in foreign currencies. As such, the
change in intangible assets includes a component attributable to foreign currency translation. Based on the qualitative assessment
performed in 2019 , it was determined that the Company’ s indefinite-lived intangible assets were not impaired.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 83
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Amortization on the assets above amounted to $285 million, $250 million and $252 million in 2019, 2018 and 2017 , respectivel y. The
following table sets forth the estimated future amortization expense on finite-lived intangible assets on the consolidated balance
sheet at December 31, 2019  for the years ending December 31 :
 (in millions)
2020 $ 300
2021 243
2022 164
2023 115
2024 and thereafter 431
 $ 1,253
Note 13. Accrued Expenses and Accrued Litigation
Accrued expenses consisted of the following at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Customer and merchant incentives $ 3,892 $ 3,275
Personnel costs 713 744
Income and other taxes 332 158
Other 552 570
Total accrued expenses $ 5,489 $ 4,747
Customer and merchant incentives represent amounts to be paid to customers under business agreements. As of December 31,
2019  and 2018 , the Company’ s provisi on for litigation was $914 million  and $1,591  million , respectivel y. These amounts are not
included in the accrued expenses table above and are separately reported as accrued litigation on the consolidated balance sheet.
See Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  for additional information regarding the Company’ s accrued litigation.
Note 14. Pension, Postretirement and Savings Plans
The Compa ny and certain of its subsidiaries maintain various pension and other postretirement plans that cover substantially all
employees worldwide.
Defined Contribution Plans
The Company sponsors defined contribution retirement plans. The primary plan is the Mastercard Savings Plan, a 401(k) plan for
substantially all of the Company’ s U.S. employees, which is subject to the provisions of the Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974,  as amended. In addition, the Company has several defined contribution plans outsi de of the U.S. The Company’ s total
expense for its defined contribution plans was $127 million , $98 million  and $84 million  in 2019, 2018 and 2017 , respectively .
Defined Benefit and Other Postretirement Plans
The Company sponsors pension and postretirement plans for certain non-U.S. employees (the “non-U.S. Plans”) that cover various
benefits specific to their country of employment. Additionally , Vocalink has a defined benefit pens ion plan (the “Vocalink Plan”) which
was permanently closed to new entrants and future accruals as of July 21, 2013, however , plan participants’  obligations are adjusted
for future salary changes. The Company has agreed to make contributions of £15 million  (approximately $19 million  as of December
31, 2019 ) annually until September 2022. The term “Pension Plans” includes the non-U.S. Plans and the V ocalink Plan.
The Company maintains a postretirement plan providing health coverage and life insurance benefits for substantially all of its U.S.
employees hired before July 1, 2007 (the “Postretirement Plan”).
84 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The Company uses a December 31 measurement date for the Pension Plans and its Postretirement Plan (collectively the “Plans”).
The Company recognizes the funded status of its Plans, measured as the difference between the fair value of the plan assets and
the projected benefit obligation, in the consolidated balance sheet. The following table sets forth the Plans’  funded status, key
assumptions and amounts recognized in the Company’ s consolidated balance sheet at December 31 :
 Pension Plans Postretirement Plan
 2019  2018 2019 2018
 ($ in millions)
Change in benefit obligation     
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 438  $ 468 $ 57 $ 61
Service cost 11  9 1 1
Interest cost 13  12 2 2
Actuarial (gain) loss 73  (7) 9 (2)
Benefits paid (15) (22) (5) (5)
Transfers in 2 1 — —
Foreign currency translation 9 (23) — —
Benefit obligation at end of year 531  438 64 57
Change in plan assets     
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year 410  427 — —
Actual (loss) gain on plan assets 79  (8) — —
Employer contributions 32  33 5 5
Benefits paid (15) (23) (5) (5)
Transfers in 2 2 — —
Foreign currency translation 10  (21) — —
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 518  410 — —
Funded status at end of year $ (13) $ (28)$ (64)$ (57)
Amounts recognized on the consolidated balance sheet consist of:     
Other liabilities, short-term —  — (3) (3)
Other liabilities, long-term (13) (28) (61) (54)
 $ (13) $ (28)$ (64)$ (57)
Accumulated other comprehensive income consists of:     
Net actuarial (gain) loss $ 7 $ (5)$ 2 $ (7)
Prior service credit 1 1 (5) (6)
Balance at end of year $ 8 $ (4)$ (3)$ (13)
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine end of year benefit
obligations     
Discount rate     
Non-U.S. Plans 0.70% 1.80% * *
Vocalink Plan 2.00% 3.10% * *
Postretirement Plan * * 3.25% 4.25%
Rate of compensation increase     
Non-U.S. Plans 1.50% 2.60% * *
Vocalink Plan 2.50% 4.00% * *
Postretirement Plan * * 3.00% 3.00%
* Not applicable
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 85
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
All of the Pension Plans had benefit obligation s in excess of plan assets at December 31, 2019 and 2018 . Information on the
Pension Plans were as follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Projected benefit obligation $ 531 $ 438
Accumulated benefit obligation 524 430
Fair value of plan assets 518 410
For the year ended December 31, 2019 , the Compa ny’s projec ted benefit obligation related to its Pension Plans increased $93
million  prima rily attributable to actuarial losses related to lower discount rate assumptions. For the year ended December 31, 2018 ,
the Company’ s projected benefit obligation related to its Pension Plans decreased $30 million  primarily attributable to foreign
currency translation and benefits paid.
Components of net periodic benefit cost recorded in earnings were as follows for the Plans for each of the years ended
December 31 :
  Pension Plans  Postretirement Plan
  2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
  (in millions)
Service cost  $11 $ 9 $ 9 $ 1$ 1 $ 1
Interest cost  13 12 8 2 2 2
Expected return on plan assets  (18) (20) (13) — — —
Amortization of actuarial loss  1 — — — — —
Amortization of prior service credit  — — — (1) (2) (2)
Net periodic benefit cost  $ 7$ 1 $ 4 $ 2$ 1 $ 1
The service cost compon ent is recognized in general and administrative expenses on the consolidated statement of operations. Net
periodic benefit cost, excluding the service cost component, is recognized in other income (expense) on the consolidated statement
of operations.
Other changes in plan assets and benefit obligations recognized in other comprehensive income  for the years ended December 31
were as follows:
 Pension Plans  Postretirement Plan
 2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current year actuarial loss (gain) $12 $17 $(22) $ 9$(2) $ 5
Current year prior service credit — 1 — — — —
Amortization of prior service credit — — — 1 2 2
Total other comprehensive loss (income) $12 $18 $(22) $10 $— $ 7
Total net periodic benefit cost and other comprehensive loss (income) $19 $19 $(18) $12 $ 1 $ 8
86 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Assumptions
Weighted-average assumptions used to determine net periodic benefit cost were as follows for the years ended December 31 :
  Pension Plans  Postretirement Plan
  2019 2018 2017 2019 2018 2017
Discount rate       
Non-U.S. Plans  1.80% 1.80% 1.60% * * *
Vocalink Plan  2.00% 2.80% 2.50% * * *
Postretirement Plan  * * * 4.25% 3.50% 4.00%
Expected return on plan assets       
Non-U.S. Plans  2.10% 3.00% 3.25% * * *
Vocalink Plan  3.75% 4.75% 4.75% * * *
Rate of compensation increase       
Non-U.S. Plans  1.50% 2.60% 2.59% * * *
Vocalink Plan  2.50% 3.85% 3.95% * * *
Postretirement Plan  * * * 3.00% 3.00% 3.00%
* Not applicable
The Company’ s discount rate assumptions are based on yield curves derived from high quality corporate bonds, which are matched
to the expec ted cash flows of each respective plan. The expected return on plan assets assumptions are derived using the current
and expected asset allocations of the Pension Plans’  assets and considering historical as well as expected returns on various
classes of plan assets. The rates of compensat ion increases are determined by the Company , based upon its long-term plans for
such increases.
The following additional assumptions were used at December 31  in accounting for the Postretirement Plan:
  2019 2018
Health care cost trend rate assumed for next year  6.00% 6.00%
Ultimate trend rate  5.00% 5.00%
Year that the rate reaches the ultimate trend rate  2 2
Assets
Plan assets  are managed taking into account the timing and amount of future benefit payme nts. The Vocalink Plan assets are
managed within the following target asset alloca tions: fixed income  36%, U.K. government securities  25%, equity  25%, real estate
9% and cash and cash equivalents  5%. For the non-U.S. Plans, the assets are concentrated primarily in insurance contracts.
The Valuation Hierarchy of the Pension Plans’  assets is determined using a consistent application of the categorization
measurements for the Company’ s financial instruments. See Note 1 (Summary of Significant Accounting Policies)  for addition al
information.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 87
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following tables set forth by level, within the V aluation Hierarchy , the Pension Plans’  assets at fair value:
  December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
  Quoted
Prices in
Active
Markets
(Level 1) Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2) Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)Fair
ValueQuoted
Prices in
Active
Markets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2) Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)Fair
Value
  (in millions)
Cash and cash equivalents 1  $ 16 $ — $ — $16$ 22$ — $ — $22
Government and agency securities 2 — — — — — 88 — 88
Mutual funds 3  153 193 — 346 154 30 — 184
Insurance contracts 4  — 75 — 75 — 57 — 57
Asset-backed securities 5  — — — — — — 34 34
Other 6  — — — — — 25 — 25
Total  $169 $ 268 $ — $437$176$ 200 $ 34$410
Investments at Net Asset Value
(“NAV”) 7       
Mutual funds     36  —
Other     45  —
Total Plan Assets     $518  $410
1 Cash and cash equivalents are valued at quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value of the shares held by the Plans.
2 Governmental and agency securities are valued at unit values provided by investment managers, which are based on the fair value of the
underlying investments utilizing public information, independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors.
3 Certain mutual funds are valued at quoted market prices, which represent the value of the shares held by the Plans, and are therefore included in
Level 1. Certain other mutual funds are valued at unit values provided by investment managers, which are based on the fair value of the
underlying investments utilizing public information, independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors, and are
therefore included in Level 2.
4 Insurance contracts are valued at unit values provided by investment managers, which are based on the fair value of the underlying investments
utilizing public information, independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors.
5 Asset-backed securities are classified as Level 3 due to a lack of observable inputs in measuring fair value. These assets were sold during 2019.
6 Other represents hedge fund pooled vehicles which are based on the fair value of the underlying investments utilizing public information,
independent external valuation from third-party services or third-party advisors, and are therefore included in Level 2.
7 Mutual funds (comprised primarily of credit investments) and other investments (comprised primarily of real estate investments) are valued using
the NAV provided by the administrator as a practical expedient, and therefore these investments are not included in the valuation hierarchy.
These investments have quarterly redemption frequencies with redemption notice periods ranging from 60 to 90 days.
The following table summ arizes expected benefit payments (as of December 31, 2019 ) through 2029 for the Pension Plans and the
Postretirement Plan, including those payments expected to be paid from the Company’ s general assets. Actual benefit payments
may dif fer from expected benefit payments.
  Pension Plans  Postretirement Plan
  (in millions)
2020  $ 17 $ 4
2021  11 4
2022  12 4
2023  13 4
2024  15 4
2025 - 2029  70 20
88 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 15. Debt
Long-term debt consisted of the following at December 31 :
Notes  Issuance
DateInterest Payment
Terms  Maturity
DateAggregate
Principal
AmountStated
Interest
RateEffective
Interest
Rate 2019 2018
     (in millions, except percentages)
2019 USD
Notes  May 2019 Semi-annually  2029 $ 1,000 2.950 % 3.030 %$1,000 $ —
    2049 1,000 3.650 % 3.689 % 1,000 —
  December 2019 Semi-annually  2025 750 2.000 % 2.147 % 750 $ —
     $ 2,750    
        
2018 USD
Notes  February 2018 Semi-annually  2028 $ 500 3.500 % 3.598 % 500 500
    2048 500 3.950 % 3.990 % 500 500
     $ 1,000    
        
2016 USD
Notes  November 2016 Semi-annually  2021 $ 650 2.000 % 2.236 % 650 650
    2026 750 2.950 % 3.044 % 750 750
    2046 600 3.800 % 3.893 % 600 600
     $ 2,000    
        
2015 Euro
Notes  December 2015 Annually  2022 € 700 1.100 % 1.265 % 785 801
    2027 800 2.100 % 2.189 % 896 916
    2030 150 2.500 % 2.562 % 169 172
     € 1,650    
        
2014 USD
Notes  March 2014 Semi-annually  2019 $ 500 2.000 % 2.178 % — 500
    2024 1,000 3.375 % 3.484 % 1,000 1,000
     $ 1,500    
      8,600 6,389
Less: Unamortized discount and debt issuance costs (73) (55)
Total debt outstanding $8,527 $6,334
Less: Current portion 1 — (500)
Long-term debt $8,527 $5,834
1 Relates to the 2014 USD Notes, which was classified in current liabilities as of December 31, 2018, matured and was paid during 2019
In May 2019, the Company issued $1 billion principal amount of notes due June 2029 and $1 billion principal amount of notes due
June 2049 and in December 2019, the Compa ny issued $750 millio n principal amount of notes due March 2025 (collectively the
“2019 USD Notes”). The net proceeds from the issuance of the 2019 USD Notes, after deducting the original issue discount,
underwriting discount and of fering expenses, were $2.724  billion .
The net proceeds, after deducting the original issue discount, underwriting discount and offering  expenses, from the issuance of the
2018 USD Notes were $991 million .
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 89
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The outstanding debt, described above, is not subject to any financial covenants and it may be redeemed in whole, or in part, at the
Company’ s option at any time for a specified make-whole amount. These notes are senior unsecured obligations and would rank
equally with any future unsecured and unsubordinated indebtedness. The proceeds of the notes are to be used for general corporate
purposes.
Scheduled annual maturities of the principal portion of long-term debt outstanding at December 31, 2019  are summarized below .
 (in millions)
2020 $ —
2021 650
2022 785
2023 —
2024 1,000
Thereafter 6,165
Total $ 8,600
On November 14, 2019,  the Company increased its commercial paper program (the “Commercia l Paper Program”) from $4.5 billion
to $6 billion under which  the Company is authorized to issue unsecured commercial paper notes with maturities of up to 397 days
from the date of issuance. The Commercial Paper Program is available in U.S. dollars.
In conjunction with the Commercial Paper Program, the Company entered into a committed five-year unsecured $6 billion revolving
credit facility (the “Credi t Facility”) on November  14, 2019. The Credit Facility , which expires on November 14, 2024, amended and
restated the Company’ s prior $4.5 billion credit facility which was set to expire on Novem ber 15, 2023. Borrowings under the Credit
Facility are available in U.S. dollars and/or euros. The facility fee under the Credit Facility is determined according to the Company’ s
credit rating and is payable on the average daily commitment, regardless of usage, per annum. In addition to the facility fee, interest
rates on borrowings under the Credit Facility would be based on prevailing market interest rates plus applicable margins that
fluctuate based on the Company’ s credit rating. The Credit Facility contains customary represe ntations, warranties, affirmative and
negative covenants, events of default and indem nification provisions. The Company was in compliance in all material respects with
the covenants of the Credit Facility at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Borrowings under the Commercial Paper Program and the Credit Facility are used to provide liquidity for general corporate
purposes, including providing liquidity in the event of one or more settlement failures by the Company’ s customers. The Company
may borrow and repay amounts under the Com mercial Paper Program and Credit Facility from time to time. The Company had no
borrowings under the Credit Facility and the Commercial Paper Program at December 31, 2019  and 2018 .
Note 16. Stockholders' Equity
Classes of Capital Stock
Mastercard’ s amended and restated certificate of incorporation authorizes the following classes of capital stock:
Class  Par Value
Per Share Authorized
Shares
(in millions) Dividend and Voting Rights
A
 $0.0001
 3,000 One vote per share
Dividend rights
B
 $0.0001
 1,200 Non-voting
Dividend rights
Preferred
 $0.0001
 300 No shares issued or outstanding at December 31, 2019 and 2018. Dividend and voting
rights are to be determined by the Board of Directors of the Company upon issuance.
90 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Dividends
The Compa ny declared a quarterly cash divide nd on its Class A and Class B Common Stock during each of the four quarters of
2019 , 2018  and 2017 . For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 , the Company declared total per share dividends of
$1.39, $1.08, and $0.91, respectively , resulting in total annual dividends of $1,408  millio n, $1,120  millio n and $967 millio n,
respectively .
Ownership and Governance Structure
Equity ownership and voting power of the Company’ s shares were allocated as follows as of December 31 :
  2019  2018
  Equity
OwnershipGeneral Voting
Power  Equity
OwnershipGeneral Voting
Power
Public Investors (Class A stockholders)  87.8% 88.8% 88.0% 89.0%
Principal or Affiliate Customers (Class B stockholders)  1.1% —% 1.1% —%
Mastercard Foundation (Class A stockholders)  11.1% 11.2% 10.9% 11.0%
Class B Common Stock Conversions
Shares of Class B comm on stock are convertibl e on a one-for-one basis into shares of Class A common stock.  Entities eligible to
hold Masterc ard’s Class  B common stock are defined in the Company’ s amended and restated certificate of incorporation (generally
the Compan y’s principal or affiliate customers), and they are restricted from retaining ownership of shares of Class A common stock. 
Class B stockholders are required to subsequen tly sell or otherwise transfer any shares of Class A common stock received pursuant
to such a conversion. 
Mastercard Foundation
In connection and simultaneously with its 2006 initial public offering (the “IPO”), the Company issued and donated 135 million  newly
authorized shares of Class A common stock to Mastercard Foundation. Mastercard Foundation is a private charitable foundation
incorporated in Canada that is controlled by directors who are independent of the Company and its principal customers. Under the
terms of the donation, Mastercard Foundation became able to resell the donated shares in May 2010 to the extent necessary to
meet charita ble disbursement requirements dictated by Canadian tax law. Under Canadian tax law, Mastercard Foundation is
generally required to disburse at least 3.5% of its assets  not used in administration each year for qualified charitable disbursements.
However , Mastercard Foundation obtained permission from the Canadian tax authorities to defer the giving requirements until 2021.
Mastercard Foundation, at its discretion, may decide to meet its disbursement obligations on an annual basis or to settle previously
accumulated obligations during any given year. Mastercard Foundation will be permitted to sell all of its remaining shares beginning
May 1, 2027, subject to certain conditions.
Stock Repurchase Programs
The Company’ s Board of Directors have approved share repurchase programs authorizing the Company to repurchase shares of its
Class A Common Stock.  These programs become effective after the completion of the previ ously authorized share repurchase
program. 
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 91
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes the Company’ s share repurchase authorizations of its Class A common stock through December 31,
2019 , as well as historical purchases:
Board authorization datesDecember
2019December
2018  December
2017December
2016December
2015   
Date program became effectiveJanuary
2020January
2019  March 2018April 2017February
2016  Total
 (in millions, except average price data)
Board authorization $ 8,000 $ 6,500  $ 4,000 $4,000 $ 4,000  $26,500
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2017 $ — $ — $ — $2,766 $ 996  $3,762
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2017 $ — $ — $ 4,000 $1,234 $ — $5,234
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2018 $ — $ — $ 3,699 $1,234 $ — $4,933
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2018 $ — $ 6,500  $ 301 $ — $ — $6,801
Dollar-value of shares repurchased in 2019 $ — $ 6,196  $ 301 $ — $ — $6,497
Remaining authorization at December 31, 2019 $ 8,000 $ 304  $ — $ — $ — $8,304
Shares repurchased in 2017 — — — 21.0 9.1  30.1
Average price paid per share in 2017 $ — $ — $ — $131.97 $109.16  $125.05
Shares repurchased in 2018 — — 19.0 7.2 — 26.2
Average price paid per share in 2018 $ — $ — $194.77 $171.11 $ — $188.26
Shares repurchased in 2019 — 24.8  1.6 — — 26.4
Average price paid per share in 2019 $ — $249.58  $188.38 $ — $ — $245.89
Cumulative shares repurchased through December
31, 2019 — 24.8  20.6 28.2 40.4  114.0
Cumulative average price paid per share $ — $249.58  $194.27 $141.99 $ 99.10  $159.68
The following table presents the changes in the Company’ s outstanding Class A and Class B common stock for the years ended
December 31 :
  Outstanding Shares
  Class A Class B
  (in millions)
Balance at December 31, 2016  1,062.4 19.3
Purchases of treasury stock  (30.1) —
Share-based payments  2.2 —
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock  5.2 (5.2)
Balance at December 31, 2017  1,039.7 14.1
Purchases of treasury stock  (26.2) —
Share-based payments  2.8 —
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock  2.3 (2.3)
Balance at December 31, 2018  1,018.6 11.8
Purchases of treasury stock  (26.4) —
Share-based payments  3.2 —
Conversion of Class B to Class A common stock  0.6 (0.6)
Balance at December 31, 2019  996.0 11.2
92 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 17. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
The changes in the balances of each component of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax, for the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018  were as follows:
 Foreign
Currency
Translation
Adjustments 1Translation
Adjustments
on Net
Investment
Hedge 2  Cash Flow
Hedges 3 Defined Benefit
Pension and
Other
Postretirement
Plans 4  Investment
Securities
Available-for-
Sale 5Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Income (Loss)
 (in millions)
Balance at December 31,
2017$ (382)$ (141) $ — $ 25 $ 1 $ (497)
Other comprehensive income
(loss) (279)75 — (15) (2) (221)
Balance at December 31,
2018(661) (66) — 10 (1) (718)
Other comprehensive income
(loss)23 28 11 (19) 2 45
Balance at December 31,
2019$ (638)$ (38) $ 11 $ (9) $ 1 $ (673)
1 During 2018, the increase in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to foreign currency translation adjustments was driven primarily
by the depreciation of the euro, British pound and Brazilian real. During 2019, the decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related
to foreign currency translation adjustments was driven primarily by the appreciation of the British pound partially offset by the depreciation of the
euro.
2 The Company uses foreign currency denominated debt to hedge a portion of its net investment in foreign operations against adverse movements
in exchange rates. Changes in the value of the debt are recorded in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). During 2018 and 2019, the
decreases in the accumulated other comprehensive loss related to the net investment hedge were driven by the depreciation of the euro. See
Note 23 (Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for additional information.
3 In 2019, the Company entered into treasury rate locks which are accounted for as cash flow hedges. During 2019, in connection with these cash
flow hedges, the Company recorded unrealized gains, net of tax, of $11 million in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). See Note 23
(Derivative and Hedging Instruments) for additional information.
4 During 2018, the decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive gain related to the Company’s Plans was driven primarily by an actuarial loss
within the Vocalink Plan. During 2019, the decrease in the accumulated other comprehensive gain related to the Company’s Plans was primarily
driven by actuarial losses within the Vocalink and non-U.S. Plans. During 2018 and 2019, amounts reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive income (loss) to earnings, were not material. See Note 14 (Pension, Postretirement and Savings Plans) for additional information.
5 During 2018 and 2019, gains and losses on available-for-sale investment securities, reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive income
(loss) to investment income, were not material. See Note 7 (Investments) for additional information.
Note 18. Share-Based Payments
In May 2006, the Comp any implemented the Mastercard Incorporated 2006 Long Term Incent ive Plan, which was amended and
restated as of June 5, 2012 (the “LTIP”). The LTIP is a stockholder-approved plan that permits the grant of various types of equity
awards to employees. The Company has granted Options, RSUs and PSUs under the LTIP. The Company uses the straight-line
method of attribution for expensing all equity awards. Compensation expense is recorded net of estimated forfeitures, with estimates
adjusted as appropriate.
There are approximately 116 million  shares of Class A common stock authorized for equity awards under the LTIP. Although the LTIP
permits the issuance of shares of Class B common stock, no such shares have been authorized for issuance. Shares issued as a
result of Option exercises and the conversions of RSUs and PSUs were funded primarily with the issuance of new shares of Class A
common stock.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 93
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Stock Options
Stock Options expire ten years from the date of grant and vest ratably over four years. For Options granted, a participant’ s unvested
awards are forfeited upon termination. However , in the event a participant terminates employm ent due to disability or retirement
more than six months (seven months  for those granted on or after March 1, 2017) after receiving the award, the participant retains
all of their awards without providing additional service to the Company . Retirement eligibility is dependent upon age and years of
service. Compensation expense continues to be recognized over the vesting period as stated in the L TIP.
The fair value of each Option is estimated on the date of grant using a Black-Scholes option pricing model. The following table
presents the weighted-average assumptions used in the valuation and the resulting weighted-average fair value per option granted
for the years ended December 31 :
 2019 2018 2017
Risk-free rate of return 2.6% 2.7% 2.0%
Expected term (in years) 6.00 6.00 5.00
Expected volatility 19.6% 19.7% 19.3%
Expected dividend yield 0.6% 0.6% 0.8%
Weighted-average fair value per Option granted $ 53.09 $ 40.90 $ 21.23
The risk-free rate of return was based on the U.S. Treasury yield curve in effect on the date of grant. The expected term and the
expected volatility were based on historical Mastercard information. The expected dividend yields were based on the Company’ s
expected annual dividend rate on the date of grant.
The following table summarizes the Company’ s option activity for the year ended December 31, 2019 :
  Options Weighted-
Average
Exercise
Price  Weighted-
Average
Remaining
Contractual
Term  Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
  (in millions)  (in years) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2019  7.6  $ 93   
Granted  0.9  $ 227    
Exercised  (1.8) $ 71   
Forfeited/expired  (0.1) $ 148    
Outstanding at December 31, 2019  6.6  $ 117  6.2 $ 1,206
Exercisable at December 31, 2019  3.9  $ 86 5.1 $ 836
Options vested and expected to vest at December 31, 2019  6.6  $ 116  6.2 $ 1,200
As of December 31, 2019 , there was $34 million  of total unrecognized compensation cost related to non-vested Options. The cost is
expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.3 years .
Restricted and Performance Stock Units
RSUs and PSUs genera lly vest after three years . For all RSUs and PSUs granted prior to March 2017, a participant’ s unvested
awards are forfeited upon termination of employ ment. For all RSUs and PSUs granted on or after March 1, 2017, in the event of
termination due to job elimination (as defined by the Company), a participant will retain a pro-rata portion of the unvested awards for
services performed through the date of termination. In the event a participant terminates employ ment due to disability or retirement
more than six months (seven months  for those granted on or after March 1, 2017) after receiving the award, the participant retains
all of their awards withou t providing additional service to the Company . Compensation expense is recognized over the shorter of the
vesting perio ds stated in the LTIP or the date the individual becomes eligible to retire but not less than six months (or seven months
for grants awarded on or after March 1, 2017).
94 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The following table summarizes the Company’ s RSU activity for the year ended December 31, 2019 :
 UnitsWeighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair ValueAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
 (in millions) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2019 3.7 $ 117  
Granted 1.0 $ 226  
Converted (1.6)$ 93  
Forfeited (0.2)$ 154  
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 2.9 $ 166 $ 852
RSUs expected to vest at December 31, 2019 2.8 $ 165 $ 824
The fair value of each RSU is the closing stock price on the New York Stock Exchange of the Company’ s Class A common stock on
the date of grant, adjusted for the exclusion of dividend equivalents. Upon vesting, a portion of the RSU award may be withheld to
satisfy the minimum statutory withholding taxes. The remaining RSUs will be settled in shares of the Company’ s Class A common
stock after the vesting period. As of December 31, 2019 , there was $180 million  of total unrecognized compensation cost related to
non-vested RSUs. The cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 1.8 years .
The following table summarizes the Company’ s PSU activity for the year ended December 31, 2019 :
 UnitsWeighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair ValueAggregate
Intrinsic
Value
 (in millions) (in millions)
Outstanding at January 1, 2019 0.6 $ 120  
Granted 0.1 $ 231  
Converted (0.4)$ 92  
Other 1 0.2 $ 126  
Outstanding at December 31, 2019 0.5 $ 167 $ 162
PSUs expected to vest at December 31, 2019 0.5 $ 167 $ 162
1 Represents additional shares issued in March 2019 related to the 2016 PSU grant based on performance and market conditions achieved over
the three-year measurement period. These shares vested upon issuance.
Since 2013, PSUs containing performance and market conditions have been issued. Performance measures used to determine the
actual number of shares  that vest after three years include net revenue growth, EPS growth and relative total shareholder return
(“TSR”).  Relative TSR is considered a market condition, while net revenue and EPS growth are considered performance
conditions.  The Monte Carlo simulation valuation model is used to determine the grant-date fair value. 
Compensation expenses  for PSUs are recognized over the requisite service period if it is probable that the performance target will
be achieved and subsequently adjusted if the probability assessment changes. As of December 31, 2019 , there was $13 million  of
total unrecognized compensation cost related to non-vested PSUs. The cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average
period of 1.8 years .
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 95
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Additional Information
The following table includes additional share-based payment information for each of the years ended December 31 :
  2019 2018 2017
  (in millions, except weighted-
average fair value)
Share-based compensation expense: Options, RSUs and PSUs  $ 250  $ 196  $ 176
Income tax benefit recognized for equity awards  53 41 57
Income tax benefit realized related to Options exercised  69 53 36
Options:       
Total intrinsic value of Options exercised  317  242  106
RSUs:       
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of awards granted  226  171  112
Total intrinsic value of RSUs converted into shares of Class A common stock  394  194  131
PSUs:       
Weighted-average grant-date fair value of awards granted  231  226  126
Total intrinsic value of PSUs converted into shares of Class A common stock  85 40 13
Note 19. Commitments
At December 31, 2019 , the Company had the following future minimum payments due under noncancelable agreements, primarily
related to sponsorships to promote the Masterc ard brand and licensing arrangements. The Company has accrued $20 million of
these future payments as of December 31, 2019 .
  (in millions)
2020  $ 404
2021  224
2022  132
2023  42
2024  17
Thereafter  —
Total  $ 819
Note 20. Income T axes
Components of Income and Income tax expense
The domestic and foreign components of income before income taxes for the years ended December 31  are as follows:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
United States $ 4,213 $ 3,510 $ 3,482
Foreign 5,518 3,694 3,040
Income before income taxes $ 9,731 $ 7,204 $ 6,522
96 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
The total income tax provision for the years ended December 31  is comprised of the following components:
 2019 2018 2017
 (in millions)
Current    
Federal $ 642 $ 649 $ 1,704
State and local 81 69 65
Foreign 897 871 752
 1,620 1,589 2,521
Deferred    
Federal 40 (228) 134
State and local — (11) 1
Foreign (47) (5) (49)
 (7) (244) 86
Income tax expense $ 1,613 $ 1,345 $ 2,607
Effective Income Tax Rate
A reconciliat ion of the effective income tax rate to the U.S. federal statutory income tax rate for the years ended December 31, is as
follows:
 2019  2018  2017
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
 (in millions, except percentages)
Income before income taxes $9,731   $7,204   $6,522  
Federal statutory tax 2,044 21.0 % 1,513  21.0 % 2,283 35.0 %
State tax ef fect, net of federal benefit 65 0.7 % 46 0.6 % 43 0.7 %
Foreign tax ef fect (208) (2.1)% (92) (1.3)% (380) (5.8)%
European Commission fine — — % 194  2.7 % — — %
Foreign tax credits 1 (32) (0.3)% (110) (1.5)% (27) (0.4)%
Transition Tax (30) (0.3)% 22 0.3 % 629 9.6 %
Remeasurement of deferred taxes — — % (7) (0.1)% 157 2.4 %
Windfall benefit (129) (1.3)% (72) (1.0)% (43) (0.7)%
Other , net (97) (1.1)% (149) (2.0)% (55) (0.8)%
Income tax expense $1,613 16.6 % $1,345  18.7 % $2,607 40.0 %
1 Included within the impact of the foreign tax credits is $27 million for 2019 and $90 million for 2018 of tax benefits relating to the carryback of
certain foreign tax credits.
The effective income tax rates for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017  were 16.6%, 18.7% and 40.0%, respectively .
The effective income tax rate for 2019  was lower than the effective income tax rate for 2018 , prima rily due to the nondeductible
nature of the fine issued  by the European Commission in 2018 and a discrete tax benefit related to a favorable court ruling in 2019 .
These 2019 benefits were partially offset by discrete tax benefits in 2018 primarily related to foreign tax credits generated in 2018 as
a result of U.S. tax reform, which can be carried back and utilized in 2017 under transition rules issued by the Department of the
Treasury and the Internal Revenue Service.
The effective income tax rate for 2018  was lower than the effective income tax rate for 2017  primarily due to additional tax expense
of $873 million in 2017 attributable to U.S. tax reform (which included provisional amounts of $825 million related to the one-time
deemed repatriation tax on accumulated foreign earnings (the “Transition Tax”), the remeasurement of the Company’ s net deferred
tax asset balance in the U.S. and the recognition of a deferred tax liability related to a change in assertion regarding the indefinite
reinvestment of a substantial amount of the Com pany’ s foreign earnings, as well as $48 million  due to a foregone foreign tax credit
benefit on 2017 repatria tions). Additionally , the lower effective income tax rate in 2018 was due to a lower 2018 statutory tax rate in
the U.S. and Belgium, a more favorable geogra phic mix of earnings and discrete tax benefits, relating primarily to $90 million of
foreign tax credits generated in 2018, which can be carried back and utilized in 2017 under transition rules issued by the Department
of the Treasury and the Internal Revenue Service, along with provisions for legal matters in the United States. These benefits were
partially of fset by the
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 97
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
nondeductible nature of the fine issued by the European Commission. See Note 21 (Legal and Regulatory Proceedings)  for further
discussion of the European Commission fine and U.S. merchant class litigation.
Singapore Income Tax Rate
In connection with the expansion of the Company’ s operations in the Asia Pacific, Middle East and Africa region, the Company’ s
subsidiary in Singapore, Mastercard Asia Pacif ic Pte. Ltd. (“MAPPL”) received an incentive grant from the Singapore Ministry of
Finance in 2010. The incentive had provided MAPPL  with, among other benefits, a reduced income tax rate for the 10-year period
commencing January 1, 2010 on taxable income in excess of a base amount. The Company continued to explore business
opportunities in this region, resulting in an expansion of the incentives being granted by the Ministry of Finance, including a further
reduction to the income tax rate on taxable income in excess of a revised fixed base amount commencing July 1, 2011 and
continuing through December 31, 2025. Without the incentive grant, MAPPL  would have been subject to the statutory income tax
rate on its earnings. For 2019, 2018 and 2017 , the impact of the incen tive grant received from the Ministry of Finance resulted in a
reduction of MAPPL ’s income tax liability of $300 million, or $0.29 per diluted share, $212 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, and
$104 million , or $0.10 per diluted share, respectively .
Indefinite Reinvestment
During 2019  and 2018 , the Compa ny repatriate d approximately $2.5 billion and $3.3 billion, respe ctively . As of December 31, 2019
and 2018  the Company had appro ximately $3.5 billion and $2.5 billion, respectivel y, of accumulated earnings to be repatriated in the
future, for which immaterial deferred tax benefits were recorded. The tax effect is primarily relate d to the estimated foreign exchange
impact recognized when earnings are repatriated. The Company expects that foreign withholding taxes associated with these future
repatriated earnings will not be material. Earnings of approximately $0.8 billion  remain permanently reinvested and the Company
estimates that immaterial U.S. federal and state  and local income tax benefit would result, primarily from foreign exchange, if these
earnings were to be repatriated.
Deferred Taxes
Deferred tax assets and liabilities represent the expected future tax consequences of temporary differences between the carrying
amounts and the tax basis of assets and liabilities. The components of deferred tax assets and liabilities at December 31 are as
follows:
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Deferred Tax Assets   
Accrued liabilities $ 354 $ 297
Compensation and benefits 214 210
State taxes and other credits 41 30
Net operating and capital losses 119 104
U.S. foreign tax credits 1 145 —
Intangible assets 157 170
Other items 94 115
Less: V aluation allowance (205) (94)
Total Deferred Tax Assets 919 832
Deferred Tax Liabilities   
Prepaid expenses and other accruals 83 89
Goodwill and intangible assets 187 125
Property , plant and equipment 128 97
Other items 63 18
Total Deferred Tax Liabilities 461 329
Net Deferred Tax Assets $ 458 $ 503
1 A deferred tax asset has been established in 2019 for $145 million related to foreign taxes paid in the current period, which are not expected to be
utilized as credits in the current or future period, with a corresponding full valuation allowance.
The valuatio n allowance balance at December 31, 2019  primarily relates to the Company’ s ability to recognize future tax benefits
associated with the carry  forward of U.S. foreign tax credits generated in the current period and certain foreign net operating losses.
The valuation allowance balance at December 31, 2018  relates primarily to the Company’ s ability to recognize tax benefits
associated
98 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
with certain foreign net operating losses. The recognition of the foreign tax credits is dependent upon the realization of future foreign
source incom e in the appropriate foreign tax credit basket in accordance with U.S. federal income tax law. The recognition of the
foreign losses is dependent upon the future taxable income in such jurisdictions and the ability under tax law in these jurisdictions to
utilize net operating losses following a change in control.
A reconciliat ion of the beginning and ending balance for the Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31,
is as follows:
  2019  2018  2017
  (in millions)
Beginning balance  $ 164  $ 183  $ 169
Additions:       
Current year tax positions  22 23 21
Prior year tax positions  37 5 9
Reductions:       
Prior year tax positions  (11) (17) (1)
Settlements with tax authorities  (2) (18) (4)
Expired statute of limitations  (7) (12) (11)
Ending balance  $ 203  $ 164  $ 183
The unrecog nized tax benefit of $203 million, if recognized, would reduce the effective income tax rate. In 2019, there was an
increase to the Company’ s unrecognized tax benefits primarily due to various U.S. and non-U.S. tax issues, compared to a reduction
in the prior year primaril y due to a favorable court decision and settlements with tax authorities in multiple jurisdictions. Further , the
information gained related to these matters was considered in measuring uncertain tax benefits recognized for the periods
subsequent to the periods settled.
The Company is subject to tax in the U.S., Belgium, Singapore, the United Kingdom and various other foreign jurisdictions, as well
as state and local jurisdictions. Uncertain tax positions are reviewed on an ongoing basis and are adjusted after considering facts
and circumstances, including progress of tax audits, developments in case law and closing of statutes of limitation.  Within the next
twelve months, the Com pany believes that the resolution of certain federal, foreign and state and local examinations are reasonably
possible and that a chan ge in estimate, reducing  unrecognized tax benefits, may occur .  While such a change may be significant, it
is not possible to provide  a range of the potentia l change until the examinations progress further or the related statutes of limitation
expire. The Company has effectively settled its U.S. federal income tax obligations through 2011. With limited exception, the
Company is no longer subject to state and local or foreign examinations by tax authorities for years before 2010.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the Comp any had a net income tax-related interest payable of $13 millio n and $8 million,
respectively , in its conso lidated balance sheet. Tax-related interest income/(expense) in 2019 , 2018  and 2017  was not material. In
addition, as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 , the amounts the Company has recognized for penalties payable in its consolidated
balance sheet were not material.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 99
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 21. Legal and Regulatory Proceedings
Mastercard is a party to legal and regulatory proceedings with respect to a variety of matters in the ordinary course of business. 
Some of these proceedings are based on complex claims involving substantial uncertainties and unascertainable damages. 
Accordingly , except as discussed below , it is not possible to determine the probability of loss or estimate damages, and therefore,
Mastercard has not established reserves for any of these proceedings.  When the Company determines that a loss is both probable
and reasona bly estimable, Mastercard records a liability and discloses the amount of the liability if it is material. When a material loss
contingency is only reasonably possible, Mastercard does not record a liability , but instead discloses the nature and the amount of
the claim, and an estimate of the loss or range of loss, if such an estimate can be made. Unless otherwise stated below with respect
to these matters, Master card cannot provide an estimate of the possible loss or range of loss based on one or more of the following
reasons: (1) actual or potential plaintif fs have not claimed an amount of monetary damages or the amounts are unsupportable or
exaggerated, (2) the matters are in early stages, (3) there is uncertainty as to the outcome of pending appeals or motions, (4) there
are significa nt factual issues to be resolved, (5) the existence in many such proceedings of multiple defendants or potential
defendants whose share of any potential financ ial responsibility has yet to be determined and/or (6) there are novel legal issues
presented. Furthermore, except as identified with respect to the matters below , Mastercard does not believe that the outcome of any
individual existing legal or regulatory proceeding to which it is a party will have a material adverse effect on its results of operations,
financial condition or overall business.  However , an adverse judgment or other outcome or settlement with respect to any
proceedings discussed below could result in fines or payments by Mastercard and/or could require Mastercard to change its
business practices. In addition, an adverse outcome in a regulatory proceeding could lead to the filing of civil damage claims and
possibly result in significant damage awards. Any of these events could have a material adver se effect on Mastercard’ s results of
operations, financial condition and overall business.
Interchange Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings
Mastercard’ s interchang e fees and other practices are subject to regulatory , legal review and/or challenges in a number of
jurisdictions, including the proceedings described below . When taken as a whole, the resulting decisions, regulations and legislation
with respect  to interchange fees and acceptance practices may have a material adverse effect on the Company’ s prospects for
future growth and its overall results of operations, financial position and cash flows.
United States.  In June 2005, the first of a series of complaints were filed on behalf of merchants (the majority of the complaints were
styled as class actions, although a few complaints were filed on behalf of individual merc hant plaintif fs) against Mastercard
International, Visa U.S.A., Inc., Visa International Service Association and a number of financial institutions. Taken together , the
claims in the complaints were generally brought under both Sections 1 and 2 of the Sherman Act, which prohibit monopolization and
attempts or conspiracies  to monopolize a particular industry , and some of these complaints contain unfair competition law claims
under state law. The complaints allege, among other things, that Mastercard, Visa, and certain financial institutions conspired to set
the price of interchange  fees, enacted point of sale acceptance rules (including the no surcharge rule) in violation of antitrust laws
and engaged in unlawful tying and bundling of certain products and services. The cases were consolidated for pre-trial proceedings
in the U.S. District Court for the Eastern District of New York in MDL No. 1720. The plaintif fs filed a consolidated class action
complaint that seeks treble damages.
In July 2006, the group of purported merchant class plaintif fs filed a supplemental complaint alleging that Mastercard’ s initial public
offering of its Class A Common Stock in May 2006 (the “IPO”) and certain purported agreemen ts entered into between Mastercard
and financial institutions in connection with the IPO: (1) violate U.S. antitrust laws and (2) constituted a fraudulent conveyance
because the financial institutions allegedly attempted to release, without adequate consideration, Mastercard’ s right to assess them
for Mastercard’ s litigation liabilities. The class plaintif fs sought treble damages and injunctive relief including, but not limited to, an
order reversing and unwinding the IPO.
In February 2011, Mastercard and Mastercard International entered into each of: (1) an omnibu s judgment sharing and settlement
sharing agreement with Visa Inc., Visa U.S.A. Inc. and Visa International Service Association and a number of financial institutions;
and (2) a Mastercard settlement and judgment sharing agreement with a number of financial institutions.  The agreements provide
for the apportionment of certain costs and liabilities which Mastercard, the Visa parties and the financial institutions may incur , jointly
and/or sever ally, in the event of an adverse judgment or settlement of one or all of the cases in the merchant litigations.  Among a
number of scenarios addressed by the agreem ents, in the event of a global settlement involving the Visa parties, the financial
institutions and Mastercard, Mastercard would pay 12% of the monetary portion of the settlement. In the event of a settlement
involving only Mastercar d and the financial institutions with respect to their issuance of Maste rcard cards, Mastercard would pay
36% of the monetary portion of such settlement. 
In October 2012, the parties entered into a definitive settlement agreement with respect to the merchant class litigation (including
with respect  to the claims related to the IPO) and the defendants separately entered into a settlement agreement with the individual
merchant plaintif fs. The settlements included cash payments that were apportioned among the defendants pursuant to the omnibus
judgment sharing and settlement sharing agreement described above. Mastercard also agreed to provide class members with a
short-term reduction in default credit interchange rates and to modify certain of its business practices, including its “no surcharge”
rule. The court
100 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
granted final approval of the settlement in December 2013, and objectors to the settlement appe aled that decision to the U.S. Court
of Appeals for the Second Circuit. In June 2016, the court of appeals vacated the class action certification, reversed the settlement
approval and sent the case back to the district court for further proceedings. The court of appeals’ ruling was based primarily on
whether the merchants were adequately repres ented by counsel in the settlement. As a result of the appellate court ruling, the
district court  divided the merchants’  claims into two separate classes - monetary damages claims  (the “Damages Class”) and claims
seeking changes to business practices (the “Rules Relief Class”). The court appointed separate counsel for each class.
In Septembe r 2018, the parties to the Damages  Class litigation entered into a class settlement agreement to resolve the Damages
Class claims . Mastercard increased its reserve by $237 million  during 2018 to reflect both its expected financial obligation under the
Damages Class settleme nt agreement and the filed and anticipated opt-out merchant cases. The time period during which Damages
Class members were permitted to opt out of the class settlement agreement ended in July 2019 with merchants representing slightly
more than 25% of the Dam ages Class interchange volume choosing to opt out of the settlement. The district  court granted final
approval of the settlement in December 2019. The district court’ s settlement approval order has been appealed. Mastercard has
commenced settlement negotiations with a number of the opt-out merchants and has reached settlements and/or agreements in
principle to settle a number of these claims. The Damages Class settlement agreement does not relate to the Rules Relief Class
claims. Separate settlement negotiations with the Rules Relief Class are ongoing.
As of December 31, 2019  and 2018 , Mastercard  had accrued a liability of $914 million  as a reserv e for both the Damages Class
litigation and the filed and anticipated opt-out merchant cases. As of December 31, 2019  and 2018 , Mastercard had $584 million  and
$553 million , respectivel y, in a qualifi ed cash settlement fund related to the Damages Class litigation and classified as restricted cash
on its conso lidated balance sheet. During the first quarter of 2019, Mastercard increased its qualified cash settlement fund by $108
million  in accordance with a January 2019 preliminary approval of the settlement. The Damages Class settlement agreement
provided for a return to the defendants of a portion of the cash settlement fund, based upon the percentage of interchange volume
represented by the opt out merchants. During the fourth quarter of 2019, $84 millio n of the qualified cash settlement fund was
reclassified from restricted cash to cash and cash equivalents in accordance with the December 2019 final approval of the
settlement.
The reserve  as of December 31, 2019  for both the Damages Class litigation and the filed opt-out merchants represents Mastercard’ s
best estimate of its probable liabilities in these matters. The portion of the accrued liability relatin g to both the opt-out merchants and
the Damage s Class litigation settlement does not represent an estimate of a loss, if any, if the matters were litigated to a final
outcome. Mastercard cannot estimate the potential liability if that were to occur .
Canada.  In December 2010, a proposed class action complaint was commenced against Mastercard in Quebec on behalf of
Canadian merchants. The suit essentially repea ted the allegations and arguments of a previously filed application by the Canadian
Competition Bureau to the Canadian Competition Tribunal (dismissed in Mastercard’ s favor) concerning certain Mastercard rules
related to point-of-sale acceptance, including the “honor all cards” and “no surcharge” rules. The Quebec suit sought compensatory
and punitive damages in unspecified amounts, as well as injunctive relief. In the first half of 2011, additional purported class action
lawsuits were commenced in British Columbia and Ontario against Mastercard, Visa and a number of large Canadian financial
institutions. The British Columbia suit sought compensatory damages in unspecified amou nts, and the Ontario suit sought
compensatory damages  of $5 billion on the basis of alleged conspiracy and various alleged breaches of the Canadian Competition
Act. Additional purported class action complaints were commenced in Saskatchewan and Alberta with claims that largely mirror
those in the other suits. In June 2017, Mastercard entered into a class settlement agreement to resolve all of the Canadian class
action litigati on. The settlement, which requires Mastercard to make a cash payment and modify its “no surcharge” rule, has received
court approval in each Canadian province. Objectors to the settlement have sought to appeal the approval orders. Certain appellate
courts have rejected the objectors’  appeals, while outstanding appeals remain in a few provinc es. In 2017, Mastercard recorded a
provision for litigation of $15 million  related to this matter .
Europe.  In July 2015, the European Commission (“EC”) issued a Statement of Objections related to Mastercard’ s interregional
interchange fees and central acquiring rule within the European Economic Area (the “EEA”). The Statement of Objections, which
followed an investigation  opened in 2013, included preliminary conclusions concerning the alleged anticompetitive effects of these
practices. In December 2018, Mastercard announced the anticipated resolution of the EC’s investigation. With respect to
interregional interchang e fees, Mastercard made a settlement proposal whereby it would make changes to its interregional
interchange fees. The EC issued a decision accepting the settlement in April 2019, with changes to interregional interchange fees
going into effect in the fourth quarter of 2019. In addition, with respect to Mastercard’ s historic central acquiring rule, the EC issued a
negative decision in January 2019. The EC’s negative decision covers a period of time of less than two years before the rule’s
modification. The rule was modified in late 2015 to comply with the requirements of the EEA Interchange Fee Regulation. The
decision does not require any modification of Mastercard’ s current business practices but included a fine of €571 million , which  was
paid in April 2019. Mastercard incurred a charge of $654 million  in 2018 in relation to this matter .
Since May 2012, a number of United Kingdom  (“U.K.”) retailers filed claims or threatened litigation against Mastercard seeking
damages for alleged anti-competitive conduct with respect to Mastercard’ s cross-border interchange fees and its U.K. and Ireland
domestic
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 101
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
interchange fees (the “U.K. Merchant claimants”). In addition, Mastercard, has faced similar filed or threatened litigation by
merchants with respect to interchange rates in other countries in Europe (the “Pan-European Merchant claimants”). In aggregate,
the alleged damages claims from the U.K. and Pan-European Merchant claimants were in the amount of approximately £3 billion
(approximately $4 billion  as of December 31, 2019 ). Mastercard has resolved over £2 billion  (approximately $3 billion  as of
December 31, 2019 ) of these damages claims through settlement or judgment. Since June 2015, Mastercard has recorded litigation
provisions for settlements, judgments and legal fees relating to these claims, including charges of $237 million  in 2018. As detailed
below , Mastercard continues to litigate with the remaining U.K. and Pan-European Merchant claimants and it has submitted
statements of defense disputing liability and damages claims.
In January 2017, Master card received a liability judgment in its favor on all significant matters in a separate action brought by ten of
the U.K. Merchant claim ants. Three  of the U.K. Merchant claimants appealed the judgment, and these appeals were combined with
Mastercard’ s appeal of a 2016 judgment in favor of one U.K. merchant. In July 2018, the U.K. appellat e court ruled against both
Mastercard and Visa on two of the three  legal issues  being considered, concluding that U.K. interchange rates restricted competition
and that they were not objectively necessary for the payment networks. The appellate court sent the cases back to trial for
reconsideration on the remaining issue concern ing the “lawful” level of interchange. The U.K. Supreme Court granted the parties
permission to appeal the appellate court’ s rulings  and oral argument on the appeals was heard in January 2020. Mastercard expects
the litigation process to be delayed pending the decision of the U.K. Supreme Court on the appeals.
In Septembe r 2016, a proposed collective action was filed in the United Kingdom on behalf of U.K. consumers seeking damages for
intra-EEA  and domestic U.K. interchange fees that were allegedly passed on to consumers by merchants between 1992 and 2008.
The complaint, which seeks to leverage the European Commission’ s 2007 decision on intra-EEA  interchange fees, claims damages
in an amoun t that exceeds £14 billion  (appr oximately $17 billion  as of December 31, 2019 ). In July 2017, the trial court denied the
plaintif fs’ application for the case to proceed as a collective action. In April 2019, the U.K. appellate court granted the plaintif fs’
appeal of the trial court’ s decision and sent the case back to the trial court for a re-hearing  on the plaintif fs’ collective action
application. Mastercard has been granted permission to appeal the appellate court ruling to the U.K. Supreme Court and oral
argument on that appeal is scheduled to occur in May 2020.
ATM Non-Discrimination Rule Surcharge Complaints
In October 2011, a trade association of independent Automated Teller Machine (“ATM”) operators and 13 independent ATM
operators filed a complaint styled as a class action lawsuit in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia against both
Mastercard and Visa (the “ATM Operators Complaint”).  Plaintif fs seek to represent a class of non-bank operators of ATM terminals
that operate in the United States with the discretion to determine the price of the ATM access fee for the terminals they operate.
Plaintif fs allege that Mastercard and Visa have violated Section 1 of the Sherman Act by imposing rules that require ATM operators
to charge non-discriminatory ATM surcharges for transactions processed over Mastercard’ s and Visa’s respective networks that are
not greater than the surcharge for transactions over other networks accepted at the same ATM.  Plaintif fs seek both injunctive and
monetary relief equal to treble the damages they claim to have sustained as a result of the alleged violations and their costs of suit,
including attorneys’  fees. 
Subsequently , multiple related complaints were  filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia alleging both federal
antitrust and multiple state unfair competition, consumer protection and common law claims against Mastercard and Visa on behalf
of putative classes of users of ATM services (the “ATM Consumer Complaints”).  The claims  in these actions largely mirror the
allegations made in the ATM Operators Complaint, although these complaints seek damage s on behalf of consumers of ATM
services who pay allege dly inflated ATM fees at both bank and non-bank ATM operators as a result of the defendants’  ATM rules. 
Plaintif fs seek both injunctive and monetary relief equal to treble the damages they claim to have sustained as a result of the alleged
violations and their costs of suit, including attorneys’  fees. 
In January 2012, the plaintif fs in the ATM Operators Complaint and the ATM Consumer Complaints filed amended class action
complaints that largely mirror their prior complaints. In February 2013, the district court granted  Mastercard’ s motion to dismiss the
complaints for failure to state a claim. On appeal, the Court of Appeals reversed the district court’ s order in August 2015 and sent the
case back for further proceedings. In September 2019, the plaintif fs filed their motions for class certification in which the plaintif fs, in
aggregate, allege over $1 billion  in damages  against all of the defendants. Mastercard intends to vigorously defend against both the
plaintif fs’ liability and damages claims and to oppose class certification. Mastercard expects briefing on class certification to be
completed in the second quarter of 2020.
102 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
U.S. Liability Shift Litigation
In March 2016, a proposed U.S. merchant class action complaint was filed in federal court in California alleging that Mastercard,
Visa, American Express and Discover (the “Network Defendants”), EMVCo and a number of issuing banks (the “Bank Defendants”)
engaged in a conspiracy  to shift fraud liability for card present transactions from issuing banks to merchants not yet in compliance
with the standards for EMV chip cards in the United States (the “EMV Liability Shift”), in violation  of the Sherman Act and California
law.  Plaintif fs allege damages equal to the value of all chargebacks for which class members became liable as a result of the EMV
Liability Shift on October 1, 2015. The plaintif fs seek treble damages, attorney’ s fees and costs and an injunction against future
violations of governing law, and the defendants have filed a motion to dismiss. In September 2016, the court denied the Network
Defendants’  motion to dismiss the complaint, but granted such a motion for EMVCo and the Bank Defendants. In May 2017, the
court transfe rred the case to New York so that discovery could be coordinated with the U.S. merchant class interchange litigation
described above. The plaintif fs have filed a renewed motion for class certification, following the district court’ s denial of their initial
motion.
Telephone Consumer Protection Class Action
Mastercard is a defend ant in a Telephone Consumer Protection Act (“TCP A”) class action pending in Florida. The plaintif fs are
individuals and businesses who allege that approximately 381,000  unsolicited faxes were sent to them advertising a Mastercard co-
brand card issued by First Arkansas Bank (“FAB”). The TCPA provides for uncapped statutory damages of $500 per fax. Mastercard
has asserted various defenses to the claims, and has notified FAB of an indemnity claim that it has (which FAB has disputed). In
June 2018, the court granted Mastercard’ s motion to stay the proceedings until the Federal Communications Commission (“FCC”)
makes a decision on the application of the TCPA to online fax services. In December 2019, the FCC issued a declaratory ruling
clarifying that the TCPA does not apply to faxes sent to online fax services that are received via e-mail. As a result of the ruling, the
stay of the litigation was lifted in January 2020.
Note 22. Settlement and Other Risk Management
Mastercard’ s rules guarantee the settlement of many of the transactions between its customers (“settlement risk”). Settlement
exposure is the settlement risk to customers under Mastercard’ s rules due to the difference in timing between the payment
transaction date and subsequent settlement. While the term and amount of the guarantee are unlimited, the duration of settlement
exposure is short term and typically limited to a few days.
Gross settlement exposure is estimated using the average daily payment volume during the three months ended December 31,
2019  multiplied by the estima ted number of days of exposure. The Company has global risk management policies and procedures,
which includ e risk standards, to provide a frame work for managing the Company’ s settlement risk and exposure. In the event of a
failed custom er, Mastercard may pursue one or more remedies available under the Company’ s rules to recover potential losses.
Historically , the Company has experienced a low level of losses from customer failures.
As part of its policies, Mastercard requires certain customers that are not in compliance with the Company’ s risk standards to post
collateral, such as cash, letters of credit, or guarantees. This requirement is based on a review of the individual risk circumstances
for each customer . Mastercard monitors its credit risk portfolio on a regular basis and the adequacy of collateral on hand.
Additionally , from time to time, the Company reviews its risk management methodology and standards. As such, the amounts of
estimated settlement exposure are revised as necessary .
The Company’ s estimated settlement exposure was as follows at December 31 :
 2019 2018
 (in millions)
Gross settlement exposure $ 55,800 $ 49,666
Collateral held for settlement exposure (4,772 ) (4,711 )
Net uncollateralized settlement exposure $ 51,028 $ 44,955
Mastercard also provides guarantees to custom ers and certain other counterparties indemnifyin g them from losses stemming from
failures of third parties to perform duties. This includes guarantees of Mastercard-branded travelers cheques issued, but not yet
cashed of $367 million and $377 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018 , respectively , of which $290 million and $297 million at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 , respectively , is mitigated by collateral arrangements. In addition, the Company enters into
agreements in the ordinary course of business under which the Company agrees to indemnify third parties against damages, losses
and expenses incurred in connection with legal and other proceedings arising from relationships or transactions with the Company .
Certain indemnifications do not provide a stated maximum exposure. As the extent of the Company’ s obligations under these
agreements depends entirely upon the occurrence of future events, the Company’ s potential future liability under these agreements
is not determinable. Historically , payments made by the Company under these types of contractual arrangements have not been
material.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 103
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Note 23. Derivative and Hedging Instruments
The Compa ny monitors  and manages its foreign currency and interest rate exposures as part of its overall risk management
program which focuses on the unpredictability of financial markets and seeks to reduce the potentially adverse effects that the
volatility of these markets may have on its operating results.  A primary objective of the Company’ s risk management strategies is to
reduce the financial impact that may arise from volatility in foreign currency exchange rates principally through the use of both
foreign exch ange derivative contracts (Derivatives) and foreign currency denominated debt (Net Investment Hedge). In addition, the
Company may enter into interest rate derivativ e contracts to manage the effects of interest rate movements on the Company’ s
aggregate liability portfolio, including potential future debt issuances (Cash Flow Hedges).
Foreign Exchange Risk
Derivatives
The Compa ny enters into foreign exchange derivative contracts to manage transactional currency exposure associated with
anticipated receipts and disbursements which are valued based on currencies other than the functional currency of the entity . The
Company may also enter into foreign exchange derivative contracts to offset possible changes in value due to foreign exchange
fluctuations of assets and liabilities. The object ive of these activities is to reduce the Company’ s exposure to gains and losses
resulting from fluctuations of foreign currencies against its functional currencies.
The Company’ s foreign exchange derivative contracts are summarized below:
  December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
  Notional  Estimated Fair
Value Notional  Estimated Fair
Value
  (in millions)
Commitments to purchase foreign currency  $ 185  $ 3 $ 34 $ (1)
Commitments to sell foreign currency  1,506  (25) 1,066  26
Options to sell foreign currency  21 2 25 4
      
Balance sheet location      
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 1    $ 12   $ 35
Other current liabilities 1    (32)  (6)
1 The derivative contracts are subject to enforceable master netting arrangements, which contain various netting and setoff provisions.
The amount of gain (loss) recognized on the consolidated statement of operations for the contracts to purchase and sell foreign
currency is summarized below:
  Year Ended December 31,
  2019  2018  2017
  (in millions)
Foreign exchange derivative contracts     
General and administrative  $ (39) $ 53 $ (75)
The fair value of the foreign exchange derivative contracts generally reflects the estimated amou nts that the Company would receive
(or pay), on a pre-tax basis, to terminate the contracts. The terms of the foreign exchange derivative contracts are generally less
than 18 mont hs. The Comp any had no defer red gains or losses related to foreign exchange contracts in accumulated other
comprehensive income as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 , as these contracts were not designated as hedging instruments for
accounting.
The Company’ s derivative financial instruments are subject to both market and counterparty credit risk. Market risk is the potential
for economi c losses to be incurred on market risk sensitive instruments arising from adverse changes in market factors such as
foreign curre ncy exchange rates, interest rates and other related variables. Counterparty credit risk is the risk of loss due to failure of
the counterparty to perfo rm its obligations in accordance with contractual terms. To mitigate counterparty credit risk, the Company
enters into derivative contracts with a diversifie d group of selected financial institutions based upon their credit ratings and other
factors. Generally , the Company does not obtain collateral related to derivatives because  of the high credit ratings of the
counterparties.
104 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA - NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Net Investment Hedge
The Company uses foreign currency denominated debt to hedge a portion of its net investment in foreign operations against adverse
movements in exchange rates, with changes in the value of the debt recorded within currency translation adjustment in accumulated
other comprehensive income (loss). In 2015, the Company designated its €1.65 billion  euro- denominated debt as a net investment
hedge for a portion of its net investment in Europ ean operations. As of December 31, 2019 , the Compa ny had a net foreign currency
transaction pre-tax loss of $84 million  in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) associated with hedging activity .
Interest Rate Risk
Cash Flow Hedges
The Compan y is exposed to interest rate volatility on future debt issuances. To manage this risk, in the fourth quarter of 2019, the
Company entered into treasury rate locks to lock the benchmark rate on a portion of the interest payments related to forecasted debt
issuances. These locks are linked to future interest payments on anticipated U.S. dollar debt issuances forecasted to occur during
2020 and are accounted  for as cash flow hedges . The maximum length of time over which the Company has hedged its exposure to
the variability in future cash flows is 30 years. As of December 31, 2019 , the total notional amount of interest rate contracts
outstanding was $1 billion . The Comp any did not have any derivative instruments relating to this program outstanding as of
December 31, 2018.
As of December 31, 2019 , in connecti on with these cash flow hedges, the Company recorded pre-tax net unrealized gains of $14
million  in accumulated other comprehensive income. As of December 31, 2019 , the fair value of these contracts was $14 million and
is included in prepaid expenses and other current assets on the consolidated balance sheet.
Note 24. Segment Reporting
Mastercard has concluded it has one reportable operating segment, “Payment Solutions.” Mastercard’ s President and Chief
Executive Officer has been identified as the chief operating decision-maker . All of the Company’ s activities are interrelated, and each
activity is dependent upon and supportive of the other . Accordingly , all significant operating decisions are based upon analysis of
Mastercard at the consolidated level.
Revenue by geographic market is based on the location of the Company’ s customer that issued  the card, as well as the location of
the merchan t acquirer where the card is being used. Revenue generated in the U.S. was approximately 32% of total revenue in
2019 , 33% in 2018  and 35% in 2017 . No individual country , other than the U.S., generated more than 10% of total revenue in those
periods. Mastercard did not have any individual customer that generated greater than 10% of net revenue in 2019 , 2018  or 2017 .
The followin g table reflects the geographical location of the Company’ s property , equipment and right-of-use assets, net, as of
December 31 :
  2019  2018  2017
  (in millions)
United States  $ 1,147  $ 613  $ 572
Other countries  681  308  257
Total  $ 1,828  $ 921  $ 829
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 105
PART II
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Note 25. Summary of Quarterly Data (Unaudited)
 2019 Quarter Ended  
 March 31 June 30  September 30 December 31  2019 Total
 (in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue $ 3,889  $ 4,113  $ 4,467 $ 4,414 $ 16,883
Operating income 2,213  2,397  2,655 2,399 9,664
Net income 1,862  2,048  2,108 2,100 8,118
Basic earnings per share $ 1.81  $ 2.01  $ 2.08 $ 2.08 $ 7.98
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding 1,026  1,020  1,013 1,008 1,017
Diluted earnings per share $ 1.80  $ 2.00  $ 2.07 $ 2.07 $ 7.94
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1,032  1,025  1,019 1,013 1,022
     
     
 2018 Quarter Ended  
 March 31 June 30  September 30 December 31 2018 Total
 (in millions, except per share data)
Net revenue $ 3,580  $ 3,665  $ 3,898 $ 3,807 $ 14,950
Operating income 1,825  1,936  2,287 1,234 7,282
Net income 1,492  1,569  1,899 899 5,859
Basic earnings per share $ 1.42  $ 1.50  $ 1.83 $ 0.87 $ 5.63
Basic weighted-average shares outstanding 1,051  1,043  1,037 1,032 1,041
Diluted earnings per share $ 1.41  $ 1.50  $ 1.82 $ 0.87 $ 5.60
Diluted weighted-average shares outstanding 1,057  1,049  1,043 1,038 1,047
Note: Tables may not sum due to rounding.
106 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
PART II
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE
Item 9. Changes in and disagreements with accountants on
accounting and financial disclosure
Not applicable.
Item 9A. Controls and procedures
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Our disclosure controls and procedures (as defin ed in Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
amended (the “Exchange Act”) are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed  in the reports that we file or submit
under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed,  summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the rules and forms of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and to ensure that information required to be disclosed is accumulated and communicated
to management, including our President and Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer, to allow timely decisions
regarding disclosure. The President and Chief Executive Officer and the Chief Financial Officer, with assistance from other members
of management, have reviewed the effectiveness of our disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2019  and, based on
their evaluation, have concluded that the disclosure controls and procedures were ef fective as of such date.
Internal Control over Financial Reporting
In addition, Mastercard Incorporated’ s management assessed the effectiveness of Mastercard’ s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2019 . Manageme nt’s report on internal control over financial reporting is included in Part II, Item 8.
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial statements
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and, as part of their audit, has issued their report, included herein, on the effectiveness
of our internal control over financial reporting.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There was no change in Mastercard’ s interna l control over financial reporting that occurred during the three months ended
December 31, 2019  that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely to materially affect, Mastercard’ s internal control over
financial reporting.
Item 9B. Other Information
Pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012, we hereby incorporate by reference
herein the disclosure contained in Exhibit 99.1 of this Report.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 107
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART III   
Item 10. Directors, executive officers and corporate governance    
Item 11. Executive compensation    
Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and
management and related stockholder matters    
Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and
director independence    
Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services    
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Item 10. Directors, executive of ficers and corporate governance
Information regarding our executive officers is included in section “Information about our executive officers” in Part I of this Report.
Additional information required by this Item with respect to our directors and executive officers, code of ethics, procedures for
recommending nominees, audit committee, audit committee financial experts and compliance with Section 16(a) of the Exchange
Act will appear in our definitive proxy statement to be filed with the SEC and delivered to stockh olders in connection with our 2020
annual meeting of stockholders (the “Proxy Statement”).
The aforementioned information in the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 11. Executive compensation
The information required by this Item with respe ct to executive officer and director compensation will appear in the Proxy Statement
and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 12. Security ownership of certain beneficial owners and
management and related stockholder matters
The information required by this Item with respe ct to security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management equity and
compensation plans will appear in the Proxy Statement and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 13. Certain relationships and related transactions, and
director independence
The information required by this Item with respect to transactions with related persons, the review , approval or ratification of such
transactions and director independence will appear in the Proxy Statement and is incorporated by reference into this Report.
Item 14. Principal accountant fees and services
The informa tion required by this Item with respect to auditors’  services and fees will appear in the Proxy Statement and is
incorporated by reference into this Report.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 109
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART IV   
Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules    
Item 16. Form 10-K summary    
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
Item 15. Exhibits and financial statement schedules
(a)The following documents are filed as part of this Report:
1Consolidated Financial Statements
See Index to Consolidated Financial Statements in Part II, Item 8.
2Consolidated Financial Statement Schedules
None.
3The following exhibits are filed as part of this Report or, where indicated, were previously filed and are hereby incorporated
by reference:
Refer to the Exhibit Index included herein.
Item 16. Form 10-K summary
None.
MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K 111
Exhibit index
Exhibit number  Exhibit Description
3.1(a)
 Amended and Restated  Certificate of Incorpor ation of Mastercard Incorporated (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 29, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
3.1(b)
 Amended and Restated Bylaws of Mastercard Incorporated (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 to the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 29, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.1
 Indenture, dated as of March 31, 2014, between the Company and Deutsche Bank Trust Company Americas, as
trustee (inco rporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 31,
2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.2
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of March 31, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.3
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2019 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 31, 2014) (incorpor ated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.4
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.375% Notes due 2024 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of March 31, 2014) (incorpor ated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on March 31, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.5
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of December 1, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.6
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 1.100% Notes due 2022 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.7
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.100% Notes due 2027 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.8
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.500% Notes due 2030 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 1, 2015) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 1, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.9
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of November 21, 2016 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.10
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2021 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.11
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.950% Notes due 2026 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.12
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.800% Notes due 2046 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of November 21, 2016) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2016 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.13
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of February 26, 2018 (incorporated by reference  to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.14
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.5% Notes due 2028 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of February 26, 2018) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the of the Company’ s
Current Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.15
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.95% Notes due 2048 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of February 26, 2018) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on February 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.16
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of May 31, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the
Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.17
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.950% Notes due 2029 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of May 31, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.18
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 3.650% Notes due 2049 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of May 31, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current Report
on Form 8-K filed on May 31, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.19
 Officer’s Certificate of the Company , dated as of December 3, 2019 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of
the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 3, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.20
 Form of Global Note representing the Company’ s 2.000% Notes due 2025 (included in Officer’s Certificate of the
Company , dated as of December 3, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of the Company’ s Current
Report on Form 8-K filed on December 3, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
4.21*  Description of Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
10.1*
 $6,000,000,000 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 14, 2019, among Mastercard
Incorporated, the several lenders and agents from time to time party thereto, Citibank, N.A., as managing
administrative agent and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A. as administrative agent.
10.2+
 Employment Agreement  between Mastercard International Incorporated and Ajaypal Banga, dated as of July 1,
2010 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 8, 2010
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.3+
 Employment Agreement between Martina Hund-Mejean and Mastercard International, amended and restated as
of December 24, 2012 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 14, 2013 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.3.1+
 Amendment to Amended and Restated Employment Agreement between Martina Hund-Mejean and Mastercard
International, dated as of December 21, 2017 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3.1 to the Company’ s
Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February 14, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.4+
 Contract of Employment  between Mastercard UK Management Services Limited and Ann Cairns, amended and
restated as of April 5, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.4.1+
 Deed of Employment between Mastercard UK Management Services Limited and Ann Cairns, dated July 6, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8.2 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February 16,
2012 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.5+
 Description of Employment Arrangement with Craig Vosburg (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.6+
 Description of Employment Arrangement with Gilberto Caldart (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.7+
 Description of Employment Arrangement with Tim Murphy (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the
Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.8+
 Mastercard International Senior Executive Annual Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated
effective June 9, 2015 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed June 10, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.9+
 Mastercard International Incorporated Restoration Program, as amended and restated January 1, 2007 unless
otherwise provided (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.22 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 19, 2009 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.10+
 Mastercard Incorporated Deferral Plan, as amended and restated effective December 1, 2008 for account
balances established after December 31, 2004 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.25 to the Company’ s
Annual Report on Form 10-K filed February 19, 2009 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.11+
 Mastercard Incorporated 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan, amended and restated effective June 5, 2012
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed August 1, 2012
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.12+
 Form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement for awards under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for awards
granted on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.13+
 Form of Stock Option Agreement for awards under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for awards granted
on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.14+
 Form of Performance Unit Agreement for awar ds under 2006 Long Term Incentive Plan (effective for awards
granted on and subsequent to March 1, 2019) (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed April 30, 2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.15+
 Form of Mastercard Incorporated Long Term Incentive Plan Non-Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement for
named exec utive officers (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.17 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form
10-K filed February 16, 2012 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.16+
 Amended and Restated Mastercard International Incorporated Executive Severance Plan, amen ded and restated
as of April 10, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed May 2, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.17+
 Amended and Restated Mastercard Internationa l Incorporated Change in Control Severance Plan, amended and
restated as of June 25, 2018 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on
Form 10-Q filed July 26, 2018 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.18
 Schedule of Non-Employee Directors’  Annual Compensation effective as of June 25, 2019 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 30, 2019 (File No. 001-
32877)).
10.19
 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Compensation Plan, amended and restated effective as of June 26, 2018
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 26, 2018
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.20
 Form of Deferred Stock Unit Agreement for awards under 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Compensation
Plan, amend ed and restated effective June 26, 2018 (effective for awards granted on and subsequent to June 25,
2019) (incor porated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 30,
2019 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.21
 Form of Restricted Stock Agreement for awards under 2006 Non-Employee Director Equity Compensation Plan,
amended and restated effective June 26, 2018 (effective for awards granted on and subsequent to June 25, 2019)
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed July 30, 2019
(File No. 001-32877)).
10.22
 Form of Indemnification Agreement between Mastercard Incorporated and certain of its directors (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2006 (File No. 000-
50250)).
10.23
 Form of Indemnification  Agreement between Mastercard Incorporated and certain of its director nominees
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 2, 2006
(File No. 000-50250)).
10.24
 Deed of Gift between Mastercard Incorporated and Mastercard Foundation (incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.28 to Pre-Ef fective Amendment No. 5 to the Company’ s Registration Statement on Form S-1 filed May 3, 2006
(File No. 333-128337)).
10.25
 Settlement Agreement, dated as of June 4, 2003, between Mastercard International Incorporate d and Plaintif fs in
the class action litigation entitled In Re Visa Check/MasterMoney Antitrust Litigation (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed August 8, 2003 (File No. 000-50250)).
10.26
 Stipulation and Agreement of Settlement, dated July 20, 2006, between Mastercard Incorporated, the several
defendants and the plaintiffs in the consolidated federal class action lawsuit titled In re Foreign Currency
Conversion Fee Antitrust Litigation (MDL  1409), and the California state court action titled Schwartz v. Visa Int’l
Corp., et al. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
November 1, 2006 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.27
 Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and Settlement Sharing, dated as of
February 7, 2011, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated, Visa Inc., Visa
U.S.A. Inc., Visa Intern ational Service Association and Mastercard’ s customer banks that are parties thereto
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.33 to Amendment No.1 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form 10-K/A
filed on November 23, 2011).
10.27.1
 Amendment to Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and Settlement Sharing,
dated as of August 25, 2014, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated, Visa
Inc., Visa U.S.A  Inc., Visa International Service Association and Mastercard’ s customer banks that are parties
thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed October
30, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.27.2
 Second Amendment to Omnibus Agreement Regarding Interchange Litigation Judgment Sharing and Settlement
Sharing, dated as of October 22, 2015, by and among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International
Incorporated, Visa Inc., Visa U.S.A  Inc., Visa International Service Association and Mastercard’ s customer banks
that are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q filed October 29, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.28**
 Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing Agreement, dated as of February 7, 2011, by and among
Mastercard Incorporated , Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s customer bank s that are parties
thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.34 to Amendment No.1 to the Company’ s Annual Report on Form
10-K/A  filed on November 23, 2011).
10.28.1
 Amendment to Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing Agreement, dated as of August 26, 2014, by and
among Mastercard Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s customer banks that are
parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed
October 30, 2014 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.28.2
 Second Amendment to Mastercard Settlement and Judgment Sharing Agreement, dated as of October 22, 2015,
by and amon g Masterca rd Incorporated, Mastercard International Incorporated and Mastercard’ s customer banks
that are parties thereto (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’ s Quarterly Report on Form 10-
Q filed October 29, 2015 (File No. 001-32877)).
10.29
 Superseding and Amended Class Settlement Agreement, dated September 17, 2018, by and among Mastercard
Incorporated and Mastercard International Incorp orated; Visa, Inc., Visa U.S.A. Inc. and Visa International Service
Association; the Class Plaintif fs defined there in; and the Customer Banks defined therein (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’ s Current Report on Form 8-K filed September 18, 2018 (File No. 001-
32877)).
21*   List of Subsidiaries of Mastercard Incorporated.
23.1*  Consent of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP .
31.1*
  Certification of Ajay Banga, President and Chief Executive Officer, pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a), as
adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2*
  Certification of Sachin Mehra, Chief Financial Officer, pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a), as adopted pursuant
to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1*
  Certification of Ajay Banga, President and Chief Executive Officer, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as
adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2*
  Certification of Sachin Mehra, Chief Financial Officer, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to
Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
99.1*  Disclosure pursuant to Section 219 of the Iran Threat Reduction and Syria Human Rights Act of 2012.
101.INS
  XBRL  Instance Document - the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL
tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL  document.
101.SCH*   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CAL*   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.DEF*   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
101.LAB*   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PRE*   XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
+Management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements.
*Filed or furnished herewith.
**Exhibit omits certain information that has been filed separately with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission and has been granted
confidential treatment.
The agreem ents and other documents filed as exhibits to this report are not intended to provide factual information or other
disclosure other than with respect to the terms of the agreements or other documents themselve s, and should not be relied upon for
that purpose. In particular , any representations and warranties made by the Company in these agreements or other documents were
made solely  within the specific context of the relevant agreement or document and may not desc ribe the actual state of affairs as of
the date they were made or at any other time.
112 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
Signatures
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
Annual Report on Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
  MASTERCARD INCORPORA TED
  (Registrant)
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ AJAY BANGA
   Ajay Banga
   President and Chief Executive Officer
   (Principal Executive Officer)
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated:
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ AJAY BANGA
   Ajay Banga
   President and Chief Executive Officer; Director
   (Principal Executive Officer)
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ SACHIN MEHRA
   Sachin Mehra
   Chief Financial Officer
   (Principal Financial Officer)
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ SANDRA  ARKELL
   Sandra Arkell
   Corporate Controller
   (Principal Accounting Officer)
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ DA VID R. CARLUCCI
  David R. Carlucci
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ RICHARD K. DA VIS
  Richard K. Davis
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ STEVEN J. FREIBERG
  Steven J. Freiberg
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ JULIUS GENACHOWSKI
  Julius Genachowski
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ CHOON PHONG GOH
  Choon Phong Goh
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ RICHARD HA YTHORNTHW AITE
  Richard Haythornthwaite
  Chairman of the Board; Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ MERIT  E. JANOW
  Merit E. Janow
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ OKI MA TSUMOT O
  Oki Matsumoto
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ YOUNGME MOON
  Youngme Moon
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ RIMA  QURESHI
  Rima Qureshi
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ JOSÉ OCT AVIO REYES LAGUNES
  José Octavio Reyes Lagunes
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ GABRIELLE SULZBERGER
  Gabrielle Sulzberger
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ JACKSON TAI
  Jackson T ai
  Director
   
Date: February 14, 2020 By: /s/ LANCE UGGLA
  Lance Uggla
  Director
   
113 MASTERCARD 2019 FORM 10-K
